VOL. II. 1
BOOK FIFTH.
CHAPTER I.
Notwithstanding
the testimony of King
James the First, Cotton Mather, and divers
other
unquestionable authorities, backed by the
opinions of a good portion of mankind, in all
time past, there are a vast many philosophers of
this unbelieving age, who affect to doubt the
existence
of witchcraft, or diabolism, in the affairs of
this world. There is no use in arguing with
such sturdy unbelievers. We will therefore
content ourselves with expressing a firm
conviction
,
that this influence does exist even at this
present
time; and that its effects are every day to
be seen, more especially in certain highly gifted
persons being thereby enabled to perform tasks,
which in the ordinary limits of the human
faculties
,
would be quite impossible.
In no instance does this diabolical, or magical
power, this direct influence of what Sir Walter
Scott calls gramarye, appear so evident to us,
as in the ease with which certain great authors
produce those immortal works, that succeed
each other with the rapidity of the discharges
of a repeating gun. Indeed, if we look back to
the first invention of printing, an art which may
be said to be the parent of authorship, we shall
trace it to this diabolical influence, in the case
of the renowned Doctor Faustus, whose power
of multiplying books was universally ascribed
to the direct agency of gramarye, and who to
this day is familiarly coupled with the spirit of
darkness. Nay, the doctor, according to
unquestionable
tradition, was finally carried away,
in consequence of a compact, the conditions of
which every body is acquainted with. This
origin of the art is commemorated in the
singular
fact, that a certain class of persons employed
in the printing-offices are to this day familiarly
called printer's devils, indubitably with
reference
to this diabolical origin of the art.
The name of this mischevious and evil disposed
familiar, or bad spirit, who inspired Doctor
Faustus, was Mephostophilos, as we learn from
Christopher Marlow, from whom as great a man
as Will Shakspeare borrowed a great many good
things.
That this same Mephostophilos still exercises
great influence in the affairs of authors and
printers, and occasionally contracts to lend
his assistance on certain conditions, is, we think,
sufficiently apparent in the case of various great
writers now living, who, not to be profane,
certainly write as if the dl were in them.
Some we behold committing the most foul
offences
against our mortal enemy, common sense;
others exhibiting unquestionable proofs of the
inspiration which animates them, by attacking
and tearing to pieces, the characters of men,
women, and little children, and thus
committing
the most wanton depredations on the scanty
stock of human happiness. But if the truth
must be ventured upon, in no class of writers do
we see this diabolical spirit so clearly evinced, as
among the critics, who, not to speak
irreverently
of these dispensers of fame, do certainly display
a most horrible propensity to wickedness, in
mauling and cutting up innocent authors, with
as little remorse as if they were so many
cabbages
or pumpkins.
Another most pregnant example of this actual
agency of the great printer's devil
'ycleptMephostophilos
,
is that of the celebrated person known
by the appellation of the Great Unknown,
who, if we might be allowed the suggestion, is
no other than Mephostophilos himself. Not
to mention his prerogative of being invisible,
and his power of keeping his own secret, two
things unexampled in the history of
successful
authors
, both which savour strongly of
gramarye
,
there are other shrewd indications of
this identity. We have some little experience
in these matters, and hold it utterly impossible
for a mere mortal man, with one head, and one
right hand, to write books of any sort, much
less such astonishing clever stories as those of
the Great Unknown, at the rate he doth, without
having actually bargained with some evil agent
to assist him. That mental Scots Fiddle,
which scholars denominate the
cacoethes scribendi
,
can never sufficiently account for the
supernatural
celerity with which he utters his works to the
world, unless aided by the supposition of some
wicked compact, or, what is more probable, of
our author being no other than Mephostophilos
himself.
This theory of the agency of the evil one in
the writing of books, is by no means so
improbable
as may seem at first sight, nor is the
Great Unknown the only writer of the present
time, to whom the imputation may be
reasonably
applied, in our opinion. What else could
have tempted my lord Byron and Mr. Southey
to outrage the Judgment Seat of Heaven in
their two Visions? or what but this, could
have prompted Mr. Thomas Moore, to mingle
his poetical fictions, and mix up the puny fires
of his sensual inspiration, with those sacred
documents which form the rock of our faith; to
blast the reputation of the angels, by giving to
them the desires and the frailties of the most
degenerate of the daughters of men?
Certainly
it is not uncharitable to suppose these works
were written either by persons who, to use the
common phrase, had got the dl in them,
or who were at least instigated by his immediate
agency. Nothing less than a direct jogging of
the elbow, from some mischievously inclined
spirit, could, in our humble trans-atlantic opinion,
have prompted these mere mortal men thus to
rush in where angels dare not tread; or
stimulated the wayward genius of my lord
Byron, ever sickening, as it would seem, after
singularity, to attempt, at this time of day, to
prove the father of evil, the author of all our
woes, an enlightened philosopher; and the first
murderer, a pious seeker after knowledge.
In thus attempting to identify the Great
Unknown
with the great Mephostophilos, who
is supposed to have been the inventor of the
mischievous art of printing, (so obnoxious to the
Holy Alliance, doubtless on account of its
diabolical
origin,) we have not the most remote
intention
to raise a prejudice against that
mysterious
person. Indeed, we have no doubt that
this suggestion will increase the avidity of the
juvenile world, for the perusal of these thrice
profitable worksprofitable to the author,
profitable to the printer, and profitable to the
booksellers. Our object was simply to offer
some probable theory or hypothesis, whereby
this distracting question, which hath already,
like the old controversy concerning atoms, set
the learned and unlearned together by the ears,
might be settled, and mankind thereafter sleep
quietly over these productions, without being
disturbed with the insatiable twitches of an
ever
wakeful curiosity. Our explanation is, we
think, most peculiarly happy, since, while it
offers a satisfactory solution concerning the
miraculous conception and delivery of these
popular works, it likewise explains the nature and
source of that singular faculty of bewitching his
readers, which our author possesses in such
perfection
.
Under the influence of this, they
become
blinded to his most glaring faults, and
come at length actually to swallow the
unequalled
impossibility of a woman (having a tongue)
being silent, through the whole course of three
volumes!
The gentle and courteous reader has,
doubtless
,
long before this, discovered that we
ourselves
deal in no such wicked mysteries, and
that we lay claim to no inspiration but what is
honestly come by at least. No motive of profit
or convenience can possibly induce us to make any
covenant with Mephostophilos or any other evil
disposed enormity, or to introduce our readers
to a fellowship with any being more mischievous
than an author. So far from this, we will for
the present take our leave of him, with an honest,
old-fashioned benediction on his house and all
within it, which, in truth, may not be altogether
superfluous, seeing there be so many evil
spirits abroad now-a-days, both in prose and
poetry.
Saint Francis and Saint Benedight,
Blesse this house from wicked wight,
From the nightmare and the goblin,
That is hight Good Fellow Robin;
Keep it from all evil spirits,
Fairies, weasels, rats and ferrets,
From Curfew time
To the next prime.
VOL. II. 2
CHAPTER II.
Through untrack'd woods, a weary way,
They wander'd with great pain;
And some that went forth on that day,
Never return'd again.
After
the savages had completed the
plundering
and burning of the village, they departed
with their prisoners towards the river, on whose
banks the principal part of them resided.
Besides
the fair Christina and Koningsmarke,
the captives consisted of counsellor Ludwig
Varlett, Lob Dotterel, a poor man named Claas
Tomeson, his wife and child, and that likely
fellow Cupid, who, for some cause or other,
seemed rather to accompany them voluntarily
than by compulsion.
They shaped their course to the westward,
passing through deep forests, where the sound
of the axe had never been heard, and where the
wild animals had hitherto maintained
undisturbed
possession. Poor Christina was soon so
worn down with grief and fatigue, that she was
incapable of keeping up with the rest of the
party, and had not the Long Finne sometimes
taken her in his arms and carried her through
the swamps, she would have been murdered by
the savages, who several times turned back and
threatened her with their tomahawks. At the
end of the first day's journey, the luckless wife
of Claas Tomeson, whose infant was scarcely
a month old, was so worn down, that the Indians
debated whether they should not put an end to
them both. Finally it was resolved upon
and they were despatched, in spite of the shrieks
of Christina, and the agonizing cries of the
husband
,
who was first tied to a tree, and thus he
witnessed, without being able to make a single
effort to prevent it, the fate of his helpless wife,
and still more helpless infant.
Three days more they journeyed in this
manner
,
Christina every day becoming more weak,
and every moment expecting to meet the fate of
the poor woman and her child. Towards the
evening of the fourth, they approached the banks
of the river on which dwelt the tribe of the
Rolling
Thunder, and gave the war-whoop, which
was answered by the women, children and
old men that had remained at home. One of
the warriors had been previously sent to the
town to inform them of the success of the
expedition
,
and prepare them for a frolic.
Accordingly
,
the party was met about half a mile from
the town, by an infuriated rabble, armed with
guns, clubs, and tomahawks, hallooing and
whooping with horrible exultation, mixed with
cries of vengeance, from the kindred of those
who had been slain in the attack upon
Elsingburgh
.
Poor Claas Tomeson was selected, on this
occasion, for the object of their infernal
meriment
.
He was stripped, painted black with
charcoal, and apprized that if he gained the door
of the council house, which was pointed out to
him, he would be safe. They then gave him
the start about six paces, and Claas ran for his
life, followed by the yelling crew, who assailed
him with every ingenuity of torture they could
devise; beating him with clubs, cutting at him
with their tomahawks, and sometimes putting
the muzzles of their guns close to his naked
skin and firing powder into it, powowing and
beating
their rude drums all the while. Poor Claas,
although wounded and maimed in a cruel
manner
,
animated by a last hope, exerted himself to
the utmost, and at length succeeded in gaining
the door of the council house, that sanctuary even
among barbarians. He seized the door post,
and at the same instant fainted under his
tortures
and exertions. A dispute now arose,
whether he had fairly entitled himself to the
condition upon which his life was to be spared,
and it was with great difficulty the old men
could restrain the infuriated youth from
despatching him. At length it was agreed to
spare the victim, at least for the present, and
he was carried to a wigwam, where a doctor or
conjurer was sent to attend upon him.
The first thing the doctor did, was to
mumble
to himself a parcel of unconnected jargon,
which poor Claas as little comprehended as a
civilized patient does a civilized doctor, when
he describes his symptoms. He then caused a
large fire to be made, and the door to be shut,
and thereupon began to cut capers and shout
aloud, until he was in a glorious perspiration;
it being his opinion, that whenever a patient
could not take sufficient exercise to produce
this effect upon himself, the next best thing was
for the doctor to do it for him. So, also, if it
was necessary to take medicines, or fast, the
practice of the Indian doctor was to take the
physic, and undergo the penance himself;
all which equally redounded to the benefit
2*
of the sick manprovided the doctor was
well paid. Without that indispensable
preliminary
,
this mode of cure was devested of
all its efficacy. After capering himself into a
fine perspiration, and swallowing a dose of
something, the doctor inquired of Claas how
he felt himself. The poor fellow, who was
soon recovered to the use of his senses, thought
it most prudent to compliment the doctor by
saying he was much better; for he was
apprehensive
that if the doctor lost all hope of finally
curing his patient, he might cut the matter
short and save his credit, by recommending an
auto de fe
, so he professed himself marvellously
benefited.
The next day the Doctor came again, cut a
few more capers, talked a little jargon, and took
a drink of strong liquor, or rum, in order to
strengthen his patient, who, as before, declared
the great benefit he received from the prescription.
The third time, the doctor brought with him
his great medicine, as he called it, which was to
perfect the cure. He began with making the
most diabolical faces imaginable; then he puffed,
and strained, and struggled, as if contesting with
some invisible being with might and main.
Presently he ceased, crying out, at the same
time, Mila-mila-kipokitie koasab, which,
in the learned language of the Indians, means,
give, give me thy breeches. This being
explained
to Claas, and he at the same time
assured
that the success of the great medicine
depended upon his complying with the
requisitions
of the doctor, he was fain to give up his
breeches. The doctor then commenced
another
great contest with the invisible maneto,
whom he again tumbled on the floor with a
mighty effort, exclaiming at the same time
Mila-mila-capotionian, which means give me
thy coat. With this also poor Claas complied.
Hereupon the doctor began a struggle more
desperate than the preceding, which
terminated
in his crying out aloud
Mila-mila-papa-kionian
,
which means, give me thy waistcoat,
Claas parted with his red waistcoat, gorgeously
bedecked with round metal buttons, with a sore
heart. In this way the doctor gradually devested
his patient of all his valuables, and at length,
looking round to see if there was any thing left,
he took out of his leathern pouch an eagle's
feather, and, pulling some of the down, blew it in
the face of his patient, crying out
Houana!
houana!magat! magat!
'Tis done'tis
donehe is strong, he is strong. Then
carefully
gathering together the various items of his
fee, he marched with astonishing dignity and
gravity out of the wigwam. In process of time
honest Claas actually recovered, furnishing
a pregnant example of the excellent effects
resulting
from the doctor's taking his own
prescriptions
,
instead of administering them to the
patient
.
In the mean while a council had been held for
the purpose of deciding the destinies of the other
prisoners. Agreeably to the customs of these
people, the relatives of an Indian killed in battle
have the choice, either of adopting a prisoner in
the room of the friend they have lost, or of
putting
him to death by torture. Accordingly,
Christina, Koningsmarke, Counsellor Varlett,
Lob Dotterel, and Claas Tomeson, the latter
scarce recovered from the effects of the gauntlet
he had run, were brought forth in front of the
council house, to receive their doom of death or
adoption.
The mothers of three warriors slain at the
attack upon Elsingburgh came forth, howling,
and tearing their long black hair, like so many
furies thirsting for the blood of their victims;
while the young children, taught from their
infancy to banquet on the tortures of their
enemies, stood ready to assist, if necessary, in
executing the judgment. After examining the
prisoners for a few minutes, as if debating
whether to yield to the suggestions of policy or
vengeance, a young squaw came forward, and
taking the hand of Christina, exclaimedFive
moons ago I lost a sister, who was carried away
by the Mohawks; thou shalt take her place, and
be unto me as a sister. The old men signified
their acquiescence, and the Indian girl led her
white sister to her wigwam.
The wife of the chief who was slain in
attempting
to detain the boat, as we have
heretofore
stated, then stepped forth, after having for
a while contemplated the face and form of the
Long Finne, and addressed the old menMy
children have lost a father, I a husband
revenge is sweetbut who will hunt for us,
and supply us with food in the long winters, if I
should say, let us sacrifice this white-man who
killed a red chief? Nolet him be my slave,
and hunt for me, as he did who is now gone to
the land of spirits. Her choice was in like
manner sanctioned by the sages, and
Koningsmarke
was given to the Indian widow as her
husband, or slave, as she should ultimately
decide.
Next came the turn of Lob Dotterel, whose
bald pate excited, in no small degree, the wonder
of the forest kings, who had heard the story of
his scalp coming off in such a miraculous
manner
.
A grand council had been held upon his
wig, but they could make nothing of it. The
prevailing opinion was, that it was a great
medicine, by the virtue of which Lob had
escaped all damage from an operation so fatal
to others, and that the high constable was a sort
of wizard, whom it would be somewhat
dangerous
to meddle with. After a long talk among
the old men, it was at length decided to spare
him, for the present, with a view to his
instructing
them in the method of compounding this
great medicine, so important to the safety of
the Indian warrior.
Counsellor Varlett and Claas Tomeson now
only remained to be adjudged, and the
assemblage of women and children began
to murmur at the thoughts of losing what
is considered a high frolic among them,
in like manner as civilized women and children
delight in seeing a man hanged. The mothers
of two of the warriors slain at Elsingburgh,
came forward, and clamorously demanded their
victims; a demand, which, according to the
sacred customs of the savages, must not be
denied. Their doom was accordingly
pronounced
,
and hailed by the dismal scalp halloo,
the signal of torture and death. The two
victims
were accordingly seized, stripped, and
painted black, and beaten with sticks by the
women and boys. Claas Tomeson's hands
were then tied behind his back with a rope, the
other end of which was fastened to a stake about
fifteen feet high, leaving sufficient length to
admit of his going round it two or three times,
and back again. A chief then addressed the
multitude, urging every topic calculated to
excite
their ruling passion of revenge, and was
answered by a yell that made the vast forest
ring.
Then began a scene of horror, which has
been often witnessed by the dauntless spirits
who marched in the van, to the exploring and
settling of this new world, and which may,
perhaps, in some measure, serve to excuse
their harshness to that unhappy race, by whom
their friends and brothers had so often suffered.
The Indian men first approached, and fired
powder into his naked skin. Then they lighted
the pile, composed of sticks, one end of which
was previously charred by fire laid around the
post, at the distance of five or six yards. A
party of these exasperated and inhuman beings,
then seizing the burning brands, surrounded the
wretched victim, and thrust them into his naked
body. Presenting themselves on every side,
which ever way he ran, he met the fiends with
their burning fagots, and if he stood still, they
all assailed him at once. The squaws then
threw the hot ashes and burning coals upon his
bare head, which, falling upon the ground, in a
little while he had nothing to tread upon but a
bed of fire. Claas called them cowards
womenand begged them to shoot him like
men and warriors. But they only answered
him with laughter, shouts, and new tortures.
Claas then, in the agony of his sufferings,
besought the Almighty to have compassion
upon him, and permit him at once to die.
Hark! cried the warriors; he is a woman,
he is no warrior, he cries out like a coward.
Exhausted, at length, with pain and exertion,
he laid himself down upon his face, gradually
losing all acuteness of sensation, and apparently
becoming almost insensible. But from this
blessed apathy he was roused by an old hag,
who, placing some burning coals on a piece of
bark, threw them upon his back, which was
now excoriated from head to foot. The poor
victim again started upon his feet, and walked
slowly round the post, gazing with a vacant
look on those about him, and appearing hardly
to know what was going forward. Perceiving
that he no longer was susceptible to suffering,
a chief came behind him, and buried his
tomahawk
in the back of his head. He fell, and
yielded his tortured spirit without a groan.
It now came to the turn of Ludwig Varlett,
who had witnessed this scene with a degree of
firmness, peculiar to that class of people who
march in the van of civilization, in our woody
progress, and whose daily toils, dangers and
exposures, gradually render them almost
insensible
to fear or suffering. Perceiving his fate
to be inevitable, he resolved to meet it like a
man; at the same time athought came over
him, that he might possibly escape the
tortures
of his poor comrade. By means of some
little smattering of their language, which he
had acquired as a trader, he managed to make
some of the chiefs comprehend that he was in
possession of a great medicine, so powerful, as
to render those acquainted with the secret,
invulnerable
to a rifle ball. The chiefs shook
VOL. II. 3
their heads, with a sort of incredulous chuckle,
and asked him if he were willing to try the
experiment
in his own person. Ludwig said yes,
and desired that five or six of them would load
their guns, while he placed himself about twenty
yards distant. They did so, and the crowd
stood in breathless anxiety to witness the virtues
of the great medicine. Onetwothree
fire! cried he; and the next instant he lay
stretched a corse. The Indians ran up to him,
and then, for the first time, comprehending the
whole affair, they became mad with rage and
disappointment. They tore his body into
pieces
,
scooped up his blood with their hands, and
drank it smoking hot, and finally tossed his
limbs into the flames. But the brave Ludwig
felt it not, and escaped, by his presence of mind,
the sad and lingering tortures of Indian cruelty.
This horrible festival was concluded by a
drinking match, which they were enabled to
carry to the most extravagant excess, by means
of a quantity of spirits they had taken at the
village of Elsingburgh. The two tribes, who
had been jointly engaged in that expedition,
first separated, the one crossing the river, in
order that the remembrance of former injuries,
which is the first impulse of intoxication in the
mind of an Indian, might not produce hostilities
between the two. They then appointed
persons
to secrete their arms, and maintain order
during the scene which was to ensue. The
debauch
then commenced, by pouring a keg of
spirits into a large kettle, and dipping it out
with wooden ladles. A scene ensued which
baffles all description. The shoutings,
hallooings
,
whoopings, and shrieks, of each party,
were heard at intervals, during the whole night,
and the morning presented the wretched
bacchanals
,
dejected, worn out, and melancholy in
the extreme. Some had their clothes torn from
their backs, some were wounded, others
crippled
,
and three dead bodies marked the bloody
excesses to which barbarians are prone, when
their dormant passions are excited by that most
pernicious foe of savage and civilized man,
strong drink.
CHAPTER III.
I have some little smattering of Greek,
Hebrew, Chaldaie, and Egyptian,
Welsh, Irish Dutch, and Biscayan;
Indeed, all the tongues of Europe,
Asia, and Africa, are tolerably familiar
But in America, and the new-found world,
I very much fear there be some languages
That would go near to puzzle me.
In
the mean time Christina was taken home
by the Indian girl, who was called Aonetti,
which signifies Deer Eyes, from their
resemblance
in wildness and brilliancy to those of
that animal. Aonetti was considered the
beauty of the village, having, in addition to her
fine eyes, a profusion of long black hair, a pretty,
round, graceful figure, and an expression of
tender seriousness in her countenance, peculiarly
interesting. The family consisted of Aonetti's
mother, an aged widow, and the
Night Shadow
, her
only son, one of the most distinguished warriors
and hunters of the tribe. Night Shadow was
upwards of six feet high, straight as a pine,
active as the deer, and brave as a lion. He
could turn his face towards any point of the
compass, and march a hundred miles through
the forest without deviating to the right or to
the left; he could follow the track of man or
beast upon the dry leaves, with the sagacious
instinct of a hound; and in hunting he disdained
to pursue any but the noblest beasts of the
forest. The wigwam inhabited by this family
was of the better sort, having two rooms,
partitioned
off from each other by strips of bark.
Christina became an inmate of this simple
habitation, and was treated in all respects as if
she were the daughter of the same mother.
Aonetti
was very fond of her, and gave her the name
of
Mimi
, which, in her language, signified the
Turtle Dove. The mother addressed her as
daughter, the young people as sister. Among
the savages, all women, whatever be their rank,
work, if they are capable of employment. With
the exception of a few slaves, who were
sometimes
reserved from among their prisoners, the
labours of the field and of the household, were
all performed by the females. Poor Christina,
whose education had little qualified her for this
mode of life, made but an awkward hand at
planting corn, and little Deer Eyes often
laughed
3*
at her bringing up, as quite ridiculous for a
woman. Christina was therefore indulged in
the performance of less laborious duties, such
as bringing water from the spring, just in the
centre of the village; gathering cranberries,
and preparing their daily meals; to which last
she soon became adequate, as their art of
cookery
was extremely simple. In this manner the
time passed away, heavily indeed; but although
her thoughts perpetually recurred to her home
in the village of Elsingburgh, and to the
kindness
of her father, now dead perhaps, or if living,
mourning her absence in all the anxiety of
perfect ignorance whether she were living or
dead; still Christina did not sink under her
misfortunes. Perhaps the secret consciousness
that her lover was near, and shared her fate,
contributed not a little to support her in these
hours of trial.
The Long Finne, whose life, as we have
before
stated, was reprieved by the widow, became
her slave, according to the Indian custom. For
a time he was narrowly watched, and never
suffered out of sight of the village. But
perceiving
that he preserved a cheerful countenance,
and seemed by degrees to become reconciled to
his situation, they gradually relaxed in their
vigilance, and sometimes took him out hunting
with them.
The first time this happened, the Long
Finne, anxious to distinguish himself, shot so
well, that the savage hunters became not a little
jealous; for they are extremely tenacious of
their superior skill, not only in war, but in
hunting. Perceiving this to be the case,
Koningsmarke designedly missed several shots,
and they became highly pleased to think that
his first success was merely owing to chance.
By degrees, as he gained their confidence,
they suffered him to go into the woods by
himself to hunt, so that, if he could have endured
the thought of deserting Christina, he might,
in all probability, have escaped. He often
debated whether it would not be better to
attempt
returning to Elsingburgh with a view to
apprise the Heer of his daughter's situation, in
order that measures might be taken to ransom
her; but the fear that the savages might
perhaps
revenge his desertion by the sacrifice of
his fellow prisoners, deterred him from putting
this project into execution.
In the intervals of his labours, and in the
evening
,
the Long Finne, when he had become
sufficiently
acquainted with the Indian language,
was amused with the conversation of an aged
Indian warrior, the father of his mistress, who
resided in the family. Ollentangi, as he was
called, had been in his day a great warrior,
statesman and hunter. But he was now nearly
seventy years old, and, being subject to
rheumatism
,
the common malady of the old Indians,
lived a life of leisure, and passed his time
principally
in smoking. Ollentangi was considered
as one of the wisest men of his tribe, and, indeed,
so far as the light of nature would carry him,
was justly entitled to the appellation of a sage.
Had his opportunities been equal, he might
perhaps
have been a Solon or a Socrates. With
this old man Koningsmarke often discussed
the comparative excellence of the Indian
religion
,
customs, laws, and modes of society,
contrasted with those of civilized nations, and
was frequently surprised at the ingenuity with
which he supported the superior happiness and
virtue of the savages.
It was Ollentangi's opinion, that the Great
Spirit had made the red-men for the shade, and
the white-men for the sunshine; the former to
hunt, the latter to work.
Your Black Gowns, would he say, tell
us to believe as they do, and live as they live.
They say we must set about dividing our forests,
putting up fences, and ploughing with horses and
oxen. But who is to say what shall belong to
each man, that we may put up our fences
accordingly
?
Where are we to get oxen and horses?
We have nothing but furs to pay for them, and
if we leave off hunting before we have become
farmers, we shall neither have furs to barter, nor
meat to support us. As to our religion,
continued
he, we think we can understand it,
but that is more than we can say of yours. Our
religion is fitted for our state of nature; it is
incorporated with our habits and manners, and
we must change these before we are fit to
become
Christians. You may in time make us bad
Indians, but you will never make us good
white-men
.
Be certain that so long as we have
plenty
of game, we shall never become farmers, nor
send our children to school, nor believe in your
Gods.
You talk of our Gods, Ollentangi, said
Koningsmarkewe acknowledge but one.
Yes, but then you have a Good Spirit and
an Evil Spirit, and your Good Spirit is,
according
to your own account, not so powerful as
your Bad one, who not only causes your
world to be overrun with evil, but actually
carries
off a vast many more people than your
Good Spirit. It would seem, from this, that he
was the more powerful of the two. Besides,
your Black Gowns have assured me that their
Good Spirit is composed of three Good Spirits,
all equal; therefore, you must have more Gods
than one.
Koningsmarke endeavoured to explain the
mystery of the Trinity to Ollentangi, but
without
effect. It was beyond the comprehension
of the man of nature, who continued obstinately
to affirm, that if the Great Spirit was composed
of three Great Spirits, they must have a
plurality
of spirits, and that if it was not so
composed
,
then his doctrine could not be true.
Such is the utmost extent to which human
reason
can carry the man of nature.
One day Ollentangi came, and with much
gravity informed Koningsmarke that he had a
great project in his head, for the benefit of the
white-men.
Listen, said he: That you are a
miserable
race in your own country, appears certain,
or you would not not have come hither to
disturb
us. Now our wise men have just
determined
to send some of our best conjurers out
to your country to convert your people to our
belief; to teach them to hunt the deer, and to
live without cheating one another in making
bargains: what think yon of this?
But, said Koningsmarke, your
conjurers
don't understand our language.
Oh that is easily got over. They shall
teach your people ours, replied Ollentangi.
Well, but the state of society is so
different
among us, that your conjurers could never
teach us to live as you dobesides, we have
so little game that if we all became hunters we
should be likely to starve.
Oh but we shall soon remedy thatwe
shall plant acorns, and they in time will grow
into great forests of trees, and game will
increase
accordingly.
Yes, but what shall we do while the trees
are growing? We have a saying, that while
the grass grows the steed starves. It will take
five thousand moons for the forest to become
like these.
Well, and how long will it take for an
Indian to become a white-man? A little tree, if
let alone, will grow into a great one within a
certain time. It takes longer to change men
than trees. But let us proceed, our conjurers
shall teach you, among other things, to believe
in all our great medicines, to make an eagle's
feather protect you from a bullet, a fish bone
ward off the lightning, and a tobacco leaf
secure
you from all the dangers of the forest.
They shall teach you all these things.
But we can't be taught such things,
Ollentangi
;
we shall not be able to comprehend how,
or believe that a fish bone can be made to keep
off lightning. 'Tis contrary to all our experience,
and, to say the truth, is too foolish for the most
ignorant among us to believe. If it is a
mystery
,
we can't comprehend it; if it is no
mystery
'tis no better than nonsense.
Very wellyou tell me our religion is too
foolish for your wisdom, and yours is too wise
for our folly. We shall teach you a little of our
ignorance in these matters, that you may
comprehend
us; and you shall teach us some of
your wisdom, that we may comprehend you.
This will be proper and neighbourly. We shall
in time make men of you. I don't think your
case quite desperate.
But you will not be able to teach us
ignorance
,
as you call it. The mind never goes
backwards.
You have just acknowledged what I want
you to believe, namely, that we Indians are
wiser and happier than you. I have known
several
white-men become Indians, but I never
saw an Indian turn white-man. Therefore, if the
human mind never goes backwards, 'tis a proof
that the state of nature is better than the civilized
state.
One evening Koningsmarke undertook to
prove to Ollentangi, that a people who cultivated
the ground had a right to take it away from those
who only hunted upon it, because it was the will
of the Great Spirit that the human race should
increase to the greatest possible number in all
parts of the world. Now you red-men
pretend
to occupy the whole country for a hundred
miles round, said the Long Finne, though
there is but two or three hundred of you, and it
is large enough, if properly cultivated, to support
five hundred times as many.
Very well, replied Ollentangi; you say
it is the will of the Great Spirit that men should
increase and be happy. You told me the other
day, I remember, that your countrymen came
here to look for land, because there were too
many people and too little land in their country.
People then, by your account, can increase too
fast for their happiness. Now this never
happens
to us red-men, therefore we are happier
VOL. II. 4
than you. Besides, you tried to persuade me,
not long since, that hardly one in a hundred of
the white people were happy when they returned
to the region of souls. It is plain, therefore,
that the more people there are in this world, the
more they will want land, and the greater will
be the number of the miserable in a future state.
How is this?
Koningsmarke undertook to explain all these
matters, but they were beyond the reach of the
old man's philosophy, although one of the most
acute Indians of the new world. Among other
things, Ollentangi laughed, a thing he very
seldom
did, when Koningsmarke impeached the
right of the Indians to the forests, which they had
possessed for several generations.
Listen to me, said heMore than twenty
thousand moons ago, a female pappoose was
found, only a month old, in the waters of a lake,
lying in a little canoe of rushes. When this
pappoose grew up, she became a great
prophetess
,
and before she disappeared she foretold the
coming of the white-men. She performed many
strange and wonderful things, such as turning
night into day, and water into dry land. As
our people increased, she made this continent,
which was, at first, but a little island; and told
us to remove hither, for we lived a great many
months' journey towards the rising sun. Though
our people were as yet but few, we wanted room
to hunt; so the squaw went to the water side,
and prayed that the little island might grow
bigger, for the use of her chosen people. The
Great Spirit hereupon sent a great number of
tortoises and muskrats, that brought mud, sand,
and other things, so that, in time, the island
became
a great continent. In memory of this
service, our tribe was divided into two parts;
one of which is called the Mud-Turtle, the other
the Muskrat. Now, as our great grandmother
made this country for our own use entirely, and
on purpose that we might have plenty of room
to hunt in, it is plain that you white-men can
have no claim upon it, but that you tell as
great lies about your Great Spirit having made
it for you.
At another time, Koningsmarke took
occasion
to treat Ollentangi's philosophy and
religion with very little ceremony, affirming
that it was nothing but the light of nature,
which only served to lead people astray.
Very good, replied OllentangiI see
every day, the bears, beavers, and all other
animals, pursuing their natural impulses, by
which they attain to such a degree of happiness
as they are capable of enjoying. The beasts
that live in the woods follow, then, what you
call the light of naturenow which is the
happiest
,
a dog that is chained up all day, whipped,
and kicked into the knowledge of white-men,
to snarl and bite, and point with his nose, or a
deer that runs wild in the forest, and pursues
what you call the light of nature?
I should think the deer, replied
Koningsmarke
.
Very well, then, said Ollentangi; is it
not the same with men? You white-men are
the dogs that are chained up, and taught to bite
each other; and we are the deer, that run free
and wild in the woods.
Koningsmarke would then undertake to
explain
the distinction between man and all other
animals; the former being governed by reason,
the latter only by instinct, and therefore of an
inferior race by nature. But Ollentangi
stoutly
denied that there was any difference of this
kind, since, if any thing, the animals were wiser
a great deal than men.
The beaver, said he, builds better houses
than we Indians, and the fox is better lodged in
winter than we. Had we been naturally as
reasonable as they, we should have made our
habitations under ground, at least for the cold
season. You white-men, it is true, build better
houses than the beavers, and are better lodged
than the foxes, but in attaining to this you have
become a miserable, degenerate race of slaves,
who do nothing but work all day long, and
buy and sell every thing, from your Maker,
down to the smallest article that you possess. You
see, therefore, that you have not such good reason
as you think, for running down the light of nature,
since, according to your own account, it must
have guided you at first to all your early and
fancied improvements.
Koningsmarke then strove to convey to the
mind of the poor savage, some definite idea with
respect to the distinction between reason and
inspiration, the latter of which he told him was
the source of the christian religion. Ollentangi
shook his head.
Yes!this is what our jugglers and
conjurers
tell us. They pretend that the Great
Spirit sends his messages by them. But we
don't believe it, because it is certain that if the
Great Spirit had any messages, he would send
them to the chiefs of the tribe, and not to such
contemptible fellows.
4*
The more, in fact, that Koningsmarke
conversed
with the old Indian, the more he became
sensible that it was impossible to make him
comprehend the most simple elements of our
social and religious systems. Long before the
winter set in, the Long Finne became
unalterably
convinced that all religions must be
accommodated
to the state of society, as well as the
progress of intelligence; that religion is an
integral portion of both; and that the attempt to
propagate a system of faith at war with either,
must necessarily entirely fail, or, if partially
successful, be productive of great
moral evil
.
Many other discussions took place between
Ollentangi and Koningsmarke, but we have
already detailed sufficient to give some little
idea of the confined views and opinions of an
Indian sage. Besides, it is high time to return
to the fair and gentle Christina, whom, though
sometimes we seem to lose sight of, we never for
a moment forget.
During the first weeks of their captivity, such
was the watchful jealousy of the savages, that
Koningsmarke had no opportunity of speaking
either to Christina or honest Lob Dotterel, who,
being neither hunter nor warrior, and having no
little boys to keep in order, sunk into a
personage
of very little consequence, in his own
opinion
.
The miracle of his wig, however, caused
him to be somewhat wondered at by the Indians.
The Long Finne sometimes met Christina at
the spring, without daring to talk but with his
eyes. In time, however, he was less watched,
and besides occasionally conversing, he
sometimes
met her in the forest gathering cranberries.
On these occasions the desolate condition of the
poor girl, thus alone in the pathless wilderness
without a friend but him, caused the gentle
Christina to forget the scar on his neck, and
the warnings of Bombie of the Frizzled Head.
A flood of tender emotions rushed on her heart
at these times, and, as the tears trickled from
her eyes, which she turned up towards him like
an infant looking to its parent for protection,
she sometimes forgot to resist when he kissed
them away. The Long Finne occasionally
came to the wigwam where Christina resided,
and where his visits were not discouraged, more
especially by the blue-eyed Swede and the
dark-eyed Indian maid, the latter of whom, in
a little while, learned sufficient of their language
to make herself understood on various little
occasions
.
She was particularly importunate
with Christina to teach her how the Indian word
kisakia
, which signifies I love, was
pronounced
in her native language.
It was not long, in fact, before the gentle
Christina and the Deer Eyes, with that
quick-sighted
instinct common to their sex, discovered,
or rather began to suspect, that they were, or
would soon become, rivals. At least it was so with
Christina; for the ignorance of Aonetti in the
modes and customs that restrain the exhibition
of certain feelings on the part of civilized women,
kept her for a long time from knowing the state
of Christina's heart. The Indian women are as
remarkable for the tenderness and warmth of
their affections, as the Indian men are for their
coldness and indifference. They become
suddenly
and strongly attached, especially to white
men; and, being entirely governed by the
feelings
of nature, do not hesitate to take upon
themselves those advances, which, among
civilized
people, are the province of men alone.
The gentle and tender simplicity with which the
Indian girls of the better sort do this, is
peculiarly
affecting, and takes from their advances
all appearance of indelicate forwardness.
The progress of this new sentiment in the
heart of Aonetti, was indicated in the increasing
languor of her eyes; her carelessness in the
performance
of domestic duties; her solitary walks,
and her hanging about Christina's neck, kissing
her, and whispering, I love himO how I love
him! She was accustomed, in her ramblings,
to compose little extemporary songs, and hum
them to wild tunes of her own fancying; one of
which Christina caught, and translated, or at
least imitated, in the following lines:
My love's like the deer in the forest that skip,
Like the cranberry's hue are his cheek and his lip;
His spirit sits by me at night when I sleep,
But when I awake it is gone, and I weep.
I love himOh how I love him!
But his bride, his
own
bride, I never shall be,
He loves, but he loves not, he loves not poor me;
When he's near me I'm sad, and wish him away,
And when he is gone, I could bless him to stay.
I love himOh how I
do
love him!
When Christina discovered the state of the
Indian girl's heart, it did not weaken her
affection
for her adopted sister, or diminish her
grateful recollection of the kindness which she
owed to that kind-souled being. True, she did
not perhaps think her a dangerous rival, or it is
possible her feelings might have been somewhat
different. As it was, she returned her caresses,
and complied with her request to sing some of
those songs that were favourites with
Koningsmarke
,
that she too might learn them, and sing
his heart away, as she expressed it in her
figurative
language. Though we firmly believe that
Christina was capable of feeling and exercising
as much generosity as ever fell to the lot of
woman
,
still we will not pretend to say, that her
sympathy for the Deer Eyes would have
continued
unshaken, or survived the shock of her
successful rivalship. As it was, however, it
happened that circumstances and events
occurred
about this time, that united the two
maidens in one common cause of jealousy and
apprehension.
The Indians among whom our hero and
heroine were now domesticated, had long been
on ill terms with a tribe dwelling on the banks
of the Ohio. There was a world of forest
between
them, it is true; but the hunting
excursions
of the savages, like the commercial
pursuits
of civilized men, often made tribes who
lived at a distance from each other, neighbours
and rivals. Some hundred years before, one of
the Ohio tribe had been killed, by an Indian of
the Susquehanna, and the vengeance of an
Indian
never sleeps or dies. The former, not long
previous to the period to which our history has
now arrived, had sent a petticoat to the latter,
accompanied by a most insulting message, that
they were women, and no warriorsand that
they would shortly come, and make them run
into the hollow trees like woodchucks. Such
banters were not uncommon among the savages,
and this message was considered a declaration of
war.
This war message, with the reflection which
i, containedt enraged the Rolling Thunder
and his warriors to such a degree, that they
resolved, with the approbation of the old men,
to convince the Ohio Indians they were not
women, by undertaking an expedition against
them forthwith. Preparatory to setting out,
however, they held a war dance.
This dance was accompanied by vocal and
instrumental music. The latter was produced
by a drum, made from a piece of hollow tree,
cut off so as to leave one end closed by the
wood, to hold water in the bottom. Over
the other end was drawn a piece of dried skin,
somewhat resembling parchment, and which,
when beaten upon with a stick, produced a
sound somewhat similar to a muffled-drum.
The party which was to go on this war
expedition
,
collected round an aged Indian, who now
began to sing, accompanying himself, by
striking upon the drum at regular intervals.
Each of these warriors, armed either with a
tomahawk, war-club, or spear, began to move
forward in concert towards the west, the
direction in which they were going to war.
When they had advanced about fifty or sixty
yards, they suddenly pointed their weapons, in
a furious and threatening manner, towards their
enemy, and, suddenly turning round, with a
terrible shout, danced back in concert as before.
They then began the war song, which was
sung by one person at a time, and consisted in
relating, in a sort of recititavo, the exploits of the
warrior himself, or what he was resolved to
perform in the expedition.
These promises are similar to the vows of
knight errantry; to shrink from their
performance
,
is considered an indelible disgrace, and
the warriors often sacrifice themselves rather
than fail. At the end of the relation of every
past exploit, the warrior struck a post with his
tomahawk, and those who had witnessed what
he related, testified to its truth by crying out
Huh! huh! On the contrary, if he related
any thing that was doubtful, they shook their
heads, and were perfectly silent. The whole
ceremony was concluded by a loud shout, and
many young men who had declined going to
the war, were so animated with the scene, that
they immediately signified their intention to join
the expedition.
They next proceeded to the ceremony of
adopting Lob Dotterel, whom it was their
intention
to admit into a participation of the
glories of the expedition; he having at length
gained their confidence, by his apparent
cheerfulness
,
and the readiness with which he
accomodated
himself to their habits and customs.
Koningsmarke was already considered as
belonging
to the tribe, in virtue of the widow's
choice.
The first part of this ceremony consisted in
pulling out all the hair, except what grows just
upon the crown of the head, which is left to be
dressed after the Indian fashion. As, however,
Lob Dotterel had no hair upon his head, they
proceeded, in lieu thereof, to infringe upon his
beard, which, by this time, had grown to a
considerable
length. In order to proceed the more
expeditiously, the person who officiated in this
matter ever and anon dipped his fingers into
some ashes, which was placed on a piece of bark,
VOL. II. 5
that he might take the better hold. The high
constable winced at every twitch, and the tears
rolled down his cheeks, to the great amusement
of the spectators. This being finished, they
proceeded to bore his nose and ears, into which
they hung certain rich copper rings, and jewels,
of unknown price, having cost them whole
kingdoms.
The high constable was then handed over to
three or four squaws, who led him to the river
side, bidding him plunge in head-foremost.
To this Lob Dotterel demurred, it being his
firm belief that they intended to drown him.
Upon this they laid hold of him, and, spite of
his sturdy resistance, dragged him into the
water, where they rubbed and scrubbed him
till he had scarcely any skin remaining. He
was then led to the council house, where he was
gorgeously decked with a new pair of leggings
and moccasins, beaded garters, porcupine
quills, hair dyed red, and, finally, accommodated
with a magnificent cap, made of the skin of a
buffalo's head, with the horns on. Then
seating him upon a bear skin, they gave him a
pipe, a tomahawk, and a pouch containing the
herb called killegenico, which they sometimes
used instead of tobacco, and materials for
striking fire. After this, they painted him in
their best style, and with all the colours they
had in their possession. This important
ceremony
being concluded, an aged chief arose and
made him a long speech, the substance of which
was as follows:
My sonYou have just had all the white
blood washed out of your body, and are now a
red chief. You are a great man, among a great
nation of warriors, and are from this day called
the Jumping Sturgeon, after a mighty Mingo
chief, who fell many moons ago fighting with
the Five Nations. My son, you are now of our
flesh and boneyour heart is our heartour
hearts are your heartsand as you fight in our
quarrels, so will we defend and protect you as
our son and brother!
The Jumping Sturgeon was then solemnly
introduced to his new kinsmen and kinswomen,
and invited to a great feast, where he ate boiled
corn with a wooden Iadle, and got mortal tipsy;
which last ceremony completed his initiation
into the Muskrat tribe. Early the next
morning
,
the painted warriors, accompanied by
Koningsmarke and the illustrious Jumping
Sturgeon, set forth upon their expedition to the
Ohio. Koningsmarke was followed by the
tears of Christina, the hopes of Aonetti, and the
encouragement of the widow, who comforted
him with the assurance, that if he conducted
himself like a brave warrior, she would, on his
return with a reasonable number of scalps, make
him sole lord of herself and her pewter work.
The warriors left the village at the dawning of
day, chanting their
marching song
, of which the
following is a careless sort of translation:
To battle! to battle!
Hurrah! to battle!
Let them not see us!
Let them not hear us!
Let them not fear us!
Till they shall feel us!
March! march!
Hush! hush! hush!
We're on the track;
Yon fire at the bush
Has warm'd their back!
Crawl on the earth,
Smother your breath,
Be silent as death!
Hush! hush! hush!
They are near, they are near!
'Tis their last, last day!
Their death song I hear;
And now it dies away!
So shall they die;
Ere they hear our war-cry,
Low shall they lie!
Hark! they are near!
Halt! level your guns!
Your tomahawks lift,
Swift as the deer runs
Swift, swift, swift!
Spare none, not one!
Let the hot blood run;
'Tis done'tis done!
They are dead!
Nevermore, nevermore,
Shall they lift their head;
Nevermore, nevermore,
Shall they wake from the dead!
The dead shall sleep,
While the living weep.
Let them mourn, mourn, mourn;
The dead, the dead will return
Nevermore, nevermore!
5*
CHAPTER IV.
Then straight they seiz'd their tomahawks, and fast (not very
slow)
They on their cruel business all silently did go,
Until they came to where the gentle stream did flow;
And then with blood did quickly run the silver Ohio.
Western Boatman's Ballad
.
The
war party, accompanied by
Koningsmarke
,
and the new chief, the Jumping
Sturgeon
,
dressed in the manner before described,
proceeded with great celerity on its march
towards
the Ohio. The savages never encumber
themselves with baggage, and generally fight in
a breech-cloth, leggings, and moccasins.
Although
there is no punishment but that of
disgrace
among them, they act in concert on their
war expeditions, and obey the orders of the chief
warrior with cheerfulness and punctuality. The
officers lay the plan of attack, and conduct the
operations until the battle commences, when every
man fights for himself, as if the victory
depended
on him alone. The order to advance or
retreat is generally given with a yell or a shout,
which is readily understood and obeyed. No
corporeal punishment was permitted or practised
among these tribes, either in peace or war,
except
in retaliation for similar outrages; and such
is their abhorrence of stripes, that they never
even chastise their children. On one occasion,
a chief beat his son, a boy of about ten years old,
during the absence of its mother, who, on her
return, was so indignant at the outrage, that
she took the boy with her, and departed, like
another Hagar, to the wilderness. Her
husband
traced her to a distant tribe, and, being
unable
to persuade her to return, remained with
her, and never joined his friends afterwards.
The only punishment inflicted on children, is
that of ducking, which accounts for a saying
among them, that their pappooses are always
better in winter than in summer, as they do not
mind a ducking in warm weather.
The party proceeded with that silence and
celerity, so characteristic of the red-men of the
western hemisphere, until they arrived within
about half a day's journey of the village
inhabited
by their enemies. Each man was then
forbidden
either to make a noise, or fire a gun,
and they remained lying on the ground, in the
thick woods, until dark, when they commenced
their march, with even greater caution and
swiftness than before. Their object was to effect
a complete surprise, by approaching the village
without even alarming the dogs, those watchful
guardians of the night. About two hours before
day they arrived at the little town. There was
not a fire burning, and every soul in it seemed
fast asleep. Not a sound was heard, except the
owl and the wolf, the former screaming, the
latter
howling his dismal notes at a distance. All
at once, and just before the Muskrats and
Mud-Turtles
had made their final dispositions for the
onset, a deep-mouthed hound yelled forth the
signal of alarm, which was answered by a
hundred
others in an instant.
At the sound of this well-known signal, the
sleeping warriors of the village started up, and,
seizing their arms, rushed out, while the
assailants
as suddenly came upon them. The village
fronted close on the river's bank, which
consisted
of two steps, or terraces, rising one above
the other, the uppermost receding fifteen or
twenty paces in the rear of the other. These
are generally denominated, at the present time,
the first and second banks of the rivers of the
west. Below ran the Ohio, with a deep and
somewhat rapid current.
An Indian battle is like one of Homer's, and
consists, for the most part, in a series of
personal
contests. Each one singles out his
adversary
,
and personal strength and prowess carry
the day. Dire was the yelling and shouting
which succeeded the alarm in the village. The
warriors of the Ohio, though taken by surprise,
fought manfully, and the various feats of arms
performed that morning, might throw into the
shade the splendid acts of tilt and tourney.
Among those who most distinguished themselves
on this occasion, was the Jumping Sturgeon,
who, making a virtue of necessity, and not
daring to run away, fought right valiantly, from
pure instinct, to save his life.
He was singled out by a tall Indian, just
about daylight, who, watching the moment
when he had discharged his gun, and before he
could load again, quickly advanced upon him
with his lifted tomahawk. The Sturgeon
clubbed
his musket, and both slowly approached,
cautiously eyeing each other. At length the
tall chief let fly his tomahawk, which his
adversary
watching, presented his buffalo cap with
such surprising judgment, that the weapon was
received upon one of the horns, and fell
innocuous
to the ground, doing the Sturgeon no
other damage than that of setting his head to
ringing bob-majors. Taking advantage,
however
,
of the temporary confusion created by this
said ringing, the tall Chief suddenly rushed
upon
the ci-devant high constable of Elsingburgh,
before he could make a blow with his musket,
and a mortal contest of skill and strength took
place. They fell, the tall Indian uppermost.
In this situation the Indian began to yell
horribly
,
and to feel for his knife; but, luckily for
the Jumping Sturgeon, his adversary wore,
by way of ornament, that day, a woman's apron,
which he had bought from a French trader,
and, in the hurry of surprise, tied on over his
knife. This prevented his getting it out as
quickly as he otherwise would have done, and
enabled Lob Dotterel, alias the Jumping
Sturgeon
,
to get one of his thumbs in his mouth.
This not only disabled one of the Indian's
hands, but embarrassed the operation of the
other, by the pain it occasioned. At length
the Indian got hold of the blade of his knife,
just below the haft, at the moment the other
found an opportunity to seize the handle,
chewing
the Indian's thumb all the while with great
vigour. As the Indian pulled the knife out of
the scabbard, Lob gave his thumb a terrible
screw between his teeth, and, at the same
moment
,
jerked the knife through his hand, cutting
the fingers to the bone. This disconcerted the
Indian, so that he relaxed his hold, and, by a
sudden effort, the other threw him off and
jumped
on his feet, just as the Indian also did the
same. The valiant Sturgeon, however,
continued
to hold fast the Indian's thumb between his
grinders with singular tenacity, and thus
maintained
a decided advantage over his antagonist,
to whose ribs he was at length enabled to
apply
the knife he had wrested from him. The
moment he felt the application, although it was
arrested by the said ribs, the Indian gave a yell,
and, with a violent start, drew part of his thumb
from betwixt the high constable's grinders, a
portion of it remaining behind, and retreated
with great precipitation, leaving his adversary
master of the field.
In the mean time the battle raged with great
fury in the village, and along the river's bank.
The Long Finne having, in the confusion of the
fight, followed a stout chief to the edge of the
first bank, the latter suddenly turned about,
seized, and drew him down on the beach, just
at the edge of the water, where was hid an
Indian boy, of about fourteen or fifteen years
of age. The Long Finne fell uppermost, but
during the struggle to keep him down, the
warrior said something to the Indian lad, who
ran up the bank like a deer, and almost
instantly
returned with a tomahawk. On perceiving
his approach, the large Indian put his arms
about Koningsmarke, and held him fast with all
his strength, while the other approached with
his lifted tomahawk. Thus pinioned, the youth
had no other resource but to watch the blow
of the Indian lad, which he opportunely arrested
by a kick, that knocked it from his grasp to
some distance. At this, the large Indian
uttered
an exclamation of contempt for the lad, who
immediately ran and picked up the tomahawk,
with which he again approached, but with great
caution, making various evolutions and
pretended
blows to deceive Koningsmarke, till he got
an opportunity to give the fatal one. Such,
however, was the vigilance and activity of
Koningsmarke, that he escaped this time, with
a wound in his arm, that failed in disabling him.
Perceiving the lad was returning again to
repeat
the blow, and being conscious that this
mode of warfare must result entirely to his
disadvantage, he made a sudden, violent, and
unexpected effort, escaped from the embrace
of the large Indian, gained his feet, seized his
musket, which he had dropped in falling down
the bank, and shot the Indian boy through the
heart, as he ran up a third time with his
tomahawk
.
The large Indian was now on his feet also,
and, suddenly seizing Koningsmarke by the leg,
pitched him heels over head into the water.
The same impulse carried the Indian down the
slippery bank after him; and now a desperate
and deadly struggle ensued, each straining
every nerve, and exerting every art and effort
to drown his adversary. Sometimes one would
be under, and sometimes the other, until, half
strangled, Koningsmarke had the good fortune
to seize the Indian by the only lock of hair he
wore on his head. By this means he was
enabled to force his head under water, and to
keep it there. This appeared to decide the
conflict. The efforts of the Indian seemed
gradually to relax, and to become apparently
unpurposed, as if he was fast sinking into
insensibility
.
Koningsmarke relaxed his grasp, and
discovered too late the wily stratagem. The
moment
he let go his hair the Indian was on his
feet again, and the contest was renewed, until,
as they by degrees pushed each other into
VOL. II. 6
the stream, they were borne by the current
beyond
their depth.
The instinct of self-preservation soon took
another direction. Both, as if actuated by one
impulse, now let go of each other, and made for
the shore, to seize the weapons which were lying
there, consisting of the tomahawk and two guns,
one of which, belonging to the Indian, had not
been discharged. The Indian was the better
swimmer of the two, and succeeded in gaining
the shore first. He ran to the loaded musket,
and almost at the same moment Koningsmarke
seized the tomahawk. The Indian raised the
gun, took a sure and deadly aim, and drew the
trigger. The gun snapped, and before the
savage
warrior could cock her again, the active
youth sprung upon him, and buried the
tomahawk
in his burning brain. He uttered a
horrible
yell; but even in the agonies of death,
remembering
the point of honour, which, among
the sons of the forest, consists in not leaving
their dead bodies in the hands of their enemies,
with a dying effort, he plunged into the stream,
where he was carried down the current, beyond
the reach of his enemies.
[1]
[1]
See Indian Wars.
By this time, the resistance of the Indian
villagers
had ceased. They had fought long
enough to enable their wives and children to
escape
beyond the river, and, having lost many of
their best warriors, besides others that were
wounded, the survivors took an opportunity, at
a well-known signal, to plunge into the river,
where, by dexterously diving at every discharge
of their enemies, and other evolutions, they
finally gained the opposite bank, and
disappeared
.
The victors then set fire to the village,
after plundering it; yelled, danced, feasted, and
sung, during the rest of the day, and at night
departed
in triumph to their homes.
But we ought not to omit mentioning, that,
after all, the success of the expedition of the
Muskrats and Mud-Turtles, was, in no small
degree
,
owing to that great medicine, Lob
Dotteral's
wig. The wig had been solemnly consigned
to the custody of the principal priest, or
conjurer
,
who clapped it on his head, and
accompanied
the party. When the battle commenced,
the conjurer danced, sung, cut capers, and
made such an intolerable noise, as to excite the
particular attention of one of the hostile chiefs,
who immediately advanced to silence him. The
conjurer retreatedthe warrior followedand,
coming up with him, seized his queue, which, to
his utter dismay, came off, leaving the bare pate
of the conjurer perfectly uninjured. The simple
warrior of the forest was dismayed at this
strange wonder; and it was soon whispered
about that the enemy was in possession of a
great medicine, which preserved their heads at
the expense of their hair. This dicouraged the
Ohio warriors, so that they did not fight with a
good heart afterwards. On such trifles do the
fate of villages, cities, and empires turn!
BOOK SIXTH.
CHAPTER I.
In
the course of our relaxations from the
labours
of this stupendous work, we the other
day, while lounging, as is our custom, about a
worthy bookseller's shop, were somewhat
amused by the criticisms of a couple of smart
young gentlemen on the new novel called the
Pioneers
. This they agreed in pronouncing
absolutely
vulgar
, a phrase than which none
other ever spoken or written, is so absolutely
fatal
to a book, in the
beau-monde
. The
smartest
of the young gentlemen maintained, with an
air of authority, that nearly all the characters of
that work were exceedingly low, the scenes and
incidents vulgar and common-place, and the
whole scope and tenor of it only fit to amuse and
edify the almanac readers, and connoisseurs in
dying speeches. The other not only assented
to this, but added likewise, that the tale was
destitute of interest, and totally wanting in those
high-wrought scenes of guilt or misery, which
give such a zest to the fashionable novels and
plays of the present age.
We confess we were somewhat startled at
these criticisms, especially as they were uttered
by two of the best dressed young fellows we
had seen in a long time, and our coat, to say
the truth, being considerably out of date, as well as
not a little threadbare, we felt our taste and
judgment somewhat overawed upon this
occasion
.
Retiring to our solitary lodging, we fell
upon attempting to account for this perhaps
fashionable opinion of a work we had read with
a pleasure and interest we felt almost ashamed to
avow in the presence of such well-dressed
judges, and which, till that moment, we had
considered as one of the most agreeable, as
well as natural pictures, of a state of society
peculiar to our country, that we had ever seen.
Our early life, too, had been passed in the midst
of rural scenes and rural society, and we could
bear testimony, on the authority of our own
experience
,
to the truth and nature of the author's
delineations, not only of character and manners,
but of seasons and scenery. Nay, we had
actually
known a Richard Jones, a village doctor,
an emigrant Frenchman, and a Squire Doolittle,
so like those introduced in the Pioneers, that
we could almost swear they were the same.
The gradual opening of the forest; the
introduction
of religious worship; the establishment
of courts of justice; the new-year sports and
festivals; and the progress of a new settlement
in all its features, from a state of nature to a
state of society, was so familiar to our
recollection
,
that the reading of this charming work
seemed actually to present before us the picture
hitherto only preserved in the memory of the
past.
Such being the case, we did not like to hear
those characters with whom we had been
accustomed
to associate, and those little incidents and
amusements which we had mingled in and
shared with such a relish, in the days of
boyhood
,
treated as low and vulgar. Sure we are,
that nature and simplicity are not the soils in
which such weeds are produced, and that the
manners and customs peculiar to a large
portion
of the human race, however they may differ
from those of a more artificial, not to say
corrupt
society, could not be justly branded with
the imputation of vulgarity.
Reflecting in retirement upon these matters,
we gradually fell into a train of reflections,
which, we believe, will in some measure account
for the condemnation bestowed upon one of our
favourite works, by the two fashionable young
gentlemen before mentioned. With certain
people, perhaps a large portion of those who
read novels, every thing which is not fashionable
is vulgar. A worthy farmer or mechanic, in a
clean white frock, and thick-soled shoes, is vulgar,
and therefore ought not to be introduced into a
genteel novel. The picture of a village group
dancing at a ball with might and main, must
also of necessity be vulgarbecause they are not
fashionably dressed, and do not understand the
mysteries of the cotillion, the allemande, the
partridge run, and the pigeon wing. In short,
with this class of readers and critics, every trait
of nature, and every exhibition of manners, or
dress, which does not come up to the standard
of fashionable elegance, is of necessity low and
vulgar. Compared, indeed, with a masquerade,
where all the mysteries of intrigue are practised,
or a fashionable ball, where nakedness stares us
in the face, the country ball may be perfectly
pure and innocent; still it must be low,
vulgar
,
nay, indecent, because the dancers are
not fashionable people, nor the decorations, the
music, and the steps, such as would be tolerated
by a genuine fashionable reader.
If we trace this vulgar error to its source, we
shall find it, in general, flowing from a false
opinion with regard to what constitutes real
refinement. In the general estimation,
refinement
,
or gentility, as opposed to vulgarity,
consists not in intellectual, or moral superiority,
but in outward manners and outward
splendours
,
in station, title, or wealth. This opinion
is the offspring of ignorance and vulgarity
combined; and, accordingly, we shall generally
find, that those who declaim most against a
book as vulgar, are the vulgar themselves, or,
at least, those pretended persons of refinement,
who graduate gentility according to the scale
just mentioned.
This impression, with respect to the
indissoluble
connexion between rank and title on one
hand, and refinement and gentility on the other,
is, perhaps, stronger in this country than
elsewhere
.
The imaginations of our youthful
readers
are early prepared by the books which are
generally put into their hands, to estimate the
refinement of persons according to their rank
and precedence, without regarding any other
criterion. This first impression remains
unimpaired
by the subsequent results of experience
and observation, because here we seldom or
never have an opportunity of correcting it, by
comparing the phantom of our imagination with
the real being whom we have been accustomed
to regard with such unqualified admiration.
Hence it is, that we are too apt to consider all the
actions of the higher orders of society, such as
kings and nobles, as perfectly genteel, and all
those of the lower degrees of people, as low and
vulgar. For this reason, too, it is absolutely
indispensable, that all the heroes, heroines, and
principal actors in our novels, and other works
of imagination, should be of a certain rank, in
order to escape the charge of vulgarity.
Unfortunately
for us, in this republican country,
we have neither kings nor nobility, to render our
literature genteel; and, consequently, the writer,
who, like the author of the Pioneers, confines
himself to the homely characters of this land of
equality, instead of introducing his readers to
levees and drawing-rooms, must remain subject
to the imputation of vulgarity, unless some
other standard can be found by which to
regulate
our opinions.
That there is such a standard, and that it is
VOL. II. 7
the only true one, is, we think, quite
incontrovertible
.
If we come fairly to put the question
to the test, it will be found that the essence of
vulgarity consists, more or less, in its
approaches
to what is actually vicious and indecent. It
is, in fact, much more nearly allied to morals
than to manners. Whatever approximates to
vice or indecency, or whatever leads the
imagination
,
by a natural connexion, to impressions
that are allied to either, is in itself, in a similar
degree, low and vulgar. Thus, when we read
of a King of Prussia getting intoxicated, and
beating his wife or his daughter, whatever
be the rank of the parties, the scene is as
intrinsically
vulgar, as if it were laid in the kitchen of
a palace, or the bar of a country tavern. So,
also, when, in a late popular work of the Great
Unknown, we are introduced to the court of a
king, and presented with pictures of morals the
most debauched and corrupt; with titled pimps,
and prositute duchesses; with a parent seeking
to compass the purposes of revenge, by placing
his only daughter in the power of a systematic
seducer and voluptuarynot the rank of the
actors, the splendours of a court, nor the false
glitter thrown around the whole by the genius
of the writer, can rescue the picture from the
imputation of vulgar indecency.
There is nothing of all this in the novel of
the Pioneers; neither exhibitions of high-born
or vulgar vice; and we think we may go so far
as to challenge the very best dressed of our
fashionable critics, to point out a scene or a
sentiment in that work, which, by any natural
association, will affect the imagination with
ideas of vulgar sensuality, or encourage a
violation
either of decency or morality. The
whole is pure, and unsoiled by any thing of the
kind; and, for ourselves, we are not afraid to
invite a comparison, with regard to this
essential
point of vulgarity, between the fireside of
the worthy Judge Temple, and the
beer-drinking
,
bear-baiting festivity of Kenilworth, or the
gross corruptions of the court of Charles the
Second, on both of which the most polished of
our readers banquet with such a refined
gusto
.
CHAPTER II.
Death! what is it?
It may be, 'tishum
It may be, 'tis not too.
The
Muskrat and Mud-Turtle warriors
returned
to their homes, bringing with them the
body of one of their chiefs, who had died of his
wounds on the second day of their journey. On
coming within hearing of the village, they
uttered
the death-howl, as was their custom, to
signify that they had lost one of their number.
This howl was perfectly understood by the wives
and mothers of the tribes, who rushed forth, with
dismal shrieks, to meet the train, each one not
knowing but that she had lost a son or a
husband
.
The body of the chief was then placed
on the shoulders of four of the most distinguished
warriors, and carried in procession to the
village
,
followed by the women and old men, the
former tearing their hair and uttering shrieks,
that echoed in the recesses of the forest. The
near relations of the deceased, however, followed
in profound silence, without exhibiting any marks
of affliction, it being considered unworthy of the
fallen chief for his kindred to weep over his fate.
They dressed the corpse, seated it on a mat, in
the posture to which the warrior was most
accustomed
when alive, and, sitting in a circle around
him, pronounced his funeral eulogy, by relating,
one by one, his exploits in battle, as well as those
of his ancestors. When these were finished, they
chanted a sort of funeral hymn, something to
the following effect, as nearly as it can be
rendered
from their native language:
Thou art here, and yet thou art gone;
Thou look'st as thou didst before;
Thou seemest a man, yet art none;
Thou art gone, to return no more.
Thou art, yet hast ceased to be;
Thy form and thy face appear;
Thou hast eyes, yet thou canst not see;
Thou hast ears, yet thou canst not hear.
Was it thou that talk'd with us erewhile?
Was it thou that went with us to fight?
Was it thou that shared battle and toil?
Was it thou that wert with us last night?
Yes! thou art here, and yet art away;
We see thee, and yet thou art not;
Thy life is like yesterday
And nothing remains but what's nought.
That something which made thee alive,
Where is itwhat was itwhere, where?
Twas a spiritthat still must survive
In the stars, or the sky, or the air.
To that spirit these honours we pay
That spirit which still hears us mourn
That something which ne'er shall decay,
That something which ne'er shall return.
The body of the red chief was then carried to
a hut prepared for the purpose, where it
remained
twenty-four hours, during which time the
tribes were engaged in feasting and dancing.
It was then carried to the grave, and buried,
sitting upright, with the face to the rising sun.
The friends and relatives threw the arms of the
dead warrior into the grave, with pipes,
tobacco
,
corn, and some pieces of wampum. The
grave was then closed, and the name of the
deceased
,
from that time, never uttered by either
his relatives or friends.
During the absence of Koningsmarke on the
war expedition, Christina and the Indian maid
did little else but ponder upon the dangers to
which he was exposed, and weep. They still
continued to love each other, although the secret
consciousness of rivalry, that gradually arose in
the bosom of each, prompted them to seek in
separate solitudes the indulgence of their
feelings
.
At times, Aonetti, after an absence of
several
hours, during which she wandered in the
woods, or along the bank of the river, would
return and weep on the bosom of Christina.
I love you, she would sayI love you; but
I know that you will be the cause of my
unhappiness
.
Some time or other you will go home,
and he will follow you. I shall then be left
alone; I shall lose my love, and there will be
none left even to pity me. Christina, safe in
the consciousness of her love being amply
returned
,
could afford to pity her rival; and she
did pity her, although she could not help
feeling
a certain awkward sensation, that
sometimes
caused her to return the caresses of the
Indian maid with a coldness that did not always
escape her notice. I tire you, would
Aonetti
exclaim, and retire to weep, and sing her
melancholy songs.
How long the mutual friendship of these two
innocent girls would have continued to withstand
the jealousies of love, it is impossible to tell, for
now a more formidable rival announced herself,
and diverted their mutual fears to one object.
The Indian widow, who had saved the life of
Koningsmarke by claiming him as her slave,
being smitten with the relation of his prowess in
the late battle, and his desperate encounter with
the two Indians, made known to the chiefs and
sages her intention of choosing him for a
husband
,
in the room of the one she had lost. This
proposal was received with approbation by all,
and preparations were made accordingly to
celebrate
the wedding with great pomp.
This news came like cold steel to the hearts of
the two young women, who could now fully
sympathize with each other. We shall now
mourn together, exclaimed Aonetti; we shall
both be wretched. Let us never part.
Koningsmarke
,
however disinclined to this match,
knew that if he discovered any unwillingness,
the insult would be felt by all the tribes, and
resented
with the most inflexible severity. He
therefore appeared highly sensible of the
happiness
and honour that awaited him, resolving, at
the same time, to lose not a moment in
concerting
with Christina the means of immediate
escape. Watching an opportunity, while she
was taking a solitary walk, and when she was
out of the reach of observation, he met her,
shedding tears alone by the side of the stream.
Christina, why do you weep? exclaimed
the youth. Christina, started, and hastily wiped
her eyes.
I have lost my home, my father, and all
that I loved, or that loved me. They have
forgotten
me too, or they would, ere this, have sought
me until I was found. I shall never see them
again. Is it any wonder that I weep?
Koningsmarke sat down by her side, took
her hand, and kissed it. Thou hast yet one
friend who will never desert thee. I have been
as the son of thy poor father; I will be as the
brother of his child; dearer and nearer than a
brother, if thou wilt give me leave.
Nearer and dearer thou canst not be,
replied
the gentle maid, withdrawing her hand.
The husband of another can be no nearer to
me than a brother. Thou wilt become a savage
in thy heart, and the parent of savages.
Nay, give me thy hand, he replied; I
swear by the gratitude I owe thy parent, by the
love I bear to thee, by all my hopes here and
beyond the grave, I will never leave thee, nor
forsake thee.
But thou wilt wed with another; and
andHere she hid her face with her hands,
and wept on his shoulder.
Hear me, Christina, cried the youth.
Were the stake and the fagot the alternative,
as I have reason to believe they are, I would not
wed any but thee. I sought you to tell you
soto concert means for our escapeto place
all on one castto live for thee, or to die with
thee. Darest thou flee with me to-night, and
risk the chance of being retaken and tortured at
the stake?
I can dare all, replied Christina, but
only
to see thee in the arms of another.
Koningsmarke held her to his breast for a
moment, with a feeling of unutterable tenderness
and gratitude, and then proceeded to explain
his plan for escaping. By occasionally
questioning
the savages, he had, without exciting
their suspicions, gained sufficient information,
as he supposed, to enable him to shape his
course, so as to strike the Delaware somewhere
in the vicinity of Elsingburgh and Coaquanock.
In pursuance of this plan, it was arranged, that,
while the Indians were feasting and carousing,
as they proposed to do that night, in honour of
his approaching nuptials, they should,
separately
,
as soon as the savages became
intoxicated
,
as was their custom, repair to the spot
where they now sat, and from thence pursue the
route that Koningsmarke supposed would lead
them the nearest way home.
Christina, said the youth, solemnly, I
cannot disguise from thee the toils thou wilt be
obliged to sustain, and the imminent danger of
our being overtaken, and tortured to death by
slow degrees. To me all this is nothingbut
for theeO God!to see thy snow-white skin
blackened in the firethy beauteous limbs the
sport of barbarous crueltythy precious blood
thy life, dearer than all this earthdearer
than heaven itselfwastingwasting away, by
dropsbreath by breath! Think ere thou shalt
decide. We must now separate, for fear of
observation
.
If, said Christina, the fatigue should bear
hard upon me, I will call to my aid the hope
that I shall meet my poor father ere long. If
we are overtaken, I will try not to despair; and
if we are placed together at the stake, I will
endeavour
to support the torture, by thy example,
and God's help.
Let us part, then, at once, replied the
youth; and Heaven prosper us this night.
Farewell. Should you chance to come hither
before me, wait, and be not afraid.
He kissed her cheek, and they returned,
separately
and at different times, to the village,
where, luckily, owing to the preparations for
the feast, which occupied the attention of all,
their absence had not been noticed.
CHAPTER III.
But he got down on t'other side,
And then they couldn't find him;
He ran fourteen miles in fifteen days,
And never look'd behind him.
The
night set in with rout and revelry, with
drinking, feasting, dancing, and shouts, that rent
the solitudes of the forest, and silenced the very
howlings of its hungry tenants. On these
occasions
,
it is usual to appoint persons to guard the
arms of the warriors, and keep themselves sober,
lest, in the mad excesses of drunkenness, the
barbarous
bacchanals should get possession of them,
and maim or murder one another.
Koningsmarke
,
at his particular request, was appointed
to this station, and Lob Dotterel, much against
the wishes of the youth, appointed his assistant.
The latter part of this arrangement embarrassed
Koningsmarke not a little, since the company of
the high constable of Elsingburgh rendered his
secret departure much more difficult, and he
VOL II. 8
did not dare to associate him in his plan of
escape, for fear of being betrayed.
As the night waned away, the scene of
savage
debauchery became more disgusting and
horrible. Some were howling an unintelligible
jargon, some rolling upon the earth like
drunken
swine, and others venting their excited
passions
in struggles, in which the madness of rage
was contrasted with the imbecility of beastly
intoxication
.
By degrees, one after another, they
sunk into a deep sleep, and all remained quiet.
Now was the eventful hour; but the presence
of Lob Dotterel, whom Koningsmarke had
vainly attempted to persuade to retire, and leave
him to watch alone, restrained his departure.
At length his patience became exhausted, and,
desiring that trusty officer to await his return a
few moments, he seized a gun, a tomahawk, and
a knife, having previously provided himself with
ammunition, and hastily departed.
Approaching the appointed spot, his heart
beat with uncontrollable apprehension at not
seeing Christina. He pronounced her name, and
he saw her white figure glide from behind a
tree. I thought you would never come, said
the trembling girl, as she panted in his arms.
To hold thee thus, whispered
Koningsmarke
,
is a happiness I could wish to last for
ever; but there is not a moment to be lost; let
us away, and God be our guide.
They struck into the forest, in the direction
marked out by the Long Finne, and had
proceeded about half a mile, when they thought
they heard footsteps behind them.
We are pursued, cried Christinawe
are lost.
Hush! whispered the youthperhaps it
is only some wild animal.
Heaven grant it may be, said Christina;
the wolf or the bear would be more welcome
than man.
They stopped, and listened in breathless
anxiety
.
Some one was heard trampling slowly
through the bushes, but whether man or beast
could not be discerned, as the moon had just
gone behind a cloud. Presently it emerged,
and they could see the figure of a man, at a
little
distance, watching them.
He must be quieted, cried Koningsmarke,
and, grasping his gun, advanced a few steps
towards
the figure.
Oh don't kill him, cried Christina;
perhaps
it is some friend.
I will know soon, he replied. Whoever
you are, speak, or die.
A friend, exclaimed the figure, in the
well-known
voice of honest Lob Dotterel. I watched
you, said the high constable, coming up, for
I observed you had something in hand. You
would not trust mebut I will be true as steel.
I mean to go with you, and share your fate, be
it what it may.
Thou art right welcome, Lob, quoth the
Long Finnebut every moment is a life to
one or all of us. Pass we on.
Alternately assisting, supporting, and
sometimes
carrying Christina, they passed rapidly on
their way, and, by the dawn of the morning,
had proceeded several miles, without meeting
with any interruption, except what nature
presented
.
Christina complained of fatigue, and
it was agreed to rest a little while, as they
supposed
the savages would sleep late that
morning
,
from the effects of the night's debauchery.
They accordingly sat down, and partook of
some dried venison, with which Koningsmarke
had supplied himself. In a few minutes they
heard the report of a gun, and, an instant after,
a wounded deer bounded past them, and fell dead
within a few yards of where they sat.
Koningsmarke
and the high constable started on
their feet at once, and stood ready for what
might follow. A few moments elapsed in this
state of suspense, when they observed two
Indians
,
armed with guns, approaching among the
trees. Quick as lightning, on observing the
two white-men, they darted each behind a
separate
tree, and, in almost as little time, the
others did the like, Koningsmarke snatching
Christina, and placing her behind him, under
cover of the tree.
Each party now remained, with their guns
cocked, watching till the exposure of some part
of the body of an adversary should give them
an opportunity of firing with effect. It has
been observed as a characteristic of the Indians,
that they never willingly come to a personal
contest with a white-man, or engage, in fact, in
any way, if they can avoid it, till some
advantage
presents itself. In this state of awful
suspense
,
Koningsmarke seized an opportunity to
motion to the high constable to follow his
example
.
He then took off his hat, and waved
it, as sportsmen do when they wish to decoy a
duck, alternately holding it out from behind the
tree, and snatching it back again. His
example
was promptly followed by Lob, with his
8*
buffalo cap. In the dense obscurity of
morning
,
in a deep forest, the two Indians were
deceived
by this stratagem, and, believing it to be
their antagonists thus peeping from behind their
covert, fired at the same instant. Both hat and
cap fell to the ground, and the two Indians
rushed
out, to use the tomahawk and scalping knife
on their fallen foes. As they came on
heedlessly
,
the two white-men took a deliberate aim, one
at each, and fired. The foremost fell dead; the
other bounded into the woods, uttering the howl
of pain and baffled rage, and disappeared.
Instantly loading their guns, they proceeded
on their journey, with the increased
apprehension
,
arising from the possibility that the
wounded savage might reach the village, and
alarm the warriors into immediate pursuit. In
passing by the dead body of the savage,
Christina
,
influenced and impelled by that fascination
which horror exercises over the human mind,
involuntarily turned to look at it, and
recognised
the features of Aonetti's brother, who she
now recollected had been out several days on a
hunting expedition. Poor Aonetti! she
mentally exclaimed, I was born to be your
baneand Christina at that moment forgot
her dangers, in thinking on the sufferings of her
kind-hearted sister.
Little occurred during the rest of the day,
except
increasing toils and difficulties in the march,
accompanied by increasing weariness. They
made a sort of litter of the branches, and, from
time to time, carried the weary girl upon their
shoulders. But their progress, slow at first,
became more slow as the day wore away, so
that night overtook them before they had
completed
twenty miles, according to their best
computation. The apprehension of pursuit, and
the danger of being overtaken, now yielded to
the demands of nature, and they were forced to
take some rest. They formed a rude shelter,
with the bark and branches of trees, for
Christina
,
while they laid down, one on each side of
the entrance. Weariness soon closed their eyes,
in spite of every motive for wakefulness. They
slept for several hours, and, probably, would
have slept till morning, had they not been
roused by the knell of death. Starting up, the
two white-men found themselves, at the same
instant
,
seized, and pinioned, with their hands
behind
their backs, before they could possibly
make any resistance.
The wretched Christina, whom the sight of
the savage group, and the sound of their dismal
yell, had struck into a temporary insensibility to
all around her, was seized, and, sometimes
dragged
,
sometimes carried, forced along with her
unfortunate
companions, towards the village from
whence they had attempted to escape. They
passed by the spot where the affray of the
morning
took place, and, pointing to the dead body
of the chief, whirled their tomahawks in the air,
over the heads of the two prisoners, giving them
to understand, at the same time, they had not
sacrificed them on the spot, because they meant
to torture them to death. Taking up the dead
body, they then marched in procession to the
village, chanting their death song by the way.
CHAPTER IV.
Theye tyed hymme toe ye fatale tree,
And lyghted uppe ye pyle,
And daune'd and sunge ryghte merrilie,
But he could'ent rayse a smyle.
On
arriving at the village, the procession was
met, according to custom, by a crowd of women
and children, who, amidst yells and shrieks,
denounced
the most bitter imprecations upon the
wretched fugitives, and were with difficulty
prevented from putting them to instant death.
Among the most violent of these, were the
widow
whom Koningsmarke was to have married,
and the mother of Aonetti; the one maddened
with jealous rage, the other, by the wild,
unrestrained
feelings of a savage mother, who had
lost her only son. The Indian maid did not
appear; whether detained by her own feelings,
or from some other cause, we cannot tell.
The savages, however wild, and free from the
ordinary restraints of civilized society, had yet
some forms of justice. A council of the chiefs
and old men was convened immediately, and
the case of the three captives taken into
consideration
.
After a grave debate, it was
unanimously
decided, that Koningsmarke and Lob
Dotterel, having both been solemnly adopted
into the tribe, and received as brothershaving
deserted them, and, in so doing, taken the life of
one of their bravest chiefs, should perish by the
torture that very day. With respect to the poor
white maid, there was at first some doubts as to
the degree of her participation in the guilt of
her companions. While balancing on her fate,
Aonetti rushed into the council room, with
dishevelled hair, and frantic gestures. She
threw herself, one by one, at the feet of the old
men, embraced their knees, and claimed of them
the pardon of her adopted sister. She is
innocent
,
cried the gentle maid; she only
sought to join her father. Which of you would
blame your daughter if she tried to escape from
the white-men, and come to you? I have lost
my only brother, and I am about to losebut
spare me my sister, that I may have some one to
love.
The tears and supplications of the Indian
maid fell upon the hard hearts of the old men,
and with some difficulty they consented that
Christina should be given in charge to her
adopted sister. The moment Aonetti heard
their decision, she ran, with the lightness of a
deer, to the hut where the three captives were
confined, and, making her way in, threw herself
into the arms of her poor Mimi.
Thou art safethou art spared, my sister,
she exclaimed. And our friends?panted
Christina, in almost unintelligible accents.
The Indian maid, as if struck with a sudden
pang of recollection, slowly turned, looked at
Koningsmarke, and then hid her face in the
bosom
of Christina. So expressive was her look
and action, that each of the wretched prisoners
understood what she could not speak.
'Tis well, said Koningsmarke; a life of
wandering, wretchedness, and poverty, in the
old world, is now to be brought to a miserable
end in the new. For myselfbut you, Oh!
you, my poor Christina, what will become of
you? Thy pure and innocent soul is redeemed;
but who shall redeem thy body from this woful
captivity?
Death, said Christina. Dost thou think
I can know of thy torturesof thy deathof
the furies tearing thy fleshof the flaming
brands being thrust into thy bodythe coals
Oh God!the live coals being sprinkled on thy
bare head, till madness, insensibility and death
relieve theedost thou think I can bear all this,
and live? No, noI shall die, if not with thee,
but a little while after thee.
But live, I beseech thee, Christina, said
Koningsmarke
,
for the sake of thy father, who
My father! I shall never see him more.
Perhaps ere this his gray hairs have been
brought in sorrow to the grave. Perhapsbut
it matters little to him or me. When you are
gone, who shall guide me homeward? who risk
his life to restore me to a parent, even if he
lives? No, noI shall never see him more!
I have nothing to live for, since you are lost to me.
My hours are numbered, replied
Koningsmarke
,
as he heard a distant shoutCome
hither, Christinaneareryet nearer. My
arms are pinioned, continued he, with a
melancholy
smileyou need not fear me. She
approached, and leaned her head on his
shoulder
.
God bless thee, my dear one, for never
blessing fell upon a more innocent head than
thine. In this last hour, tell me one thing.
Had we returned to Elsingburgh in safety
together
,
wouldst thou have joined thy fate with
mine in the presence of heaven? wouldst thou
have tried to forget the long-past time, and lived
only in the future?
In the presence of Heaven, I would,
replied
ChristinaI would, had the shade of
my mother haunted our bridal bed. My love
and my gratitude should have conquered my
remembrance
of the errors of thy youth.
Then seal it with a last kiss; and now,
come what will, by the blessing of God, I stand
prepared for whatsoever may happen. A little
while, and we shall meet againor I have been
dreaming all my life.
Aonetti, continued he, to the Indian maid,
who had stood in a distant corner, with her face
from them, weepingAonetti, come hither.
She approached. Take your sister's hand,
and promise to be kind to her when I am gone.
The Indian maid shook her head. What!
will you not promise me this, Aonetti?
She must be kind to me, replied the Indian
maid, for I shall be more wretched than Mimi.
She will remember thy love, but I shall only
remember
thy death.
But you will promise to be kind to her?
repeated Koningsmarke.
VOL. II. 9
Yes, yes, if I can remember any one but
thee and myself, said Aonetti.
At that moment the door flew open with
violence
,
and a crowd rushed in. They seized
Koningsmarke and the poor high constable,
who, ever since his recapture, had been in a
sort of stupor, and hurried them towards the
river side, where, on a little level greensward,
were placed two stakes, around which, at a
distance
of three or four paces, were placed piles
of wood. In their progress to the funeral
pyres, Koningsmarke and Lob Dotterel were
harassed and beaten with sticks by the women
and boys, who vented their rage in every
possible
variety of injury and insult. Among these,
the widow, whose affections had been treated
with such contemptuous ingratitude, was the
most conspicuous. With dishevelled hair, and
ferocious gestures, she followed him step by
step, taunting him with the beauties of his
white woman, alarming his fears by threats of
terrible vengeance on poor Christina, and
triumphing in the prospect of his approaching
tortures.
Look! cried the virago; yonder is the
stake and the pile; I shall hear thee groanI
shall see the hot brands, the live coals scorch
theeI shall see the knife and the tomahawk
enter thy fleshI shall see thy limbs tremble
like a womanand I shall laugh, when the
drops of agony roll down thy forehead.
Arrived at the stake, they proceeded to strip
the two victims, with the exception of their
waists, and to paint them black with charcoal
and grease. They were then fastened to the
stake, and, all being ready, the horrible
ceremony
was about to begin, when Aonetti came
running franticly to the spot. Christina had
sunk into a temporary insensibility, when the
crowd carried off Koningsmarke, and, on
coming to herself, besought Aonetti to make
one last effort to reprieve the unfortunate youth.
It is too late now, said the Indian maid
'tis too late; they will spurn me; they will
beat me away. They are mad with rage and
cruelty.
Then I will go, hastily exclaimed
Christina
,
starting up at the same time. Perhaps
they will pity my sorrows.
Pity! said Aonetti, despondinglyPity!
they know it not. If you seek to stop them,
they will tear you to pieces.
No matterno mattermy heart is torn to
pieces already. Let them tear my flesh, I care
not. Come, come'twill be too late.
'Tis too late alreadythe smoke begins to
risenothing can save him now.
But we can die too. Let us golet us go,
or I shall go mad.
He killed my brother, and he loves not
me, said Aonetti; yet I will make one more
effort, even though they do spurn me. Stay
here, my sister, and I will soon return.
Christina
had again sunk into a temporary
insensibility
,
which prevented her following.
As the Indian maid approached, she called
upon them to stay a moment, ere they lighted
the piles. The noise was hushed, by the
command of some of the sages who were
presiding at this solemn ceremony, for so it was
reckoned by the Indians. Aonetti then urged
every motive she could think of, to induce them
to spare the two victims. She stated the
rewards
that would be given, if they carried them
to the
Big Hats
at Coaquanock, and the
terrible
vengeance the white-men would take, when
they heard of the sacrifice of their brothers.
If you spare them, said she, their friends
will ransom them with great kegs of spirits, with
tobacco pipes, powder, shot, and every thing
you want. If you put them to death, the
white-men
will find you out one day or other, and
then wo to the red-men of the forestwo to
their wives and their childrento themselves
and their posterity. Every drop of blood you
shed this day, I prophecy, will be repaid with
rivers of blood. Spare these white-men, and
let the tall youth be unto me the brother I have
lost.
Thou meanest a husband, exclaimed the
Indian widow, who had listened with horrible
impatience to Aonetti's arguments. Thou
wouldst take to thy arms the white-man whose
hands are red with the blood of thine only
brother
!
Shame of thy sex, and shame of the
Indian
name! I know thee and thy wishes; I have
watched thy tears and thy sighs, thy lonely
rambles, thy words, nay, thy very looks. I
demand that the shade of my murdered
husband
,
of this wretched girl's murdered brother,
of all those who have fallen victims to the cursed
arts and bloody policy of the white-men, be
appeased
,
by the sacrifice of these deserters from
their adopted tribe. Else, may the wrath of the
Great Spirit confound our tribe, and his
malediction
sweep you from the earth.
These words were answered by a shout of
9*
approbation from the crowd, and followed by
the acquiescence of the old men present, who
again decided that the ceremony should
proceed
.
It was now one of those bright, clear,
still afternoons, which are common in the month
of September. There was not a breath of air
to curl the river, or wave the leaves of the
forest
,
nor a cloud to be seen in the sky. At this
moment, when they were about to set fire to the
funeral pile, a sudden burst of thunder, loud and
sharp, arrested them. The eyes of all were
turned upwards, with a sensation of awe and
surprise. From the most enlightened
philosopher
,
down to the most ignorant savage;
from man, to the birds of the air, the beasts of
the field, it would seem there is something in the
great operations of nature, such as tempests,
earthquakes, and thunder storms, that excites
the apprehensions, or at least the awe, of
both reason and instinct. It is not alone a fear
of the effects of these terrible demonstrations of
irresistible power, that causes this cowering or
elevation of the faculties; it is, that by a direct
operation, the mind is led to a contemplation of
an infinite Being, by witnessing the display of
infinite power.
There was not a cloud to be seen in the sky,
and this circumstance occasioned the thunder
clap to have the appearance of something
altogether
supernatural. The flends who carried
the lighted brands to fire the funeral pyres,
involuntarily
paused, and the Indian maid, taking
advantage of the moment, cried out:
Hark! the Great Spirit bears testimony
against this deed. You heard his voice in the
air. It came not from the clouds, for there is
not a cloud in the skies. It is the great Master
of life that cries out from above against his
people that have offended him. In his name I
command you to stopin his name I command
you to spare these white-men!
The figure of the little Indian maid appeared
to dilate with the dignity of inspiration. Her
eyes were turned in eager gaze towards the
heavens, and she seemed as if she actually saw
the visible form of the Being whose judgment
she had invoked. The frantic rage of the
women
and boys yielded to the influence of a
superstitious
awe. The elders consulted together
for a moment, and then decided that the
ceremony
should be suspended till they could offer
a sacrifice, and ascertain the will of the Great
Spirit. The crowd then dispersed, disappointed,
yet not daring to complain; and Koningsmarke,
with his companion, were again remanded to
the place whence they came, after being
washed, and permission given to dress
themselves
.
Here they were left, guarded without
by sentinels, to await the result of the appeal to
the Great Spirit.
CHAPTER V.
Farewell, farewell, my bonny maid;
Whom I no more shall see;
I die, but I am not afraid,
Because I die for thee.
Then came Shadrach, Meshech, and Abednego.
Christina
passed the interval between the
departure and return of the Indian maid, in that
state of vague and indefinite horror, in which the
human mind, as it were, takes refuge from its
miseries. The events of the two preceding
days had so harassed her mind, and worn down
her strength, as to produce that state of moral
and physical weakness, which diminishes the
acuteness of suffering, by its very incapacity of
resistance. The past, the present, and the
future
,
offered themselves to her mind, rather
as horrible visions than as cruel realities; and
when she saw the return of Koningsmarke, she
hardly comprehended the fact, that he had at
least received a temporary reprieve. By
degrees
,
however, the agitation of her mind
yielded
to an irresistible drowsiness, and, supported
in the arms of Aonetti, she sunk into a long and
quiet sleep, from which she awoke perfectly
restored
to a distinct comprehension of her
present
situation.
In the mean time, the old men of the tribes
had called their principal priest or conjurer, to
take the usual measures for ascertaining the will
of the Great Spirit, in relation to the fate of
the two white-men. A fire was kindled on the
greensward, around which
Mackate Ockola
, or
the Black Gown, danced, and howled, and
indulged
in every possible contortion of visage,
until he had exhausted his strength, and worked
up his mind into a species of real, or imaginary,
or pretended inspiration. From this he
gradually
fell into a trance, which lasted about half
an hour, during which time the assembled old
men sat in a profound and awful silence. At
length
Mackate Ockola
seemed to awake, and
to remain for a while, staring around, as if
unconscious
of his situation. Recovering by
degrees
,
he started upon his feet, and cried out in
a hollow voiceI have seen the Great Spirit.
He came to me in a dream, in the form of a
great eagle, and said, Listen to me, Mackate
Ockola, and hear what I will. Many moons
shall not appear and pass away, ere the
white-men
will grow into numbers like the leaves on
the trees. As they grow in numbers, my
people
will decay and disappear. They will go
out like the embers of an almost extinguished
fire, until they have no habitations but their
graves; and even in these they will not be
suffered
to rest, for the white-men, not content
with what grows on the surface of the earth, will
tear up her bosom, and lay your bones
bleaching
in the sun and the wind, in search of riches
and food. The deer will disappear from your
forests; the fishes will be shut out from your
streams, by these people, who build dams like
the beavers; and you will starve on your
hunting
grounds. You cannot avoid your destiny,
but you may delay it, by destroying those,
whose children, if they live, will destroy yours.
Go and tell my people, that for every drop of the
white-man's blood they shall spare, their
children
and their children's children will pay a
thousand-fold.
This cruel message, the fabrication of the
priest, decided the fate of Koningsmarke and the
luckless high constable of Elsingburgh. It is
impossible for us to tell what were the motives
of Mackate Ockola, in thus urging the death of
the two captives. But it may be observed here,
that the early systems of religion, in all nations
and countries with which we have any
acquaintance
,
are more or less tinged with blood.
Everywhere the priests have demanded victims
to propitiate their bloody deities, and
everywhere
the altars have been funeral pyres. The
Mexican priests demanded human sacrifices;
in other places, the blood of animals sufficed;
and even among the Bramins, whose religion
forbids the shedding of the blood of animals,
human victims are encourged by the priests,
to expose themselves to every species of torture
at the feast of the Juggernaut, and to offer up
their lives on the funeral pile. Superstition
and fanaticism, in truth, delight in blood; and
in all ages and nations their steps may be
traced by that infallible mark. It was reserved
for the mild and merciful system of religion
under which we live, to banish all atonements of
blood, all sacrifices of animals; to make the
offerings of the heart a substitute for the torture
of victims; and, had not the love of wealth, the
lust of power, and the pride of opinion, marred
the beautiful system, so as to wrest its precepts
to the ourposes of avarice and ambition, it had
come down to us, even to this day, without its
snow-white surplice being sprinkled with the
blood of a single victim. But here, alas!
as in all preceding systems of faith, the
avarice
,
the ambition, the bigotry, and the pride
of opinion, which seem the besetting sins
of man, have exercised their pernicious
influence
,
and, first and last, caused the shedding
of more blood than has ever smoked upon all the
Pagan altars of the world. Thus has the purest,
the most mild, and the most perfect system of
humanity ever propounded to mankind, been
impiously made the pretext for every species of
cruelty and bloodshed; and, what is perhaps
still more to be lamented, its divine precept of
love to all our fellow creatures, converted into
a warrant, not to say a duty, to hate all those
who do not think and believe exactly like
ourselves
.
But to return from this digression, which we
hope the reader will pardon. Koningsmarke and
his companions in affliction remained ignorant
of the decision we have just recorded. We will
not say happily ignorant, since, perhaps, actual
certainty would have been preferable to the
doubts which harassed their minds. When
Christina awoke from her long sleep, with mind
VOL. II. 10
and body both invigorated, it was some
moments
before she came to a full consciousness of
her situation. Where am I? exclaimed she.
In the arms of thy sister, whispered the
Indian
maid.
Christina looked around the hut. By the
dim light of an almost extinguished fire, she
observed two figures in a sitting posture, leaning
against the wall. Who is that? whispered
she to Aonetti.
It is
he
, replied the Indian maid.
Oh God! they have spared him then,
shrieked poor Christina; my sister has
prevailed
,
and he is safe!
Safe till to-morrow, replied the other.
No longer?
No longer. To-morrow I know not what
may become of them. Our priest is to decide,
and he never leans to mercy.
Koningsmarke, observing that Christina was
awake, called out to her
Christina! wilt thou not come near me?
Come thou to me, replied she, preserving,
even in this trying moment, that sentiment of
delicate propriety which never forsakes a
virtuous
female.
I cannotI am fastened to this spot.
Christina approached, and, by the light of
the fire, perceived he was bound to one of the
posts that supported the simple edifice.
He asks not for me, thought Aonetti, and
wept in secret.
In this, which each seemed to have a
presentiment
was the last hour they should spend
together
,
for the signs of day now began to
appear
,
Koningsmarke and Christina preserved
towards
each other a deep solemnity of
deportment
,
from which all the little outward
endearments
of love were banished.
I have a presentiment, said
Koningsmarke
,
that thou wilt yet live to be received
to the arms of thy father.
To the arms of my Heavenly Father,
returned
Christina, for none other shall I ever
behold
.
If the sun sees thee die this morn at its
rising
,
it will set at night on my breathless corse.
Nay, returned Koningsmarke, say not
so, my best love. Thou hast motives to live,
and duties to perform, when I am gone. Thou
hast known me but a little while; thy father
thou hast known from the first breath of that
life which he gave thee. Return the blessing,
and live for him.
I shall never see him more, cried
Christina
.
When I am gone, continued the other,
and when you see your father, tell him that I
remembered his kindness, even when the flaming
brand was pointed at my naked throat, and the
coals of fire were about being poured on my
uncovered head. Tell him that I protected
you while I couldthat I exposed my life to
preserve yoursand that I perished in a last
effort to restore you to his arms. Should he
ever know what thou knowest, he will forgive
me, as thou hast done, for the sake of what I
have done and tried to do for thee. Wilt thou
bear him this message from me, Christina?
Christina could not answer, for her emotions
almost stopped her breath. Her eyes were dry,
but her heart wept tears of blood. For a while
she remained insensible in his arms. At that
moment the door of the hut was opened, it being
now broad daylight, and Koningsmarke, with
his unfortunate companion, whose stupor
became
every hour more profound, were untied
from the post, and conducted out of the hut.
The youth motioned to Aonetti, and, pressing
the inanimate form of Christina to his heart, as
for the last time, imprinted a kiss upon her cold
forehead, and gently gave her to the arms of
the Indian maid.
Be good to thy sister, whispered he.
I willbut say good-by to poor Aonetti.
Good-byand may thy God and mine
bless thee, replied Koningsmarke, and hastily
left the place without looking back.
The same preparations we described on the
preceding day were renewed, and the two
captives
fastened to the stake. The brands were
again lighted, the knife and the tomahawk
lifted to begin their work, and the revengeful
barbarians standing on tiptoe to enter on the
bloody business. But again Providence
interposed
.
All at once the hands of the
brand-bearers
were arrested, and the eyes of every one
turned in a direction towards the river, along
whose banks appeared a train of white-men,
bearing a white flag, the universal emblem of
peace and good-will. As they came nearer, the
stiff and stately form of Shadrach Moneypenny,
followed by eight or ten others, dressed in
broad-brimmed hats, with their arms folded upon
their bosoms, were distinguished, walking with
slow and steady pace towards the spot occupied
by the old men of the tribes. They were
accompanied
by others, bearing a variety of
10*
articles of Indian trade. They came in peace,
and they were received in peace by the sons of
the shade. The policy of William Penn with
regard to the Indians, can never be sufficiently
praised or admired. From his first arrival at
Coaquanock, to the period of his final
departure
,
he preserved peace with the ancient
proprietors of the soil and the game, by the
simple expedient of dealing with them as if
they were his equals. He bought their lands
at a price equivalent to the advantages they
yielded to the original occupants; restrained
his people from all encroachments upon those
the Indians thought proper to retain; and so
inviolably kept sacred the stipulations of his
first purchase, that it has been said, with equal
truth and bitterness, that it was the only
treaty not ratified by oaths, and the only one
that was never violated.
By these means, and by the peaceful
deportment
of his people on all occasions, William
Penn acquired and retained the confidence and
good-will of the Indians, in a degree of which
there are few examples. Indeed we may safely
say, that none, without resorting to the agency
of superstition or fear, ever attained so great an
influence over the violent, capricious, and
intractable
tempers of the savages of North
America; a singular race, with whom all
attempts
at civilization only seem to destroy their
good qualities, and convert them from
barbarians
into beasts.
The Big Hats, as the Indians called them,
were not unknown to some of the old men of the
tribes, who had treated and traded with them, at
Coaquanock, and who now received Shadrach
and his suite as old acquaintances. By means of
an interpreter, they entered on business
forthwith
.
Thou comest as a friend, said Ollentangi.
Yea, verily, quoth Shadrach; I come
from William Penn, who is the friend of all
mankind, of all countries and colours. He hath
heard thou hast two white-men, and a maiden
with them, taken at the burning of Elsingburgh.
Verily, that was a bad act, sachems. What had
they done unto thee, that thou shouldst set fire
to their houses, and carry their women and
children into captivity? had they not
buried
the hatchet and smoked the calumet with
thy tribe?
True, replied Ollentangi, but they had
killed our game, and shut out the fish from our
rivers, therefore we made war upon them.
Yea, verily, quoth Shadrach, who, by the
way, loved a controversy in a peaceable way,
almost as well as William Penn himselfYea,
verily, but the wild beasts of the forest belong
to any body; they are given to all that
can catch them. Neither are the fish thine,
since they swim through all parts of the great
seas, and wherever they will. Until thou shalt
catch them they are not thine.
True, replied Ollentangi, with infinite
gravity
,
but if the white-man prevents the fish
from coming to us, how can we catch them?
We shall starve in the mean while.
Verily, quoth Shadrach, I am fain to
confess the truth of thy words. There is no
argument
so strong as necessity. But still thou
shouldst not have made war against them for
this. Thou shouldst have gone to law, and,
peradventure, obliged them in a peaceable
manner
to break down the obstructions that did
prevent
the fish from passing upwards.
True, brother, rejoined Ollentangiwe
have heard something of that same law. It is
a contest of talking, and he that talks the
longest
wins the cause. Now you white-men can
out-talk us, and we can beat you in fighting.
Should we not be great fools, to choose the
former
mode of deciding our differences?
Yea, I must needs confess of a truth there is
some little shadow, as it were, a small modicum
of a glimmer of carnal reason in what thou
sayest. But verily I must not pretermit the
business of my mission, for the two captives are
kept all this while in a parlous condition. Art
thou ready to hear me in the spirit of peace?
Say onin the spirit of peace, replied
Ollentangi.
In the spirit of peace, then, quoth
Shadrach
,
raising himself on tiptoe, and cocking his
beaver, in the spirit of peace I come from the
good William Penn, who is thy friend in the
gospel, (and, verily, considering thy Pagan
state, out of the gospel likewise,) to say unto
thee thus wise: ListenI speak his words, and
not mine own.
William Penn hath learned, by means of
the (I may say) providential agency of a certain
profane tie-wig, (which, judging from the bald
pate of yon captive, must have appertained unto
him,) that the people, (meaning thee,) calling
themselves (as I may say, idly and profanely,)
the Muskrats and Mud-Turtles, are in possession
of certain two white-men (who, I am inclined
to believe, must be those tied to the stake close
by,) together, with a young maiden, daughter
to him who calleth himself the Heer Piper, (who
I must aver to be somewhat of an uncourteous
little man,) all three carried away captives from
the village of Elsingburgh. Now thus saith
William Penn: inasmuch as thou lovest good
watch-coats, he hath sent thee a score of these;
and inasmuch as thou lovest glass beads, and
other pernicious vanities of the flesh, (to say
nothing of the devil,) he hath sent thee ten
strings of these, wherewith to pamper the pride
of thy ears and noses; and inasmuch as thou
lovest tobacco, he hath sent thee threescore and
ten tin tobacco boxes, filled with that egregious
puffardo, called tobacco, (which, by the way,
I should hold in singular abomination, were it
not that it was hated by James, called the First,
that enemy to the saints.) For all which good
things, William Penn, as aforesaid, asketh
nothing
but the freedom of the three aforesaid
captives, that they may be delivered to their
friends.
Brother, quoth an old Indian, brother,
thou hast forgotten one part of William Penn's
message.
Yea, verily! replied Shadrach, what is
that?
It runneth thus, replied the Indian: And
inasmuch as thou lovest strong liquors, William
Penn hath sent thee two kegs of brandy,
wherewith to get right merry, and drink his
health.
Of a certainty, Muskrat, said Shadrach,
the truth is not in thee, for my message
hath nothing of such import appertaining to its
contents. William Penn dealeth not in rum,
brandy, or any other liquid abominations;
neiher
is he moved by any kind of spirit but that of
righteousness. But do ye straightway consult
ogether what answer I am to bear with me to
Coaquanock.
While the old men were consulting, Shadrach,
like a redoubtable plenipotentiary, caused the
watch coats, the glass beads, and the tobacco
boxes, to be ostentatiously displayed before the
longing eyes of the savages. The more they
looked, the more they waxed willing to
surrender
the captives, until at length Ollentangi
announced
to Shadrach, that they had no objection
to make the exchange, provided the widow,
who, as affianced to Koningsmarke, ought to
have a voice in his disposal, gave her consent.
But that notable virago, on being applied to,
flatly refused to sanction the treaty, and loudly
demanded the sacrifice of her ungrateful slave,
who had scorned her love, and forsaken her for
a whey-faced girl. Hereupon, Shadrach
Moneypenny
drew from his pouch a beautiful
string of sky-blue glass beads, which he
courteously
and gallantly tied about the neck of the
inexorable widow. He then produced a small
looking glass, which he held up before her,
that she might see herself thus apparelled,
making
her understand, at the same time, that these
things should be hers, provided she would
consent
to the reprieve of Koningsmarke. The
widow's heart was melted; she acquiesced in
the freedom of her affianced husband, and
departed
,
with a delighted heart, to contemplate
herself and her beads in her looking-glass.
No obstacle now remained to the release of
the two captives, who had listened to this
negotiation
with a breathless solicitude. They were
accordingly untied, washed, dressed, and
conducted
to the hut where we left Christina and
the Indian maid. The meeting between the
former and Koningsmarke, after such a parting
as we have described, was accompanied by
feelings that, though repressed by the presence
of the strangers, may be easily imagined.
Immediate
preparations were made for their
departure
,
lest the savages might repent their
bargain
,
after the novelty of possessing the coats,
beads, and tin boxes had passed away. Poor
Aonetti
was quite broken hearted at the parting with
her sister. She would have accompanied her,
but was prevented by her mother and friends.
Christina, too, could not, in the midst of the
new visions of joyous hope that danced before
her fancy, forget the gentle kindnesses, the
sisterly
affection of the little Deer Eyes. But a
secret feeling which she could not repress,
prevented
her encouraging the idea of Aonetti
accompanying
her to Elsingburgh. She
therefore
embraced her with tears, kissed her cheek,
and bade her sometimes remember her sister
Mimi. Ah! replied the artless maid, I
know I should, I ought to be happy, for you and
he
will be happy; but I shall be so miserable
when you are gone, that I shall soon die.I
could have borne his death, for we would have
mourned together; but I cannot survive his
departure
with you. Shadrach now summoned
his troop, and the procession departed from the
village, to return no more.
Before we conclude this book, it may be
proper
VOL. II. 11
to explain the causes which led to the
release
of our three captives. The circumstance
may serve to show on what trifling chances the
fate of individuals sometimes turns. The
Indian
belonging to the village on the Ohio,
destroyed
,
as we have related, by the Muskrats
and Mud-Turtles, who had obtained possession
of Lob Dotterel's wig, some time afterwards
visited Coaquanock, and carried that great
medicine
with him. As may naturally be supposed,
such an appendage excited no little curiosity on
the part of the Big Hats; and a correspondent
of the Royal Society of England, just then
established
,
set about preparing a memoir upon
the subject, wherein he intended to prove, that
some of the Indian tribes wore wigs.
Subsequent
inquiry, however, fully elucidated the
phenomenon, and the learned person threw his
memoir into the fire. The wig made no little
noise in the new world, insomuch that some of
the villagers occasionally neglected their own
affairs, to talk on the subject. But the good
William Penn, putting all the circumstances
together
,
had little doubt that the wig was
connected
with the fate of the captives of
Elsingburgh
.
With that humanity which characterized
all his actions, he lost no time in preparing the
mission of Shadrach Moneypenny, which
happily
resulted in the redemption of our three
captives, as we have just related.
We must not omit mentioning, that the likely
fellow, Cupid, of whom we have of late said
nothing, because we had nothing to say, also
accompanied Shadrach, somewhat against his
will. He had lived a life of perfect freedom
and idleness, two things equally dear to his
condition
and colour, the savages permitting him to
lounge about, and sun himself as much as he
pleased. Cupid, in the elevation of his heart,
at thus seeing himself turned gentleman, and
his old enemy, Lob Dotterel, obliged to labour
for his behoof, one day incautiously let out a
secret, which he might better have kept, as it
led to consequences that finally involved not
only himself in destruction, but caused also the
death of his grandmother, the sybil of the
Frizzled Head.
Omitting, at least for the present, the
principal
incidents which befel Shadrach and his
party on their return to Coaquanock, we shall
merely remark, that honest Lob Dotterel
continued
,
during the whole journey,
stupified
with the vicissitudes he had
encountered
within a short time past. Nor did he
exhibit
any sign of consciousness till, on his
arrival
at this renowned settlement, his wrath was
suddenly enkindled, at seeing a knot of little
children making dirt pies in the middle of the
street. Hereupon the soul of the high
constable
of Elsingburgh, suddenly awaked
to a perception of passing objects; and he
threatened roundly to commit the juvenile
offenders
.
BOOK SEVENTH.
CHAPTER I.
It
is quite impossible for our readers to
conceive
a tenth part of the yearnings we have
endured
in the course of this work, in consequence
of not having been able, without committing
some unpardonable violence, to introduce to
their acquaintance and familiarity a single titled
person, for the purpose of giving dignity to
distress
,
and point to our jokes. The only man of
high rank, the honour of whose intimacy we
enjoyed
in our travels abroad, was a certain Duke
Humphrey, with whom we occasionally dined.
But as, to say the truth, we can't declaim much in
favour of his dinners or his wine, we will not
trouble our readers with an introduction; for, to
be candid with them, his notice would confer no
great honour, the said Duke being generally
surrounded
by a set of hungry authors, who for the
most part did not know where else to get a dinner.
This incapacity we consider a most serious
misfortune, inasmuch as novel writers, we mean
those who aspire to the notice and approbation
of the
beau monde
, may be said to be in the
predicament
of certain insignificant people, who
derive
their sole consequence from the company
they affect to keep, and to which they take
occasion
to introduce their friends. These aforesaid
persons, by affecting great intimacy with people
of rank, retailing their jokes, and sometimes
pretending
to disclose their most secret thoughts,
acquire the reputation of high
ton
, and greatly
excite the wonder and admiration of the vulgar.
We recollect a good-natured, good-for-nothing
sort of fellow of this kind, who made it his sole
business to introduce a certain great man, with
whom he was a kind of hanger-on, to all his
little
acquaintance. By this means he managed to
attain to great consequence, in a certain circle,
and got numerous invitations to dinner parties.
Nay, he at last turned his great man to so good
an account, that a city heiress actually was
induced to marry him, solely on the score of
having
it announced in the papers, that his great
VOL II. 12
friend was at the wedding and gave away the
bride.
We have endeavoured to make all the amends
possible for the absence of what constitutes the
quintessence of the interest arising from works
of imagination by the introduction of persons
coming as near to kings and nobility, as any that
are the natural product of our country. But,
after all, we are obliged to confess, that Indian
monarchs, provincial governors, nay, our good
friend William Penn himself, though the
illustrious
founder of what may almost be
called
an empire, are but poor substitutes for
dukes and earls, whose very titles tickle the
fancy so delightfully, that the reader seems all
the while swimming in an ocean of peacock's
feathers.
True it is, that we have a knightnot a knight
errant, but a genuine knight of James the First's
own dubbing, in reserve, as a sort of
bonne bouche
for the last, in order to leave an agreeable
impression
on the palate of the reader's imagination.
But, after all, what is a mere knight? they are so
plenty now-a-days in Old England, especially
ever since the battle of Waterloo, that the title
has not been able to entrap a single city heiress.
Your thirty pound knights, as an old
dramatist
calls them, who have barely enough to pay
for their spurs, swarm exceedingly, and are
uncommonly
anxious to make every rich plebeian
Joan they meet, a lady. Nay, not a few of the
species have lately infested our country, and, by
their actual presence, irretrievably robbed the
fashionable young ladies of one of their favourite
subjects of contemplation, by giving a clear
demonstration
that, whatever a king, a duke, or a
lord may be, a knight is but a mere man with a
Sir to his name. Such as he is, however, we
beg the reader to make the most of him, when
he vouchsafes his appearance.
To confess the honest truth, we are, as has
been most likely discovered ere this, rather
new in the trade of novel writing, having been
partly induced to enter upon it, as people engage
in the tobacco or grocery line, from seeing others
prosper mightily in the business. But we shall do
better hereafter, having felt the want of a hero and
heroine of proper rank most sorely in the course
of this work. We take this opportunity of
advertising
our friends, and the public in general,
that we have at present six new historical novels
on the anvil, one of which, we have contracted
with our bookseller to hammer out every
twelvemonth
,
and each of which shall contain one
legitimate
,
tyrannical king at least, provided there
should be a sufficient number remaining
unhanged
at that time. We have also stipulated with
our publisher, that not one of the characters
shall be below a right honourable, or an
Irish
peer
, at least. Advising our readers to keep a
good look out for these high treats, we now
proceed
with the thread of our history.
CHAPTER II.
Accursed be the stars * * * * * * * * *!
The fulsome sun, that shines on all alike,
Good, bad, indifferent, Tag, Rag, and Bobtail!
Satan's abus'd, and so is honest Cain,
And so am Ibut * * * * * * * *!
Lord Bn
.
It
is now time to return, and take a look at
the worthy inhabitants of Elsingburgh, who had
long ago rebuilt their habitations, and were now
each one pursuing his usual avocations, under
the salutary pressure of that necessity, which
obliges mankind to forget the past, in providing
for the wants of the present and the future.
As we before premised, the house of Dominie
Kanttwell was rebuilt and furnished, by the pious
exertions of his flock, before any body else had
provided for his own necessities; and,
notwithstanding
the zeal with which that worthy
man declaimed against good works, on this
occasion
he was pleased to exempt those which
were done in his especial behoof from his
malediction
.
12*
Indeed, it must be confessed, the
Dominie
looked upon charity, especially that
charity
which was exercised in his own favour, as
belonging to a species of good works, which
might, under certain circumstances, be
tolerated
.
Still he continued to rail against the
luxuries
and indulgences of this world, although
his capacious rotundity of figure, his double
chin, and large square silver buckles, furnished
shrewd indications, that the Dominie did not feel
it absolutely necessary to reinforce his precepts
by the authority of his example.
The good aunt Edith, according to the
testimony
of Dominie Kanttwell, who had lately
induced her to make a will in favour of the
church, grew every day more perfect. So far
did she carry her contempt for the things of this
world, that she extended it to all mankind,
except
a small circle of the elect, who listened to
her edifying instructions, and talked scandal
against all the rest of the villagers, whom they
were pleased to denominate vessels of wrath.
Considering all these as objects of the Divine
vengeance, the good people thought themselves
bound to hate them also, and to decline any
exchange
of kindness or social intercourse with
such wicked sinners. These simple,
well-meaning
souls, thought that they became saints, by
strictly following the example of aunt Edith and
the Dominie. But they were mistaken. They
became spiritually proud, (the worst species of
pride,) hard-hearted, arrogant, and supercilious,
to all but the chosen set; incapable of social or
kindred affection; strangers to the indulgence
of pity; bad fathers, mothers, husbands, and
wives; and incorrigible in their faults, because
they cherished them as virtues. In fine, while
complacently viewing themselves as exclusively
belonging to the
elect
, they treated all others as
outcasts; as beings having no sort of affinity
with themselves, and no common interest with
them, either in this world or the world to come.
Hence, all the kindnesses of good
neighbourhood
,
the civilities of social life, the customary
exchange of acts of courtesy and friendship, all
those little ties which knit society together by
the best bonds, those of mutual benefits,
producing
mutual good willall these gave place to
a harsh contempt, an arrogant superiority, on
one hand, and a settled hatred, or contemptuous
indifference, on the other. Such is ever the
result
of carrying to extremes the application of
those excellent precepts, which were doubtless
only intended to check, but not destroy, those
worldly feelings and pursuits, which are
essential
,
not only to the happiness, but the very
existence
of mankind, and are only pernicious to
society, or individuals, when operating without
either moral or religious restraints.
As to the good aunt Edith, she might with
truth be said to wallow every day deeper and
deeper in the mire of pious abstraction. Her
time, during the intervals between going to church,
night meetings, and love feasts, was usually
passed in bed, where she kept all the family
waiting upon her, and where she and the virago,
Bombie of the Frizzled Head, used to have
divers
keen encounters of that sharpest of all sharp
weapons, the tongue. While the disconsolate
Heer, to whom she was indebted for an asylum,
a home, and all the comforts of life, was
sitting in solitary sorrow, remembering and
lamenting
his gentle and affectionate child,
without
a soul to sympathize in his cureless grief,
the excellent Edith, considering him as little
better than one of the wicked, paid no attention
to his infirmities or his woes, except
occasionally
to comfort him with the assurance that the
loss of his only child was a judgment upon him,
for loving her better than the church and the
Dominie.
Sometimes the Frizzled Head, who, though a
shrew and a termagant of the first order, was
not altogether destitute of that carnal and
worldly-minded sympathy, which is held in
such abomination by the elect, when exercised
towards the sinful sons and daughters of men,
would prepare some favourite dish, or little
nick-nack, to tempt the waning appetite of her
master. But so sure as aunt Edith heard of
this, though ever so sick and weak, she would
rise from her bed, as it were by miracle, lay
violent hands on the portion of the good Heer,
who fared, on these occasions like poor Esau,
and carry it off to comfort Dominie Kanttwell,
or some one of the elect who had caught cold
attending upon a night meeting. Indeed, it was
the great object of the Dominie's policy, to
govern
the community of Elsingburgh, by
establishing
a sort of
imperium in imperio
in
every house of the village. This he effected by
gaining an ascendency over the married
females
,
and thus governing the household, in
spite of the sinful and inordinate grumblings of
its liege and legitimate lord. Some people may
think this mode of acquiring influence was not
exactly either fair or honest; but it is not our
business (being bachelors) to contest the point.
We only profess to tell what is necessary to the
progress and final catastrophe of our history.
Numerous, not to say innumerable, were the
little societies established, under the influence
and patronage of aunt Edith and Dominie
Kanttwell, whose industry in collecting
donations
from men, women, and children, was such,
that there was not a bit of molasses candy, or
pennyworth of gingerbread, wickedly devoured
by the little urchins of Elsingburgh. All went
to the Dominie, and through himnobody
knew where. One society was the parent of
half a dozen more, until they multiplied so fast,
that the good women of the village had no time
to attend to domestic affairs; and no traveller
could sojourn a night at Elsingburgh, without
rising pale in the morning, in consequence of
having sufficed to satiate the appetites of
innumerable
caitiffs of the carniverous species,
whose numbers always furnish shrewd
indications
of good or evil housekeeping. The
Dominie
was the prime mover of all these, and it
was observed of him, that, like Goldsmith's
man in black, he always went about with his
three-cornered cocked hat, to collect
subscriptions
,
but never was seen to put any thing in it
himself. Hence it was affirmed by his
admirers
,
that he was a truly charitable person, who
hated ostentation, and always gave in secret.
Like Falstaff, however, though nobody, such
was the care he took to avoid discovery, ever
detected him in being charitable himself, he was
certainly the cause of charity in others. So
much, indeed, did he excel in the art of levying
contributions on the necessities of the poor, that,
at one period of our history, there was hardly a
labouring man in the village that had a whole
coat to his back, or a child that was not sorely
out at the elbows; nay, it may with perfect
veracity
be affirmed, that the majority of them
were in the situation of the veritable Dicky
Doubt, as set forth in the famous couplet of
which Dicky is the hero. The following
colloquy
,
between a worthy, hard-working man,
called Fospe Ontstout, and his wife, relative to
these matters, has been preserved by the
Historical
Society of Elsingburgh, and will better
illustrate the effects of the Dominie's exertions,
than any general details. There is a notice of
Fospe Ontstout appended to the article, stating,
that, being at length reduced to actual poverty,
by the attention his wife paid to every body's
wants and affairs but those of her family, and
the charity she bestowed every where but at
home, he retrieved his affairs entirely, by the
lucky thought of getting appointed beggar to
two or three societies: thus, as the old sly
boots of an author adds, thus cunnynglie
deportynge
hymselfe, belike untoe certaine
greene-hornes
,
who, after beyinge sorely plucked, doe
incontinentlye turne ymselves aboute, and plucke
others ynne theire turne. It is likewise noted
in the old manuscript, that Fospe's wife was a
plump, rosy-faced dame, and reckoned one of
the prettiest women in the whole village.
It was a cold, raw evening, and
Fospe
, after
being out all day in the sleet and rain cutting
wood, returned home, cold, wet, and hungry,
and addressed his wife as follows:
Fospe
. Terese, my good girl, my feet are
as wet as a drowned rat. Give me a pair of dry
stockings from those I bought the other day of
the pedler from New-York.
Terese
. I can't, my dear; I gave them all to
the society last night. The Dominie says we
must give all our sparings to the poor, and tells
us we shall never miss what we give away in this
manner.
Fospe
. Hum! I wish the Dominie would
make his words good, for I feel just now very
uncomfortable
,
and miss very much the dry
stockings
you gave away to the society. But I
suppose
there's no help for it; so, as I have no
money
just now, I must borrow the shilling I gave
Hans
for Christmas, and step over to the shop to
buy a pair.
Terese
. But, my dear, Hans has parted with
his money already.
Fospe
. What, the young rogue has been at
the cake-shop, I suppose?
Terese
. No, my dear, Dominie Kanttwell
persuaded us to give it to the society, and
promised
to mention
Hans
, in his sermon next
Sunday
,
before the whole congregation.
Fospe
. Well, what's done can't be undone;
we must sell the pig, for my stockings are not
only wet, but worn out, and I must have a dry
pair, wife.
Terese
. To-be-sure, but, my dear, the pig is
gone too.
Fospe
. What, has he run away, or been
stolen
?
Terese
. No, my dear; but the Dominie
begged
him for the society: he assured me the pig
would be returned tenfold to us.
Fospe
. Um! ay! Well, Terese, just run to
the pig-stye, and see if the ten pigs have arrived.
We must part with one of them immediately.
VOL. II. 13
But stay; it is wet, and you'd better not go out
this evening. Call Hans, and I'll send him.
Terese
. Here he comes, my dear.
Fospe
. Why, he looks like a beggar's brat,
all in rags. I wish, my dear, you would mend
his trowsers, for you see his knees are all naked.
Terese
. I would, my dear, but really I havn't
time. The society has agreed to make up six
dozen suits for the poor children of Greenland,
who, the Dominie assures us, are starving with
cold, and all my time is taken up in labouring
for these dear little sufferers. The Dominie says
it will bring a blessing on the family.
Fospe
. Well, well, the Dominie, I dare say,
is right. Here,
Hans
, run to the pig stye, and
see if the ten pigs are come.
Terese
. Lord, my dear, you don'tyou're
not such a fool as to believe they are come
already
.
Fospe
. Why not, my dear? The Dominie
told you so, and every thing he says is true.
But, my dear, what have you got for supper?
you know I've had nothing since breakfast.
Can't you cook some of the fat venison, left this
morning?come, bustle, my dear, I'm as hungry
as a wolf.
Terese
. But, my dear, all the fat venison is
gone; I
Fospe
. What! you, and
Hans
, and the rest
of the fat rogues, have made away with it, hey?
Well, never mind, I'm glad you've got good
stomachs
and something to fill them.
Terese
. No, no, my dear, we made our
dinner
of the fresh fish you caught yesterday, from
under the ice. The Dominie begged the
venison
for a poor family, he said had given all they
could spare to the society, and were now sick
and starving.
Fospe
. Very well, Terese, we mustn't refuse
to help people that are sick and starving. But
though I'm not sick, I'm almost starved myself.
Do bake me a warm Indian cake, will you?
come, that's a good girl.
Terese
. I would, my dear, but how worldly
minded you are! The Dominie says we mustn't
think of such things: don't you see the fire is
all gone out?
Fospe
. Yes, and feel it too; but how came
you to let it go out, my dear, this raw, cold day?
Terese
. Why, my dear, Dominie Kanttwell
called for me to go with him to a meeting, and
so
Fospe
. Hum! but what became of the
children
while you were gone?
Terese
. Why, I locked them all up together,
and put out the fire, for fear of accidents.
Fospe
. Careful mother! Well, I'll go and
make a fire, and then you shall bake me the
Indian
cake, while I dry myself by the blaze.
Terese
. Yes, my dear, but
Fospe
. But what, Terese?
Terese
. Why, to tell you the truth, my dear,
I am engaged to go with the Dominie to a love
feast this evening, and it is now about the time.
The Dominie says, that baking cakes, mending
our children's clothes, and all that, is but filthy
rags, compared with love feasts and prayer
meetings
.
The patience of poor Fospe was now quite
exhausted;the dl take the Dominie, cried
he, I wish he had my wet feet and empty
stomach
for his night's portion with all my heart.
Just then the Dominie entered, with a stately step,
and sonorous hem! that awed the spirit of the
good yeoman into silent acquiescence. Terese
put on her bonnet and cloak, and accompanied
the Dominie to the love feast, whence she did
not return till almost midnight. Poor
Fospe
went to bed wet and hungry, and could not help
thinking, as he said his prayers, that the
Dominie
might be better employed than in teaching
well-meaning women, that the neglect of their
domestic duties in this world was the surest
passport to happiness in the world to come.
Before concluding this chapter, it is our
desire
to have it distinctly understood, that we
enter
not, either directly or indirectly, upon any
questions connected with religious controversies
or the utility of any of those numerous
societies
,
which the zeal, the humanity, or the
ostentatious
vanity of mankind have instituted for the
propagation of the faith, or the alleviation of
distress. All we design is, to relate what
happened in the famous village of Elsingburgh;
and if, in so doing, it should appear that
indiscreet
zeal, sometimes, is found at war with social
duties and social happiness, and that ill-directed
charity often improverishes the industrious
without
relieving the idle, let us not be blamed for
these consequences. They only furnish
additional
proof, that
excess
is in itself the root
of all evil, and that whenever the blessed
institution
of religion interferes with our social
and moral obligations, it ceases to be the
conservator
of human happiness, as well as of
human
virtue. As the excesses of sensual
indulgence
13*
destroy the capacity for more refined
gratifications, so do those of a fanatical religion
blight and wither the most amiable feelings of the
heart, rendering us insensible to many of the
purest
,
the most exalted delights of which our
nature
is susceptible.
CHAPTER III.
Let fools gaze
At bearded stars, it is all one to me
As if they had been shaved.
I will out-beard a comet any day.
Or night either, marry.
All
this while the poor Heer remained
without
a hope, without a comforter, his mind ever
running on the blue-eyed maiden he had,
peradventure
,
lost for ever. The judgment which,
according to aunt Edith's theory, had fallen
upon his head, for the punishment of his sinful
delights in contemplating the mild virtues and
gentle, unobtrusive charms of his duteous,
affectionate
daughter, seemed only to bind him more
closely to the earth, for he could think of naught
but her. There is no surer sign of a profound
and lasting wound of the heart, than when we
turn in sickening disgust from those little
amusements, habits, or gratifications, which long
custom has either endeared to us, or rendered
difficult to shake off. Thus the good Heer now
never was seen to smoke his pipe at morn or
evening
,
or heard to swear in classic High Dutch,
sure evidences that his heart was almost broken.
His sole employment was in doing nothing,
although
he was incapable of sitting still more
than a minute at a time. Like Bombie of the
Frizzled Head, he wandered and wandered
about
,
seeming without purpose, or even
consciousness
,
until some sound, some object, some
nothing, as it would seem, struck upon one of
those chords by which every thing that is
beautiful
or sweet in nature is connected with the
memory of those we love, and have lost. Then
his trembling lip, and wan, wet eye, bore
testimony
,
that the light still continued to burn,
though the lamp which held it seemed quite
broken
to pieces.
He no longer took an interest in the affairs of his
government, which now fell into the hands of master
Wolfgang Langfanger, who thereupon took his
full swing of public improvements. He caused
new streets to be opened in every direction across
the fields, which the good people of Elsingburgh
avoided in dry weather on account of the dust,
and in wet, on account of the mud. Thus the
fine grassy lawns, and rich fields, that whilome
yielded a golden harvest of grain, were cut up and
laid waste, to wait till the village should grow over
them. The unlucky proprietors were in this
way, as it were, cut with a two-edged sword;
they were obliged to pay for these improvements,
and at the same time lost the products of their
fields. But the masterpiece of Langfanger's
policy was that of pulling down an old market,
and building a new one in another part of the
village, in the management of which business he
is supposed to have laid down the first principles
of the great and thriving science of political
economy, or picking people's pockets on a great
scale. He caused the people living near the
old market to pay roundly for its removal as a
nuisance; and then he caused the people that
lived about where the new one was to be built,
to pay roundly for the vast pleasure and
advantage
of its neighbourhood. Thus he pinched
them through both ears, and got the reputation
of a great financier.
There was muckle scratching of heads at
Elsingburgh
,
and serious complaints made to the
Governor; but that good man paid little or no
attention either to his own wants or to those of
his people. He was, indeed, desolate and
forlorn
.
The Dominie now seldom came near
him, because he refused to be comforted by his
assurances that the loss of his only child was a
great blessing, if properly considered; aunt
Edith was quite elevated above the world and
all things in it, save the meeting of the elect at
societies, love feasts, and the like. She held
such bereavements as the loss of children,
parents
,
friends, and brothers, as trifles which
affected
none save the worldly minded, the chosen
vessels of wrath; and considered the
performance
of domestic duties as among the filthiest of
those filthy rags, miscalled good works. Nay,
the veritable Bombie of the Frizzled Head,
although
she continued duteously to serve up the
favourite dish of pepperpot at supper time,
obstinately
refused to sympathize with him in the
extremity of his sorrows.
Ah! if my poor lost Christina were here,
would he sometimes exclaim, when any little
string was touched that brought her loss home
to himah! if
she
were here, I should not be
left thus alone. But what is an old man like
me, without the tender and duteous
ministrations
of a virtuous daughter? he is a trunk,
whose roots are decayedwhose branches are
blightedwhose heart, hollow and decayed, is
only the refuge of the worm that never dies.
Snow Ball, witch, devil, whatever thou art, tell
me, dost thou think I shall ever see my poor
Christina more?
I have seen what I have seenI know what
I know.
Well, well, impatiently rejoined the Heer;
I suppose you do; most people can say that
of themselves. But hast thou seen, and dost
thou know, more than other people? Answer
me, scourge of satandost thou think we shall
ever meet again?
Thereperhaps, replied the Frizzled
Head, pointing her horn-headed stick towards
the blue sky, that was studded with stars, among
which the new crescent of the moon held its
course, like a bark of pearl in a sea of azure
there, where the purified spirit finds its last
serene abodeordropping her stick to point
to the earth
there
, where
Away, thou screeching day-owl,
interrupted
the Heer; blasted be the heart that
conceived
,
the breath that shall utter such a
prophecy
!
Why, II indeed have sometimes
soiled my immortal spirit with the stain of
worldly sins; but sheOh! she was pure as
the flake of snow in its midway flight from the
heavens, ere it reaches this contaminated earth;
she was
Ay, Heer, she
was
and which of us, in
looking back, cannot put our finger on the point
of time when we too were innocent? Months
have passed away, since thy daughter left thee,
but in less time than that, according to thy book
of faith, the angels lost their place in heaven;
a third part of the stars that glittered around
the throne of Him who made us all, black,
red, and white, alike, tumbled to the earthay,
lower than the earthinto the bottomless gulf;
he who was called the Son of the Morning, fell
among the rest, and foremost of them all. Wilt
thou say, then, that because thy daughter was
pure and innocent months ago, she must of
necessity
be so still?
Pestilent imp of darkness, seed of sulphur,
scourge of my blasted hopes, torturer of my
broken
heart, cried the Heer, be silent, or tell
me what thou really knowest of my lost child.
I know, replied the Frizzled Head, that she
still lives, for had she died, I should have seen
and spoken with her, ere her body had passed
into the tomb. I know she lives, but that is all I
know. Whether thou wilt ever see her, here or
hereafter, I cannot tell; and if I cannot, none
other can; for I have seen what I have seenI
know what I know. I saw thy child carried like
a lamb from its fold, in company with the wolf
that seeks to devour her; I warned him by the
memory of the past, the hope of the future; I
adjured him by the fate of the mother, by
the kindness of the father, the affection of the
daughter, by all that good men hold sacred and
villains scorn, to be unto her a true and watchful
shepherd: he appealed to heaven he would.
But if man is a wolf to man, what is he to
woman
?
At first, the cringing slave, and next the
unfeeling tyrant.
But, shall I see her again before I die?
reiterated the Heer, who, in the weakness of
sorrow
,
sought to wring from the Frizzled Head,
even what he would not dare to believe when it
was uttered.
The revolving sun often brings every thing
back to where it was before. Thou mayst,
perhaps
,
see her again; she may one day come to
thee, when she hath forgotten herself and her
parent
;
when time, and hardships, and the example
of those around her, have worn out all traces of
thy gentle, delicate and duteous daughter. She
may return with a painted face, and limbs dilated
into a clumsy magnitude, by toil and exposure to
the wintry winds, and the labours which brutal
man puts on our sex, when neither honour nor
VOL. II. 14
shame restrains his wanton tyranny; she may
come with a pappoose!
Hence! burst forth the almost maddened
Heer; hence, wholesale dealer in the devil's
haberdashery; away! offspring of wrath and
fire; drown thyself in the river, hang thyself on
the highest tree of the forest, or rather live, and
waste away thy black and blasted flesh in
tortures
,
such as thou hast inflicted upon a poor,
childless old manbegone, and
der teufel hole
dich
.
This was the first time the Heer had relapsed into
High Dutch since the loss of Christina, and, if
the truth were known, it is believed the Frizzled
Head purposely provoked him in this manner,
that he might sometimes forget his daughter in rage
against his slave. But she failed in her object.
The anger of the master was momentary; the
grief of the father was without end.
CHAPTER IV.
Were it not that I pity the multitude of printers, these
chapters had never been written. But besides, I find it
necessary
to refresh my dulness every day by eating, for, by'r
Lady, Minerva loves the larder.
After
a conversation similar to that recorded
in the last chapter, the Heer seated himself
disconsolately
in his old arm chair, and was
silently
and sorrowfully contemplating a picture,
representing his little daughter Christina, then
about a year old, nestling on the bosom
of her mother, now no more. As a specimen
of art the picture was not worth a stiver; but
the Heer would not have parted with it for the
whole wealth of his territory, for it was almost
the only memorial, save that which he carried
in his old broken heart, of the two beings he had
loved better than all the world besides. While
thus seated, the good Heer communed with his
heart, in something like the following soliloquy:
Ah! wife of my bosom, and daughter of
my affections, ye are gone from me, though in the
common course of nature I should rather have
departed
before you. Alas! a wifeless and childless
old man is like the withered trunk of a tree,
whose branches have all been lopped off close
to its body; without verdure, without leaves,
without life, it stands bare to the winds
of heaven, the emblem of sterility and decay.
No bird nestles in its leafy covertno animal
seeks a shelter in its shadeno little suckers
shoot forth from its sapless roots, to indicate
where the old trunk decayed and died. Where
are ye now, my companion in youth, my solace
in declining age? The one is a saint in
heaven
but
the other! my sprightly,
kind-hearted
,
duteous daughter! Her eyes, the colour of
Heaven, are long ere this closed in darkness;
her cheeks, the colour of the rose, are clay cold
and blanched nowthe prey of sorrow, and
the worms. Or perhaps she still lives, a
wretched
outcast of the woods, the companion of wild
beasts, the slave of men wilder than they;
shut out from her customary society, deprived
of the solace of parental affection, and robbed of
all that makes existence aught but a weary
burden
,
a weight that crushes the elastic spirit to the
earth, and points it to the grave as its only
refuge
.
My daughter! my only, my beloved
child!
As the Heer thus indulged himself in
melancholy ponderings, his attention was
called
off by a distant noise, that came to his ear
like the shouts of joyful exultation. He
listened
,
but again all was silent. What can it
mean thought he. But the thought was only
momentary, and he sunk into his usual train
of dark and dismal contemplation. Again
the shout was repeated, still nearer, by the noisy
tongues of the village train, whose elastic spirits
were ever ready to seize occasions for noise
and jollity. Nearer, and still nearer, came the
rout, until at length the attention of the Heer
was roused by something which struck upon his
heart like a repetition of Christina's name. He
started up, and, hurrying with faltering steps to
the window, beheld, a little way off, a crowd of
people, in the midst of which seemed to be a
tall, stately figure, mounted on horseback, with
something that looked like a woman seated
behind
him. The waning lamp of his aged eyes
would not permit him to distinguish any more.
Yetand the hope glanced upon his heart
like lightningyet, if it should be
her
,
returning
at last to his arms! As the eye, when long
14*
accustomed to darkness, shuts close its lids at
the slightest ray of light, so does the mortal
spirit
,
weakened by age, long suffering,
melancholy
thoughts, and dark forebodings, become
overpowered by the first ray of hope that
glances
into its gloomy recesses. It often happens,
too, that the ardent desire to realize a darling
hope, is checked by an apprehension that
certainty
,
instead of leading to fruition, will only
lead to disappointment. To minds naturally
weak, or weakened by long suffering,
uncertainty
is less painful than to know the worst.
From one or both these causes, the good
Heer, instead of going forth to learn the truth,
returned trembling to his chair and there sat
waiting, almost in a state of insensibility, the
approach
of the crowd.
My father! where, where is he? exclaimed
a voice that went to the innermost soul of the
Heer, who sat riveted to his chair, without the
power of speech or motion. A moment after,
a figure rushed in and threw herself at his feet,
kissed his hands, and wept upon them.
My father, hast thou forgotten Christina,
or, Oh! heavenly powers! perhaps he has
forgotten
himself! speak to me, dear father, or kiss
me, or press my handOh, do something to show
thou rememberest and lovest thy child.
The Heer pressed her hand, in token that he
had not forgotten his daughter, but it was some
minutes before he became sufficiently recovered
to take her to his bosom, weep over, and bless
her. When he did, the scene was so moving,
that the spectators shed tears of sympathy; and
even the dry and parched cheeks of Shadrach
Moneypenny exhibited indications of moisture.
But you must thank my deliverers, said
Christina, when the first strong feelings of joy
had subsided.
And who are they? answered the Heer,
wiping his eyes and looking round. Ah! Long
Finne, art thou there? I dare almost swear thou
hadst a hand in my daughter's preservation:
come hither, boy, thou art thrice welcome. Is
it not so, Christina?
I owe my life to him, replied Christina,
but not my liberty, father.
To whom then? if he is present, I will hug
him in my arms; if absent, I will seek him
through the world but I will thank him; if he be
poor, I will make him rich; if he be rich, he shall
have my everlasting gratitude. Stand forth,
whoever thou art; the guilty, are not ashamed
of their evil deedswhy should the virtuous blush
for theirs?
The stiff and upright form of Shadrach
Moneypenny
now advanced with measured steps
towards
the Heer, who, on perceiving it
approaching
,
started up, and hugged Shadrach, with
such good will, that the head of the Governor
actually dislodged the hat of the other, and it
fell to the floor. Shadrach stooped down with
great deliberation, and, picking up the hat,
placed
it on his head and said
Take notice, friend Piper, I pulled not off
mine own hat, in reference to thy dignity, or
that of thy master, the bloody-minded man who
carrieth the gospel of peace upon the
incarnadined
point of his sword. It fell by accident,
verily.
Be it so, returned the Heer; thou shalt
wear thy beaver in the presence of kings, nay,
of the King of kings, if thou likest, my noble
benefactor, to whom I owe more than I can
ever pay.
I am not thy benefactor, friend Piper,
quoth Shadrach, and thou owest me no more
than that good will which we are enjoined to
bear towards all our neighbours. What I have
done was by the command (or rather, at the
request) of William Penn, (for we obey no
orders
from any man, or body of men, except we
list,) who sent me forthwith into the wilderness,
with store of glass beads, tobacco, and the like,
to redeem thy daughter, together with him they
call the Long Finne; likewise friend Dotterel,
commonly denominated among the aboriginals
the Jumping Sturgeon; and lastly, the coloured
lad, bearing the heathen appellative of Cupid,
the which I do intreat thee, as a particular
favour
,
to have christened over again, in which
case I will accord myself to stand godfather.
Well, then, replied the Heer, I shall
bethink
myself of some means worthily and
magnificently
to reward both the good William
Penn and all those who have been the
instruments
of his benevolence in the redemption of
my dear child, whose return to my bosom is as
the warmth of spring to the torpid animals of the
forest.
William Penn wants no rewards, neither do
I, quoth Shadrach. When he despatched
me forth into the wilderness, and I departed in
accordance with his wishes, it was not as if on
an expedition of trade or profit. We will
exchange
with thee good offices, but we cannot sell
them.
Well, but,
der teufel
, replied the Heer, a
rittle ruffled
Swear not at all, interrupted Shadrach
friend Piper, swear not at all. And, now I
bethink
me, if thou wishest to exhibit thy gratitude
to William Penn, or me, his chosen vessel, let it be
in the utter abandonment of that unseemly
custom
,
which, I am aggrieved to say, savours of the
company and good fellowship of Sathan and
his imps.
At any other time, this sally of Shadrach
would have brought the wrath of the Heer upon
him, in a great tempest of expletives; but now
he had got his daughter's hand in his, while
she herself was seated on the little stool, which
whilome supported his gouty foot, and felt so
happy at the moment, that he had neither room
nor words for any other feeling.
Say, then, said he at length, in reply to
Shadrach's exhortationsay that I will come
myself, and thank him for having restored to me
my child; and think to thyself that I will never
forget thy good offices.
I will so say, rejoined Shadrach. And
now, albeit I have finished my mission, and
done the bidding (or rather the request) of
William
Penn, I will essay my return from whence
I came. Farewell, friend Piperswear not
at all.
Shadrach then shook hands with the
Governor
,
the Long Finne, and the likely fellow
Cupid
,
whom he exhorted to take to himself a new
name of Christian seemliness. He also looked
about for the Jumping Sturgeon, who, however,
was found wanting, being at that time busily
employed in keeping order among his old
enemies
,
the roystering urchins of Elsingburgh. The
spirit then moved Shadrach Moneypenny to
approach
the fair Christina, which he did with
great gallantry, his beaver being up in front.
Maiden, quoth Shadrach, umph! verily
thou art fair, and comely therewithal: will
shake hands with thee for old acquaintance sake.
Verily, I say again, thou art exceeding fair and
comely: I will salute thee, maiden, being
thereunto
moved by having sojourned with thee in the
wilderness. Verily, I say a third time, maiden,
thou art altogether and without equal fair and
comely; I will embrace thee in the spirit, being
thereunto moved by
But Shadrach, as he opened his arms to
carry
into execution his sober wishes, like another
Ixion, embraced a cloud. Christina had taken
advantage of his habit of elevating his eyes to
the ceiling, to slip away, unperceived by the good
man, who, without the least appearance of being
ruffled and disquieted at the disappointment,
gravely observed that the maiden was over
bashful
.
He then turned himself as on a pivot, and
departed amid the grateful thanks of all, save
the Long Finne, who never forgave Shadrach
the sin of having touced the red lip of Christina.
CHAPTER V.
Most heart-commanding faced gentlewoman, even as the
stone in India called basilinus hurts all that look on it, and
as the serpent in Arabia called smaragdus delighteth the sight,
so does thy celestial, orb-assimilating eyes both please, and,
pleasing, pain my love-darted heart.
Euphues, and his England
.
When
Shadrach Moneypenny had gathered
himself together, and departed for Coaquanock,
the Heer and his little party, being left alone,
drew into a circle, and began to compare notes
one with another. Perhaps one of the most
pleasing results of the meeting of long separated
friends is this mutual interchange of the
relations
of past events. Our little self-love is
gratified
in telling all that has happened to us, and
our curiosity, perhaps a better feeling, feasted
with the chronicle of what has befallen others.
Alternately the hero and the auditor of these
domestic legends, each one enjoys a temporary
hour of supremacy, and all are pleased, because
all have their turn in talking. The happy
Heer, seated between his daughter and the
VOL. II. 15
Long Finne, holding a hand of the former,
questioned, and answered, and listened, and
talked, like a boy; for the return of his darling
had made him feel young again.
The party consisted only of the three, with
the occasional intrusion of the Frizzled Head,
and her likely grandson, who, under various
pretences, went and came, without having any
positive errand to justify the intrusion. The
good aunt Edith was, as usual, lying abed, too
sick even to admit of a visit from her niece,
which she feared might agitate her so much
that she would not be able to attend a prayer
meeting on the ensuing evening. The worthy
Dominie Kanttwell, too, was either engaged, or
pretended to be so, and came not to
congratulate
the Heer on the return of his only child
from captivity among the wild men of the
woods. Indeed, it was shrewdly suspected, that
the good man, as well as aunt Edith, were both
somewhat mortified at the failure of their
favourite
doctrine of temporal judgments, on this
occasion, as exemplified in the happy return
of Christina; and there were those who did not
scruple to insinuate, that the Dominie was
sorely
wounded in spirit, at the downfall of a
plan for benefiting the church, which depended
on the absence of the fair Christina, and a
certain
alteration in the Heer's will, which he did
not despair of bringing about in time.
Ah! poor Ludwig! cried the Heer, as
Koningsmarke related the manner in which he
had cheated the savages of their bloody feast
ah! brave, merry, thoughtless, swearing
rogue! he lived only for the present breath he
drew, and thought not of the next moment, much
less of the morrow. Jolly Varlett! he was
as brave as the great Gustavus, not to mention
another person, whose name it would not
become
me to utter, being that self-praise is but
another name for self-blame. He used to say,
that a man who feared not what the present
moment
could bring, yet shrunk from the next,
was like a superstitious blockhead, that would
wrestle with flesh and blood, and run away from
his own shadow. Honest Wolfgang
Langfanger
and he could never agree, for Wolfgang
thought nothing of the present, I mean in a
worldly point of view, while Ludwig held, that
in the firm of Past, Present, and Future, the first
and the last were little more than sleeping
partners
.
Ah! pleasant, merry Varlett! would I
could hear him swear again! But now,
continued
the Heer, addressing himself to
Koningsmarke
now
tell me about thyself. How
didst thou live, and how did my poor little girl
endure the savage thraldomhey? Thy hand
is not so soft nor so white as it used to be, my
daughter, said he, as he pressed it tenderly in
his own.
This led to a recapitulation of the events
detailed
in our preceding chapters, in which Christina
and Koningsmarke, alternating, related their
dangers
and sufferings, omitting certain tender
scenes, only interesting to the performers. The
Heer alternately laughed and wept. As they
related the adventures of Lob Dotterel's wig, and
the adoption of that trusty officer into the tribe
of the Muskrats, he indulged in bursts of
merriment
,
and ever after called him by the name of
the Jumping Sturgeon. The sufferings of his
dear child melted his heart; and when she told
him of the kindness of little Aonetti, the Deer
Eyes, he declared his determination to have her
sought out, and brought to Elsingburgh, that
he might reward her, by the affection of a father,
for her goodness to his daughter. Christina,
however, for some reason or other, which, as she
did not avow, we should hold ourselves guilty of
betraying her confidence if we disclosed, did
not second this motion, and the good Heer was
too happy to notice her apparent indifference to
her adopted sister.
And now, exclaimed the Heer, when they
had finished the relation of their adventures
and now, Koningsmarke, my dear son, for such
thou hast been to me, tell me how I may best
reward
thee, for having saved the life of my child,
and oftentimes watched over her safety in the
desolate wilderness. I have wealth, more than
enough for my wants, speak, and as much of it
is thine as shall place thee above the world.
Koningsmarke replied not, but shook his head,
looked at Christina, and sighed.
No? said the good Heer, answering his
look and shake of the head, No? thou art
proud, then, and disdainest to be repaid for thy
kindness to an old man and his daughter with
money. But remember, I am at least thy debtor
for a handful of Mark Newby's halfpence,
added
he, smiling.
Money cannot repay me for what I have
done for thy daughter, rejoined Koningsmarke,
with an air and tone of melancholy pride.
No?
Der teufel!
butwhat? thou holdest
thy favours above all price then?
None think less than I do of what I have
15*
done for others: what others do for me, is a
different
affair.
Well, then, I have some influence with the
great Gustavus, who, no doubt, remembers the
good service I did him, in taking a corporal's
guard. I will use it in thy behalf, and intreat
him, as I am old and feeble, and wish for
retirement
,
to appoint thee my successor in the
government of New Swedelandhey?
The Long Finne again shook his head, and
was silent.
What, then,
du galgen schivenkel
,
exclaimed
the Heer, waxing wroth apacewhat! then
thou disdainest my friendship, and contemnest
my gratitude? Harkye,
henkers knecht
, be
pleased to comprehend, that I hold when a man
refuses to be repaid for favours he confers, he
cancels the obligation. Lookye, Long Finne
am I not old enough to be thy father? am I
not the representative of the great Gustavus?
am I not obliged to thee for the safety of my
only child? 'Sfoot, sirand dost thou dare to
tell me, thus to my face, that it is not thy
pleasure
to be rewarded? Now mark me,
youngster
either
name thy reward, or fight me
to-morrow
norning, with good broad swords. I'll
teach thee to encumber me with a load of
gratitude
sufficient to smother Shadrach Moneypenny's
great horse, and then refuse to assist me in
getting
rid of it. Come, stripling, name thy
reward
,
or shalt smoke for it to-morrow.
Koningsmarke dropped on his knee, and,
taking
the hand of Christina, pressed it to his lips
and his heart.
I deserve her notI ask her notI dare not
ask you for her. But, Oh! Heerif she owes her
life to me, as well as to theeif I have watched,
and toiled, and fought for herif I have borne
her in my arms, when her own limbs refused to
support her, through the irksome wilderness
if I have been to her as a brother, to you as a
sonthink what I could wishnot what I ask,
or deserve as a recompensethe only
recompense
you can bestow, or I accept.
What!
henckers knecht
my daughter, hey?
By the glory of the immortal champion,
Gustavus
,
but that is indeed cancelling the
obligation
!
Thou first gavest me my daughter, and
now thou wilt take her away again. Thou
wouldst rob me of the treasure thou hast just
found and restored to me?
Not rob thee, Heer; I would wish to
double
the blessing, by adding to the solace of a
daughter's tender ministry, the support of a
duteous
,
grateful son.
And thou wouldst not ask her to abandon
her poor old father?
Nowe would live and die with thee. Thy
house should be our home; and, if it so
pleased
Heaven, our graves should be close to
thine.
Sayest thou, coward! ha! thou hadst
rather
marry, then, than meet my old rusty broad
sword? well, thou art a prudent young stripling
after all. Christina, hast got a fever, for
within
these last fifteen minutes, thy pulse hath
risen to a truly alarming pitch? Christina,
what shall I say to this worthy lad, who so well
understandeth the value of his services? truly,
honest Finne, thou shalt be made
superintendant
of the Indian trade, being as thou so well
comprehendest the mysteries of bargaining.
If a young woman can possibly be brought
to say yes, to such a question as that of the
Heer, it must be when she is alone with the
person
that asks it, unless we are mistaken in our
recollection of the pure and delicate Dan Cupid,
that whilome used to fan the flame of love in
female hearts. Christina replied not.
Well, said the Heer, silence gives consent.
Thou art no true woman, Christina, if thou art
not ready to devote thyself to the wishes of one,
who gave thee life, and of that good-looking
youth, who hath preserved it more than once.
Here, Long Finne, here is her hand; if she
dissents
,
she has only to signify so much by
withdrawing
it.
Christina did not withdraw her hand, although
her pale cheek, and trembling frame, bore
testimony
that though she gave herself to
Koningsmarke
,
it was not with that ample trust, that
boundless confidence, that unshrinking,
measureless
hope, with which the ardent, inexperienced
maid so often throws herself, her virtues, her
wealth, and her beauty into the bosom of man.
This day shall be kept as the happiest of my
life, cried the Heer. It isyes, it is the day
I was married, the day of thy birth, Christina;
the day too in which God gave thee to me a
second
time, that I might secure thy happiness by
giving thee to one whom Providence made the
instrument of thy preservation. Blessed be this
day!
It is the day of thy wife's death, too!
exclaimed
the Frizzled Head, who was always
flitting about like the bird of night, and always
croaking. It is the day of thy wife's death; thy
wife, who, if she could at this blessed moment
lift the shroud and come among you, would hold
up her bloodless hand, and shriek in ghostly
accents
against this unhappy union; forbidden by
the memory of the past, the auguries of the
future. I, that know what thou, Heer,
knowest
notI, that have seen what thou didst not
see, I tell thee, Heer, I tell thee, weak maiden,
and, holding up her withered finger in scorn,
to Koningsmarke, I tell
thee
, that rather
than this accursed marriage shall take place,
I will say what shall blast thy purpose and
send thee wandering again to another new
world, if such there be. Better be dead than
wedded thus.
Housekeeper of Satan! answered the
Heer, avaunt, fly, skipherald of wrath and
abomination! When was it that I was ever
inclined
to be merry, that thou didst not essay to
turn my gayety into gloomy forebodings? when
did I ever open my heart to the memory of
past, or the anticipation of future happiness,
that thou camest not, like the raven, to croak
me into fancied misery? when did the sun shine
ever warm on my heart, that thou didst not
come and freeze it stiff and cold? Away, and
howl in churchyards, at midnight; scream into
the ear of guilt thy accursed maledictions. Be
silent with that eternal clapper of thine, or speak
to be understood, or
I do howl in the ears of guilt, and I speak
to be understood by those I wish to understand
me. Those now hear me, who know full well
what I mean, yet dare to despise my warnings;
who would rush into each other's arms, even
though the grave of a mother lay between them
and their desires; whobut the time is not yet
come, that I must and will speak out.
Then, in the name of Heaven, be quiet till
then, and do not mar this happy hour. I would
thou wert silent, even as the grave thou
speakest
of; for thy talking is worse than the
screech-owl
,
the wolf, and the Indian, a joining in
concert with the midnight storm. How is it,
that thou wouldst mar the happiness of thy
master
and young mistress?
I mar their happiness! retorted the Snow
Ball; I seek to prevent their misery; to save
virtue from the contamination of vice; to revenge
the death of her, who, of all thy colour and thy
race, was the only one whose kindness was never
accompanied by insultwhose benefits were
never
cancelled by capricious tyranny. Heer, why
do I take an interest in the prosperity of thy
household? why do I seek thy happiness? It is
not that thou art, in the language of thy haughty
race, my master, but because thou wert the
husband
of the kindest being that ever breathed the
breath of life. Daughter of my mistress, why do I
watch over thy welfare? It is not that thou
art the child of my master, and I thy slave,
but that
she
was thy mother, and that with her
latest breath she besought me to be unto thee a
watchful and devoted servant, to see that no
harm fell upon thy innocent head. Such I
have beensuch I will be, until I join my
mistress
,
where I may be permitted, though black
as ink, to say to her snow-white spirit, I did my
duty to her at least.
The yellow plague sieze thee, thou
incomprehensible
riddle of darkness, cried the Heer.
Begone, for I swear to thee, Snow Ball, the
Long Finne shall marry my daughter, though
thou talkest thyself white in the face.
To-morrow
shall be the day, and then, when I have
secured
my girl a protector in weal and wo, in
storm and sunshine, I am ready to obey that call
which, sooner or later, brings all mankind to
their last muster. Depart in peace, old sinner,
and hold thy peace, if such a matter be
possible
.
I go, replied the Frizzled Head, without
moving
a step. Heer! Heer! thou wilt
remember
,
when I am dead, in sorrow and remorse,
that I warned thee, yet thou wouldst not listen.
When the storm comes, and thou and thine
shall be laid low in the dust, thy roots bare,
and thy branches broken, like the trees after a
whirlwind, then thou shalt weep, and tear thy
gray hairs, and call upon the mountains to fall,
the rocks to cover thee: but it will be vain.
Thou shalt invoke death, but he will not come;
thou shalt seek the grave, but it will not open to
thee; thou shalt live, despairing, until thy legs
shall refuse to carry thee, thy hands to lift
themselves
to thy head, and thy mind and body
become
those of the helpless infant.
During this mysterious colloquy, Christina
had remained speechless and motionless, her cold
and almost lifeless hand grasped in that of
Koningsmarke
,
who himself remained silent, as if overawed
by the horrible fluency of the sable prophetess.
There is something allied to the sublime in
futurity
;
and even the strongest mind, fortified by the
consciousness of innocence, involuntarily shrinks
when the veil is withdrawn, and renders the
homage
of its fears, where it refuses that of its
faith.
VOL. II. 16
Daughter of the kindest mistress that ever
fell to one of our unhappy race, resumed
Bombie
of the Frizzled Head, addressing Christina,
wilt thou devote thy virtue, thy beauty, thy
life, to this man, who
Who twice saved mine, hastily interrupted
Christina; I am bound by my faith to do so.
When we parted, never expecting to meet again;
when he was going to be tortured at the stake,
for having sought to restore me to my father;
and when it seemed hardly within the compass
or the power of fate to restore him to me, or me
to my home, I promised to be his, if we ever
lived
to return hither. I will keep my word, let
what will follow; I will pay the debt of
gratitude
I owe him, though it be at the price of a
broken heart, a blasted fame; yea! even though
my mother's spirit should Here the poor
maiden covered her face with her hands, and
became choked with her rising emotions.
Then be the curse of thy mother on thy
head, and on the heads of all that shall be born
of thee, as the curse of Cain was upon him and
all his posterity
Here Christina uttered a shriek, and fell
insensible
into the arms of her father. The Heer
raved in agony. To-day, he cried, the
Lord restored to me a lost child, and to-day,
ere yet I had kissed and blessed her, thouthou,
black and malignant devil, hast destroyed
her. But thou shalt pay for this, thou and all
thy accursed race.
Better thusbetter dead, than to live as
thou mayst yet live to see her, with a blighted
cheek, a broken heart, and a conscience
gnawed
,
morning, noon, and night, sleeping and
waking, by the worm that never dies, replied
the sybil.
What more she would have said was
interrupted
by the intrusion of Lob Dotterel,
followed
by a number of the villagers, having in
custody
the body of that likely fellow Cupid. Their
presence turned the current of Bombie's feelings
into another channel, and the disclosures that
followed led to consequences which will be
related
in the succeeding chapters.
BOOK EIGHTH.
16*
CHAPTER I.
It
hath been aptly and truly said, that there
is reason in the roasting of an egg. But,
assuredly
,
if the roasting of an egg to please
every
palate requires great discretion, the boiling
of one is a matter of much more difficult
attainment
.
Some people like their eggs as hard as a
bullet, in defiance of that mortal foe to good
eating, erewhile known by the name of the
spleen, afterwards christened bile, and now of
universal acceptation, as the dyspepsia. Others
will have their eggs raw, or so nearly raw, as to
puzzle human reason to decide whether they
are raw or boiled. A third party, who may be
denominated
tertium quids
, prefer them half
boiled, and so on, through every gradation,
from one extreme to the other.
It is astonishing, what a number of families
there are, both in the old and new world, whose
peace almost entirely depends on the judicious
boiling of those oddities, which, from the first
cackling of the hen to their being served up at
the breakfast table, or hatched into chickens,
seem destined to give great trouble to the fair
sex. Certain it is, that the boiling of eggs is
a matter of great moment to the peace of
society
and the happiness of mankind. We have
seen a lord of the creation put out of humour
for a whole day, because his egg had been kept
ten seconds too long in the skillet. Nay, we
have more than once beheld a lively,
good-humoured
Frenchman, who was the life of a stage
coach all night long, eat twenty hard boiled eggs in
the morning at breakfast, and grumble all the
while at the cook, the house, and all within it,
except the pretty bar maid.
And here we will observe, that the best
possible
test of a gentleman is his behaviour at a
dinner, breakfast, or supper table, in a hotel or
steam-boat. It is there that his pretensions are
put to the touchstone, and that fine clothes fail to
hide from observation the clown that lurks
beneath
them. If we find him snatching at every
dish within his reach; filling his plate with fish,
flesh and fowl; eating as if his last, or rather
his first meal were come; and, at the same time,
looking about with eyes as wide open as his
mouth, to see what next to devournot velvet
cloth coat, dandy pantaloons, or corset dire,
will suffice to place him in the rank of
gentlemen
.
Were we to express our idea of a
well-bred
man in one word, we would say, he was a
gentleman, even in his eating; nor would we
hesitate to place any man in that class, who,
being
fond of soft eggs, should be able to eat them
boiled hard, without grumbling. We
remember
,
for we delight to remember every thing
connected with that gay, good-humoured,
sprightly old gentleman, Deidrich
Knickerbocker
,
that he always superintended boiling
his eggs himself, by a stop watch, and more
than once came near to scalding his fingers, in
his haste to rescue his favourites from the boiling
element, ere the fatal crisis was passed.
This diversity of taste extends to almost
every
enjoyment and luxury of life, more especially
to books, in the composition of which,
notwithstanding
so many appearances to the contrary,
we will venture to say, that almost as much
reason is necessary, as in the roasting or
boiling of eggs. Some readers like what are
called hard studies, as some men like hard eggs;
while others luxuriate in raw sentiment, and
melting, drivelling, ropy softness. Some
delight
in impossible adventures, and others in
common-place matter of fact. In short, it is
quite unnecessary to insist on what the
experience
of all mankind verifies every hour of the
day.
It is in order to accommodate, as far as
possible
,
every class of readers, that we have
endeavoured
,
in the course of this work, to do
what we are fully convinced can easily be done,
namely, please all sorts of people, whether
lovers
of hard or soft eggs. We mean all those
who are naturally inclined to be pleased with
every thing; which class includes, beyond
doubt, a majority of mankind; for, as to the
critics, and other ill-disposed people, whose
pleasure consists in being displeased, we have
nothing to say to such unreasonable people,
except
that whatever faults are incorporated in
this work, were wilfully placed there, for the
sole purpose of affording them the pleasure of
grumbling a little.
Our introductory chapters are intended for
the deepest philosophers, who will find therein
matters of weighty import; our historical
details
are for the inveterate lovers of truth; our
love scenes for all whom it may concern; our
gravity for the aged; our jests for the young;
our wisdom is at any body's service that can
find it out; and the sublime declamation of the
Frizzled Head is particularly intended for the
refreshment of ladies and gentlemen of colour,
who, it is presumed, will become ere long
sufficiently
enlightened to scold their masters, and
bully their mistresses, into a proper sense of
equality.
CHAPTER II.
From fire, and water, and all things amiss,
Deliver the house of an honest justice.
The
interruption to the eloquence of the
Frizzled Head, recorded in the last chapter of
the seventh book of this veracious history,
was, as the reader may recollect,
occasioned
by the intrusion of a crowd of the
inhabitants
of Elsingburgh, headed by Lob
Dotterel, having in custody that likely fellow,
the goblin Cupid. Lob's hand had been out so
long, that, although by no means an ill-natured
or malicious person, his fingers itched to lay hold
of a culprit of some kind or other. The
moment
,
therefore, that he resumed the duties of
high constable of Elsingburgh, he began to
look about sharply, and make most diligent
inquisition
into the affairs of the village, in order,
if possible, to catch some one tripping.
Failing
in this, he bethought himself of certain
boastings of Cupid, during their captivity
among the Indians, from which it appeared,
that this likely youth had not only given
information
to the hostile savages, but actually
caused
,
by his immediate agency, the blowing up
of the magazine, and consequent destruction of
Elsingburgh.
The high constable, stimulated by a longing
desire of labouring once again in his favourite
vocation, perhaps actuated, too, by a
consciousness
of the necessity of exposing and punishing
a crime so dangerous to the existence of all the
little communities that were springing up in this
new world, as that of conspiring with the
savages
,
laid this information before master
Wolfgang
Langfanger. Langfanger was at this
time perfectly at leisure to attend to the affair,
having just wrought up the village to a state of
improvement, to which nothing could be added
and nothing taken away, since, in truth, he had
left the good people exceedingly bare of all
resources
for either public or private emergencies.
By his direction, Lob Dotterel forthwith
summoned
the
posse comitatus
, and proceeded to
search for the goblin Cupid, whom, it is
recorded
,
they found most lovingly consorting with his
old friend Grip, who still survived, and
discovered
nearly as much sensibility, on this
occasion
,
as the far-famed dog of Ulysses, from which
honest Grip was very possibly a lineal descendant.
The moment master Lob laid his terrible paw
on the shoulder of the goblin Cupid, in the way
of hostility, did honest Grip take a similar
liberty
with the heel of the high constable, which he
continued to hold in his teeth, but without
actually biting through the skin. Lob was no
Achilles, and if he had been, he was, like that
hard-talking hero, at least vulnerable in his heel.
The salutation of Grip was therefore highly
obnoxious
to the high constable, who called on the
posse to assist him in the discharge of his
functions
.
But not one of these worthy citizens had
the least inclination in the world to risk an
encounter
with the white tusks of Cupid's
guardian
angel, for the public benefit. They
therefore
contented themselves with calling off the
dog, who resisted all their coaxing and
blandishments
,
till one of them bethought himself of
producing a bone. Every dog has his price,
and the fidelity of Grip, sorry we are to record
it, yielded to the irresistible seductions of the
marrow bone. All the excuse we can allege for
this ignominious conduct, is, that poor Grip had
been much neglected in the absence of his
friend Cupid, and that he was now half starved,
VOL. II. 17
But, after all, we fear this circumstance only
furnishes
another indication of that downhill course
of every thing in this world, which is so clearly
discerned by every man after he passes the age
of forty, and begins to go down hill himself. It
is then that, like a passenger in a swift-sailing
vessel, while sitting apparently still himself, he
sees every thing else going backwards, though
in reality it is himself that is outstripping
all things, in his progress to the end of his
journey
.
Be this as it may, the dog seized his bone,
and, retreating to his strong hold under an old
piazza, began to discuss it with such earnestness,
that his old friend Cupid was carried away,
without exciting even a growl of disapprobation.
Well, master constable, quoth the Heer, as
Lob entered with Cupid in custody, what is the
matter now? hast thou been exercising thy
functions already? hast thou caught a sinner,
hey? Take notice, I pardon him outright, for
no one shall date his shame or his punishment
from the day when my child was returned to me
from the wilderness. What bath this boy done?
Lob Dotterel then proceeded to detail the
confession
,
or rather boast of the Goblin, that they
might thank him for their captivity, and the
burning of Elsingburgh, as he had not only
given
information to the savages of the proper
time for making the attack, but had actually
himself blown up the magazine.
It is a lie: he never said so, or, if he did, he
bore false witness against himself, cried the
Frizzled Head, who had discovered great
agitation
,
from the moment Cupid was brought in by
Lob Dotterel.
Silence! exclaimed Lob, with the gravity
of the worthy Rinier Skaats, erewhile crier and
queller of noisy curs and falling shovels and tongs,
in the ancient city hall of Gotham, now levelled,
like the good Rinier himself, with, yea, below the
dust of the earth.
Silence thou! retorted Bombie of the
Frizzled Head; silence! scraper of night
cellars
,
inquisitor of dungeons, keen-scented hound
of two legs, whose delight is to hunt down,
equally, the guilty who sin wilfully, and the
innocent
who cannot defend themselves.
Silence! I say, cried the Heer, in a voice
of unequalled authority; silence! dost think
there is nobody to talk but yourselves, ye
scum of a kettle of boiled porpoises? If we all
talk at once, I should like to know where the
listeners
are to come from,
der teufel hole dich
.
I will not be silent, quoth the Snow Ball;
I will speak, Heer, for it is the only right
reserved
by our unhappy race. Shall we be trod
under foot, and not turn? Shall we be
beaten
,
and not curse? Shall we be oppressed,
ground to the earth, abused, insulted, manacled,
enslaved, and not rail? Heer! Heer! the
heart and the tongue cannot be held in fetters;
the one will engender, the other mutter curses
in secret, even as dogs howl to the moon, when
there is nothing else to bay. Beware, beware;
it is but for me to speak out, and the fabric of
thy happiness will crumble to the earth; thou
wilt go down to the grave, not as a happy old
man, beholding his children and his children's
children sporting around his decaying roots,
but like a wretched being, seeking in death, not
immortality, but a refuge from recollections of
the past, that swallow up all fears of the future.
Touch not a hair of that boy's head, or thy own
gray hairs shall assuredly go down to the grave
in anguish and unutterable despair.
Had it been any thing but this, rejoined
the Heer, who, stout-hearted as he was, could
not help feeling, he might not exactly tell how,
at these mysterious denunciationshad it been
any lesser offence, I would have pardoned it,
and offered up my forgiveness at the shrine of
this happy day. But the crime of this boy is
one that endangers the safety and the lives of
communities and states;it has cost us our
good town and fort of Elsingburgh, both
consumed
in the flames; it has cost us the lives of
our dear and worthy counsellor Ludwig
Varlett
,
and the poor Claas Tomeson, his wife and
child; and it has cost me months of unutterable
misery. My own sufferings I might forget;
those of my child I might forgive; but, as the
guardian and protector of my people, I must see
justice done upon one who has been the
instrument
of destruction to their homes, and of exile
bondage, and tortures, to their friends and
neighbours
.
As I live, thy grandson shall be tried
to-morrow, if it please God; and if he doth not
clear himself of this heavy charge, so surely as
the morrow comes, he shall be made to feel at
least some part of what he hath made others
feel and suffer. Go thy ways, old woman, and
pray that thy lad may be found innocent, for it
is only his innocence that can shield him now.
Innocent! retorted the Frizzled Head
Innocent! Dost thou tell me, Heer, that
innocence
is a surety against condemnation and
punishment in this world? I, that have seen the
finger of scorn pointing at an innocent child,
17*
not for its own guilt, but the guilt of its parents
I, that have seen the strong giant,
wickedness
,
bestriding the world, and crushing the
unoffending
helpless beneath himI, that have seen
innocent hearts broken asunder, by being made
to bear the burthen and the shame of others'
crimesI, that have every where beheld the
seeds of good reaped by the wicked, and the
seeds of evil gathered by the virtuous manI!
talk to me of my child's innocence being a
shield of protection! Had I not forgot to
laugh, long, many long years ago, I would laugh
in thy face, Heer, though my burthen in this
life is to bear the heavy load of inferiority to the
lowest, the meanest, the vilest of thy race.
He shall be tried by the laws of the land,
and adjudged by his neighbours, quoth the
Heer.
The laws of the land! rejoined the Snow
Ball. Had he any voice in making these laws?
Has he any interest or stake in that society to
which he is held in subjection, and to whose
welfare he is to be sacrificed? Neighbours
say you! He hath no neighbours; they will
sit in judgment upon him, not as beings placed
on a level with a slave, sharing his feelings, his
wrongs, and his resentment. No, Heer, that
which alone gives rise to the sympathy between
man and man, is when he puts himself in the
place of his neighbour, and asks his heart what
he would do, or feel, or suffer, if placed in his
neighbour's situation. But alas! my master,
what sympathy can there ever be betwixt the
freeman and the slave.
Go thy ways, mildly, yet firmly replied
the Heer, waving his hand for her to depart.
There is some truth in what thou sayest; but
still, I declare to thee, he shall clear himself of
this crime to-morrow, or lay down his life to
expiate it. Go thy ways. I pity theebut
thou talkest to the winds.
Then may thy last petitions on thy death
bed, be howled out to the winds, as I do now!
But it is not alone I and mine that shall suffer;
thou and thine, Heer, will live to rue the hour
when the only being that owns kindred or
fellowship with me in this wide world shall be
made a spectacle and a victim. Before I go, as
I shall surely go, when that hour arrives, I will
lay that on thy heart shall make it bleed or
break; I will pour out a vial of wrath on thy
gray head, and on the innocent head of thy
child, shall blast and scorch them, as the
lightning
scorches the earth, so that neither grass,
nor herbage, nor any thing green, ever grows
there again.
Let it be soif it must, it must. I shall do
my duty, let come what will, quoth the Heer, at
the same time directing that a high court should
be held on the morrow, for the trial of Cupid,
who, in the interim, was entrusted to the care
of Lob Dotterel, to be guarded with all
possible
vigilance. The sable lad had all this
while maintained a dogged silence, either
trusting
to the overwhelming eloquence of his
grandmother
,
or actuated by that unconquerable
obstinacy
,
which is so often a characteristic of his
race, and which in the ignorant is called
stupidity
in
the enlightened, philosophy.
The party then dispersed their various ways;
and it may not be beneath the dignity of this
history
to record, that the good Heer, who was thus
ready to brave the mysterious denunciations of
Bombie, in order to further the sacred ends of
justice
,
that night went to bed without his supper,
either because he had no appetite, or, rather,
as we believe, that the Frizzled Head refused
to cook his favourite dish of pepperpot.
CHAPTER III.
Hem! grass and hay. We're all mortal!
Betimes
the next morning, the trial of the
likely fellow Cupid came on in the High Court
of Elsingburgh; where presided the Heer in
person
,
assisted by Counsellors Langfanger and
Pfegel, and prompted in the mysteries of that
most mysterious of all sciences, the law, by six
folios of jurisprudence, each one nearly a foot
thick, and containing sufficient matter to
confound
half the universe.
The prisoner was brought in by Lob
Dotterel
,
the gravity of whose deportment would
have done credit to a much greater man than
himself, and whose attention seemed equally
divided
between Cupid, and a parcel of his old
enemies, the boys, who pressed forward to see
what was going to become of their sable
playmate
.
Among those who attended the trial was
Bombie of the Frizzled Head, whose agitation
was singularly contrasted with the apparently
stupid insensibility of her grandson. The
prisoner
,
in fact, seemed almost unconscious of his
situation, and stood with folded arms, staring
around the room with a vacant abstraction, as
if he had no concern in what was going forward.
Those important forms, so essential to the very
existence of lawyers, if not of the law, being
gone through, and the indictment read, charging
the prisoner, among other matters, with
conspiring
against the life of the great Gustavus,
Cupid
was asked the usual question of guilty, or
not guilty? He made no reply, and continued
obstinately silent, affording, in this respect, a
singular
contrast to her of the Frizzled Head, who
it was impossible to keep quiet, though Lob
Dotterel cried silence! loud enough to be
heard across the broad river.
This refusal to plead had like to put a stop
to the whole business. Counsellor Langfanger
quoted, from a volume ten inches thick, a case
which went to establish the doctrine, that it was
impossible to try a criminal who would neither
confess his guilt, nor assert his innocence. The
Heer, on the contrary, produced a book, at least
two inches thicker than the other, and printed
in black-letter besides, which rebutted the
authority
of Counsellor Langfanger's case, and held
it sound law to proceed upon the silence of a
criminal, in a case of this kind, as on a
confession
of guilt. We shall not trouble the reader
with the arguments adduced in support of one
or other of these doctrines, but content ourselves
with stating the decision of the court, which was,
that they would wave insisting upon an answer,
and proceed with the trial.
The business was soon over, as at that time
there was not a single lawyer in the whole
community
of Elsingburgh; a proof how much
this new world has improved since, there being
hardly a village of that size at present in the
country, that hath not at least two lawyers in it,
to puzzle the justices and confound the laws of
the land. Besides the frequent boasts of
Cupid
,
during the abode in the wilderness, one or
two persons deposed, that they had seen that
likely youth hovering about the magazine, and
at length stealing away in great haste, a few
moments before the explosion took place. He
was asked if he had any witnesses to produce in
his behalf, or any thing to say for himself, but he
remained silent as before. The proofs were so
clear, that there was little, if any, room for
doubt, and the court, after a few minutes
consultation
,
agreed in pronouncing him guilty,
and sentencing him to be hanged, for having
conspired with the savages, thereby occasioning
the destruction of the village, and the loss of
several
lives.
This sentence was received by the prisoner
with the same immovable indifference he had
hitherto preserved; he made no gesture, he
moved not his lips, but continued, as before, to
gaze around, without appearing to notice any
thing. There was an awful silence throughout
the whole court, for there is something in the
annunciation of a disgraceful and violent death,
from the mouth of a judge, animated by no
passion
,
prejudice, or resentment, but standing
there as the oracle of the laws, the mouth-piece
of the community, to denounce against the
offender
the just punishment of his crime, that
makes the most volatile serious, the most
unthinking
shudder. Even the fluent Bombie
seemed for once quelled into silence, by the
shock of this awful dispensation, and she
followed
her condemned grandson out of the court in
dead silence, her head bent down upon her
bosom
.
Between the condemnation of Cupid and the
time appointed for his execution, the Frizzled
Head employed herself in making interest with
Christina, the Long Finne, and, indeed, every
one whose intercession she thought might induce
the Heer to mitigate the punishment of her
grandson. But the Heer remained immovable
to the solicitations of his daughter and the Long
Finne. The crime was of too deep a die; the
example of pardon might be of the most
pernicious
consequences; and the prerogative of
mercy ought never to be exercised to the
endangeringthe
safety of the state, or the security
of life and property.
The day before the execution Bombie
essayed
,
for the last time, to move the Heer in behalf
of her grandson.
Art thou resolved that he shall die on the
morrow? said she.
As surely as to-morrow shall come, so sure
as the sun shall rise, even so surely shall he
never
live to see it go down, replied the Heer.
Thou hast forgotten, then, the services I have
done to thee and thine; thou no longer
rememberest
that I have been to thy wife who is gone
a faithful handmaid; that I ministered to her in
sickness and in health, and that, when she died,
she bequeathed me to thy care and protection:
thou hast forgot that it was I that bore thy infant
daughter in my arms, when her own limbs would
VOL. II. 18
not support her; that it was I who, when her
mother died, did all I could to supply the place
of a mother to her; and that I have watched,
and do still watch, over the welfare of thy child,
even while thou art dooming mine to a shameful
death. Thou hast forgotten all this, Heer!
Say not so, rejoined the Heer, for so it
is not. I remember thou hast been to me and
mine a faithful slave, and I am grateful for
thy kindness, but
But what? interrupted the Frizzled Head.
Thou wouldst strive to persuade me of thy
good will, while thou refusest me the last
request
I shall ever make thee. Of what use is
thy gratitude to me, if thou wilt not permit it to
sway thy actions? what avails it, if, when thou
inffictest a wound of death, thou shalt whine in
my ear, that thou art sorry for it? Say that thou
wilt spare his life, and I will believe in thy
gratitude
.
If the risk of sparing him were mine alone,
said the Heer, I would not hesitate; but I am
not acting for myself. The safety of my people
depends upon the punishment of those who
conspire
to destroy them, as did thy grandson.
Were I to let him loose, he might again occasion
the destruction of our village, and how then
should I answer it to my God, my kind, or
my people?
Yes! retorted the Frizzled Head, with
bitterness
,
yes! such is the code and the heart of
the white-man. His duties are ever conflicting
with each other, and even the precepts of
forgiveness
,
inculcated by the book which he
pretends
came directly from heaven, must yield to
laws of his own making. As a christian, it is
his duty to pardon; as a legislator, to punish
offences. He cannot love his country without
being unjust to his friends, nor fulfil his duties
to the public, but at the sacrifice of kindred
affection
,
and domestic ties. But, once more
once more, and for the last time, art thou
resolved
,
Heer?
I am.
Fixed as fate?
As I live, I swear that, so far as rests with
me, he shall pay the forfeit of his dark and
malignant
crime, before mid-day to-morrow.
Trouble
me no moreI am deaf to thy petition.
Then thus may it be with thy petitions, now,
henceforth, and for ever more, whether
addressed
to thy fellow creatures, or to Him who made
us all. If thou callest for sympathy, mayst
thou meet with scorn; if thou askest for
kindness
,
mayst thou be answered with the bitterness
of contumely; if thou criest out for bread,
mayst thou receive a stone; and if, in the
last hour of thy existence, struggling between
life and death, time and eternity, fearing, hoping,
trembling, expiring, thou shalt address thy last
prayer for pardon to the throne of thy Maker,
may he turn a deaf ear, as thou hast done to
mine.
So saying, she departed from the presence of
the Heer, and took her way through the village,
stopping at every house, and madly calling on
the inhabitants to interfere, and rescue her
grandson from what she called the tyranny of
the Governor. But her exhortations produced
little or no effect. The people had suffered too
much from the treasonable practices of Cupid,
to feel any sympathy for him; and they were
so accustomed to consider the declamations of
Bombie of the Frizzled Head as little better
than mysterious parables, coming from the
mouth of one who possessed little in common with
ordinary mortals, that few paid much attention to
her from any other motive than fear.
Early the next morning there was a great
bustle observed in the village, for this was the
morning big with the fate of Bombie's
grandson
.
This was the first example of a capital
punishment that ever occurred in Elsingburgh,
and the effect was proportionably profound.
Every body seemed agitated and in motion, yet
nothing was doing. All avocations were
suspended
,
and, although there was a great deal of
talking, it was all in whispers. A certain deep
impression of horror reigned all around, and the
imagination was filled with nothing but images
of death. Yet such is the apparent
inconsistency
of human nature, that there was not a soul in
the whole village, except the Heer's family,
that was capable of motion, who did not
attend the execution of Cupid. Men,
women
,
and children, impelled by that
mysterious
fascination which draws the bird to
the fang of the rattle-snake, and sometimes
impels
the human being to precipitate himself from
the brow of the precipice, poured forth, on this
occasion, to witness what struck them with
horror
in the exhibition, and made the night
terrible
for a long while afterwards. The people of
the country, and those who live in retired
villages
,
see so little of novelty, that they are
extremely
fond of sights, and are almost equally
attracted
by any thing that breaks in upon the
monotony
of their existence. It is not that people love
18*
to witness spectacles of horror, or the effusion of
human blood, but that they want excitement, and
often seek it after a strange manner.
The goblin Cupid had not spoke, since the
moment of his apprehension by Lob Dotterel.
To the exhortations of Dominie Kanttwell, as
well as the lamentations of his grandmother, he
turned a deaf ear; and it was impossible to
discover
,
by any outward indications, whether
terror
or obstinacy was at the bottom of this
apparent
insensibility. When conducted to the foot
of the gallows, he looked about as if he were
rather
a spectator than an actor in the scene; nor
did the agonies of the poor old sybil, his
grandmother
,
who, when she came to take leave of
him, discovered a degree of intense feeling, that
drew a tear from many an eye, make the least
impression upon him, or draw forth one single
returning endearment.
Farewell, my son, said she, giving him a last
embrace; despised, deformed being of a
despised
race, farewell. I have loved thee the more, for
that thou wert hated by all the worldcontemned
by the most despicable of the white-man's race
hooted at by the very beggar that slept in the
sun by the road-sideand every where, and at
all times, the sport of capricious power. Why
should I lament thee? Thou art going where,
even according to the creed of thy oppressors,
all will be equal, and where, I say, thou wilt have
thy turn to play the master. Yes! I see itI
feel itI know it! Each dog shall have his
day, and why not so with man? Millions of
people live and die in the belief, that the ox
which is driven, the horse that is rode, the
sheep that is eaten by man, shall, in some future
revolution of time, drive, ride, and eat the
tyrant
who did even so unto them. And shall
not our race have their turn? It must be so,
here or hereafter.
The Frizzled Head was waxing sublime and
incomprehensible apace, when Lob Dotterel
apprized
her, that if she had any thing more to
say to the poor deformed creature, she must say
it soon, as his last moment was come.
The Snow Ball turned herself about, looked
all around the circle with a scrutinizing eye,
and said, as it were to herself, he is not here.
Then, as if at that moment, for the first time,
struck with that feeling of absolute and
inevitatable
certainty, under which the agony of the
heart is quelled for a time, and hope sinks into
listless despondency, she quietly retired a little
way from the gallows, and stood immovable,
leaning on her stick. She saw the fatal knot
tied; the cap, which shut out time, and
enveloped
eternity, drawn over his eyes; heard the last
exhortation, the hymn that was to waft his soul
no one knew where, without moving a muscle, or
uttering a word. The noise of the cart, as it
drew from under the fatal tree, seemed for a
moment
to shake her old crazy frame. She gazed for
a minute, while her grandson was hanging in
the mid air, and was silent, till the total
cessation
of motion in his limbs announced that all
was over. Then, letting fall her stick, clasping
her old withered hands, and raising her eyes to
heaven, she shrieked out
'Tis doneand may all the cruel, accursed
race of the white-man thus perish, as thou, my
poor boy, hast perished. Yes! yes! ye proud,
upstart race, the time shall come, it shall surely
come, when the pile of oppression ye have
reared
to the clouds shall fall, and crush your own
heads. Black-men and red-men, all colours,
shall combine against your pale, white race;
and the children of the master shall become the
bondsmen of the posterity of the slave! I say
itI, that am at this moment standing scarce
nearer to time than to eternityI, that am at
this moment shaking hands with death, and my
body and spirit taking their last leave of each
otherI say itand I say my last.
The tough old heart strings that had so
often
been tested, in the hard gales of life, now
cracked, and gave way; the strong frame that
had endured so many hardships, all at once
refused
to endure any more, and in less than a
minute after Bombie uttered these words she
sunk to the ground, overwhelmed by the agony
of her feelings.
Numbers flocked around, as is usual in
these cases, and one of the crowd exclaimed to
the others, raise her up. Raise her!
repeated
the Frizzled Head, the last energies of
life trembling on her tongueRaise her!
none but Him who broke down the eternal
barriers
between the quick and the dead; who
called
at the mouth of the sepulchre, and awoke
the sleeping dust; who triumphed over death
and the grave, can raise this withered old trunk.
The hour is comeit is past. Wait, boyI
come. Her eyes closed, and she departed to a
better world.
The crowd dispersed, overwhelmed with terror;
and that night there was little sleep in the village
of Elsingburgh. The good housewife lay
wakeful
and afraid by the side of her tired husband,
VOL. I. 18
will be nothing left of the red-men but their
name, and their graves.
When the Rolling Thunder ceased, Dominie
Kanttwell arose and made a speech, which,
however zealous and well meant, only served to
exasperate the red kings. He treated their
ancient
belief with scorn; insulted their feelings
of national pride; scoffed at their modes of
thinking and acting; and drew a mortifying
contrast betwixt the ignorant barbarian
roaming
the woods, and the white-man enjoying the
comfort and security of civilized life. The
surrounding
Indians began to murmur; then to
gnash their teeth, and finally many of them,
starting up, seized their tomakawks, and uttered
the war-whoop. The Heer and his party were
now in imminent danger of falling victims to the
fury of the moment. But the
Rolling Thunder
arose, and, waving his hand for silence, spoke as
follows:
Red-men!hear me! The Long Knives
came here in peace, so let them depart. Let
us not imitate their treachery, by taking
advantage
of their confidence to destroy them.
Behold
!
I here extinguish the pipe of peace; I
break the belt of wampum, that was the symbol
of our being friends, and dig up the buried
CHAPTER IV.
If thou haddest prayed but halfe so muche to me,
As I have prayed to thy relykes and thee,
Nothynge concernynge myne occupacion,
But straighte shulde have wroughte one operation.
The Four P's
.
The
reader may chance to recollect the oath
of Governor Piper, that, notwithstanding the
opposition of the mysterious Bombie, the Long
Finne and the fair Christina should be wedded
on the morrow. Many days had elapsed, yet
Christina was not yet a wife, which shows how
careful people should be of taking rash oaths.
The Heer, in truth, had been too busy all this
while to attend to his own private affairs.
Besides
the vexatious trial and execution of
Cupid
,
and the eternal exhortations, threats, and
prophecies of his grandmother, there was a storm
gathering in the north, that menaced the
downfall
of his authority, as well as that of the
Swedish
crown in the new world. The king of
England
,
Charles the Second, being one day
informed
that Cornelius De Witt had caused to be
painted a great picture, or rather an abusive
picture, as his majesty was pleased to call it,
representing the said De Witt, with the
attributes
of a conqueror in a naval fight with
England
,
fell into a bad humour, and determined to
go to war with the Dutch.
A consequence of this war, as every body
knows, or ought to know, was the capture of
the Dutch possessions in what was called the
New-Netherlands, in North America, and a
surrender
of all their claims, by treaty, at the
conclusion
of peace. These claims, now reverting
to England, comprehended all the settlements
below Coaquanock, to the mouth of the
Delaware
river, although these were originally
founded
by the Swedes, who disallowed the Dutch
claim, and professed to hold under an express
grant or recognition from England. In this
complicated state of affairs, it was plain, that
the right of the strongest was worth all the rest
of these rights put together; and that,
consequently
,
the power of the good Heer rested on
a rather ticklish foundation. Several messages
had passed between him and Governor Lovelace,
of New-York, who, about this time, signified to
the Heer, that unless he agreed to a surrender
upon terms, he should in a few months send a
power adequate to force a surrender without any
terms at all. Governor Piper had received
sufficient
information from New-York, to satisfy him
that his power was totally incompetent to resist the
puissance of Governor Lovelace, and that he had
nothing to do but surrender at discretion,
whenever
the summons was given. He was,
therefore
,
just now, suffering the unpleasant
anticipation
of being shortly obliged to return to a
private
station, which, albeit that it is usually
denominated
the post of honour, is not much
coveted by most people, more especially those
who have been accustomed to posts of profit.
These public perplexities naturally drew off
the attention of Governor Piper from the affairs
of his daughter, who, on her part, however,
although she had consented to become the wife
of Koningsmarke, still discovered an
insurmountable
objection, in her behaviour,
actually
to commit matrimony with that youth.
We call him a youth, on account of his being so
much younger than ourselves, although, in
truth, he was not much under thirty years of
age, notwithstanding he looked younger.
Indeed
,
the struggles of poor Christina, betwixt
gratitude and love, on one hand, and filial
affection
VOL. II. 19
and duty towards the memory of her
mother
,
on the other, now that she was returned
to her home, and out of the reach of the daily
and hourly anxieties which occupied her during
her captivity, returned again as violently as
ever. The anticipation of her union with
Koningsmarke
afforded her no pleasure, and she
seized every pretext to elude or put aside his
solicitations to fulfil her own promise, and the
wishes of her father. As they walked one
evening along the little stream we have
heretofore
mentioned, they came to the place where
Koningsmarke had rescued Christina from the
pollution of the poor maniac. The sight of this
spot recalled more vividly to her recollection
the terrors of that horrible hour. She
shuddered
,
and looked in his face with an expression of
love and gratitude, that found its way to the
innermost folds of his heart.
What do I not owe thee, whispered she,
softly, at the same time pressing closely to his
side, as if terrified with the very phantom of her
memory.
Thou owest me nothingat least nothing
that thou canst not easily repay, replied
Koningsmarke
.
I ask nothing from gratitude,
every thing from love. Be mine, Christina, as
thou hast promised. Thy father wishes it.
And my mother? replied Christina, with
a penetrating look.
She is beyond the reach of this world,
replied
the youth. Nothing that passes here
below
,
nothing that thou canst do, or leave
undone
,
neither thy virtues nor thy crimes, can
reach her knowledge. The grave is the
eternal
barrier between the present and future state
of existence. It breaks the ties of kindred, it
severs the bonds of love and friendship. We
shall be rewarded and punished for the past, in
the future, and that is all. We cannot know
what is passing in this wretched world; we
cannot
look down from the skies, and see what is done
and suffered by those we love, and yet enjoy the
delights of beatitude. Christina, my beloved
Christina, do not sacrifice thy own happiness, as
well as mine; do not refuse to fulfil the wishes of
one parent, and that a living one, in a vain and
futile idea that it will rejoice the spirit of one that
is dead. Spirits never rejoice or grieve at aught
that passes here.
Did my father know what I know,
rejoined
Christina, he would spurn thee for asking,
and me for granting what thou askest.
But he knows it not, nor ever will know it.
Now that the tattling Bombie is gone, thou art
the only being on earth that knows how much
thou hast to forgive towards me. Once mine,
or even if never mine, I know thy generous
nature
will bury the secret from all the world
besides
.
But can I bury it so deep that it will not
haunt me, morning, noon, and night, as it doth
now? I cannot hide it from my own heart; it
is like the spectre to the guilty mind, and ever
seizes the moment of forgetfulness, to come,
when least expected, and dash away the cup of
bliss, just at the very lips.
Christina, said the Long Finne, in a severe
and solemn tone, I cannot endure this life much
longer. Weighed down, as I am, by the
recollections
of the past, I would not be, or even
seem, presumptuous, impatient, or unreasonable;
but why didst thou first give thyself to me? and,
why dost thou now withhold the gift? Be what
thou wilt, but be it wholly.
Why! exclaimed the unhappy girl,
bursting
into a paroxysm of passionate wowhy
is it that man, and woman too, are ever the sport
of conflicting duties and wishes? why is it that
the tenderness, or, if you will, the weakness of
woman's heart, so often betrays her reason,
and places her good name, her peace of mind,
her welfare, here and hereafter, in the power of
man? One moment, yes, even at this moment,
when the fate of my mother is full before my
eyes, who shall dare blame me, if, here on this
spot, where I myself was saved from a fate ten
times more dreadful, I should waver, like a
wretched being, as I am, between conflicting
feelings, wishes and duties? that when I call to
mind our captivity together, our mutual
dangers
,
and thy unwearied kindness, I should stand,
incapable of a lasting decision, fluctuating and
inconsistent
despicable
in mine own eyes,
perhaps
in the eyes of thy better judgment
promising
,
one day, what I shrink from performingmy
heart torn, my temper variable, my very reason
sometimes tottering under the weight of its
perplexities
?
Give me a little time, and I promise,
on the faith of woman, to be thine, as I have
covenanted
.
Well, then, replied he, tenderly, I will wait
with patience thy decision, and live, or rather
exist, in the anticipation of my happiness.
Happiness! rejoined the maid; believe it
not, hope it not: the recollections of former
times forbid it. Those who have not laid in
19*
the past a foundation for future happiness, have
erected their hopes on the sandin barrenness
and sterility.
The two lovers returned home, little satisfied
with themselves, or each other. Koningsmarke
accused Christina, in his own mind, of wavering
and caprice; and Christina herself suffered the
torments of self-reproach, as at one moment she
charged herself with forgetting the obligations
of filial duty, and the next, of being insensible
to love, founded on the sacred obligations of
gratitude
.
But these struggles were speedily
brought to an end by a train of events, which we
shall reserve for the next chapter.
CHAPTER V.
There came a knight of gallant fame,
Sir Robert Carre was hight his name,
On ship-board, with his jolly crew,
And said`Sir Piper, how dy'e do?'
We
have before taken occasion to allude to
certain disputes which were, ever and anon,
revived between the potent settlements of
New-York
and Elsingburgh, which, from time to time,
menaced the very existence of the latter. The
storm thickened every day, inasmuch, as that
King Charles, who, unquestionably, was of
happy
memory in his time, had granted all the
claims of the Dutch in North America to his
brother James, Duke of York, afterwards King
James the Second, also of blessed memory, in
his time. But, as the memory of kings, like
every sublunary thing, hath its day, it is but
fair to apprize the reader, who may be a little
rusty in history, in consequence of not having
paid due attention to the Waverley novels, that
neither of these illustrious princes are thought
much of in these days of impiety and
republicanism
.
However this may be, his Grace of York
forthwith took possession of the colony of New
Amsterdam, to which he obtained an undoubted
right; first, by conquest, and next, by
christening
it over again, whereby it acquired, and still,
happily, retains the name of New-York to this
day. This fair and renowned colony, with its
beautiful city, its Dutch burgomasters,
dumpling
dowagers, and cherry-cheeked girls, was
now governed in the name of the proprietary, by
Colonel Richard Lovelace, an old cavalier and
soldier, who had been an actor in the
Parliamentary
wars, and cherished a mortal antipathy to
puritans, republicans, and all sorts of people
who refused to drink, and who sung psalms
through their noses. Indeed, his politics
formed
the ruling principles of action with the
Coloel
,
who, among other matters, got tipsy every
afternoon, and turned his back upon all sorts of
meeting-houses; not so much out of an affection
for wine, or a hatred to religion, as because his
enemies, the puritans, or crop-ears, as he was
wont to call them, hated drinking, and loved
long prayers. With all this, he valued himself
upon his gallantry to the fair sex, and cherished
to the last a portion of that dignified courtesy
of damsels, particularly those that were young
and pretty, which constituted one of those
beautiful
characteristics, that threw something like
an air of refinement even over the barbarous
ages of chivalry.
Governor Lovelace professed, moreover, a
most bitter and sovereign contempt for the
king-people
of this free and high-spirited quarter of
our mundane sphere, derived from his early
habits
of thinking and acting. Passive obedience,
and non-resistance, were his creed, and in his
private
opinion worth all other commandments put
together; and if the Governor ever hated one
thing beyond all others, it was a person in
private
life who meddled with public affairs.
Writing, on one occasion, to his valiant captain,
Sir Robert Carre, on occasion of some troubles
in the, then, newly acquired possessions on the
lower Delaware, the Governor gravely observes:
as for the poor deluded sort, I think the
advice
of one of their own countrymen is not to
be despised, who, knowing their temper well,
prescribed a method for keeping them in order,
which is, severity, and laying such taxes on them
as may not give them liberty to entertain any
other thoughts, but how to discharge them.
This method we hereby humbly recommend to
Messieurs of the Holy Alliance, as summing up,
in the smallest possible compass, the
quintessence
of a pure system of legitimate government.
That they may be sure of receiving the benefit
of this precious morceau, we have specially
directed
our bookseller to transmit to each of the
Three Gentlemen of Verona, a copy of this
our work, with a reference to this particular
page.
There was one feature, and that a leading one,
in the character of Governor Lovelace, which,
however, in a great degree tempered and
neutralized
his tyrannical maxims of government.
He was the most indolent of all the
representatives
of majesty, that ever presided in this new
world, and his love of ease so equally balanced
his love of sway, that, although abstractedly the
greatest little tyrant in the world, he was not
guilty, so far as we have investigated the history
of those times, of a single act of oppression,
during the whole period he presided over the
colony. It is, indeed, a singular circumstance,
and only to be explained by this peculiarity in
his character, that this same Governor was the
identical person who voluntarily delegated a
great portion of his civil authority, in the city,
to a board of five aldermen, whereby he laid the
foundation of that puissant Council, which hath
since presided over our destinies, to the great
glory
and advantage of the community. One of
his regulations, most peculiarly praiseworthy,
and the revival of which we strenuously
recommend
,
was, that no play should be performed,
and no book published, until it had been first
read, and approved of, by the board of
Aldermen
.
As these worthy censors had very little
time, and no inclination to read books, the
number
of manuscripts multiplied exceedingly. His
Excellency boasted, that in consequence of this
simple expedient, the mischievous art of printing
became almost extinct in his dominion, and the
repose of his reign was not interrupted by the
intrusion of a single new book. Such was
Colonel
Richard Lovelace; a brave soldier, an
indolent
statesman, with a head none of the
clearest
,
and a heart never shut, except to
Presbyterians
,
Roundheads, and meddling politicians.
Governor Lovelace, soon after being quietly
settled in his government, despatched a
summons
to the Heer Piper, to surrender his town
and fort of Elsingburgh forthwith to the
obedience
of his Majesty King Charles the Second,
&c. The Heer declined the invitation,
inasmuch
as King Charles and his master were at
peace, and he had no inclination whatever to
disturb the harmony that reigned between them.
Anticipating, however, that this summons would
be followed by a visit, Governor Piper
despatched
the Long Finne and a party with
presents
to the neighbouring Indians, willing them
to take arms in his favour. This they declined,
with secret wishes, however, that the two
belligerants
would mutually exterminate each other.
In addition to this, the Heer fell into a violent
bustle, and incontinently busied himself for
several
days in doing nothing, as is customary
with people who talk a great deal and swear
roundly.
Thus waned away the time, until one
morning
,
a fine south wind blowing right up the
river
,
the little colony was alarmed with the sight
of three vessels of war, bearing upwards, their
sails all set, and colours flying, in gallant trim.
They came like birds upon the wing, each, as
the sailor say, when the white foam gathers in
waves at the bows, carrying a bone in her
teeth, and advancing so rapidly, that, ere the
wise heads of Elsingburgh could guess, or
reckon, what they wanted, or whither they were
going, conjecture was at an end, by the ships
coming to anchor directly opposite the town, as
if in scorn of the formidable battery of swivels
erected for its defence. Lob Dotterel wanted
to call out the
posse comitatus
, and take these
intruders into custody, but his ardour was
restrained
by the Heer, who anticipated, with
exceeding
low spirits, the speedy termination of
the Sweedish dynasty in this new hemisphere.
He felt his greatness tottering, and undoubtedly
soliloquized on the slippery nature of human
power, after the manner of Cardinal Wolsey,
and other great men.
In less than an hour, a boat put off from the
largest ship, bearing a white flag, in token of
peace, as is customary, when a message is sent,
which, if not complied with, is to be followed
by blows. This boat conveyed the famous Sir
Robert Carre, one of those brave and hardy
adventurers, who preceded, or followed, the
discovery
of this new world. They were a species
of knights errant, who, instead of being enlisted
in the cause of love and beauty, set forth to
seek their fortunes on the high seas, or in the
new world, where rumours of boundless wealth
allured them to risk all, and float on the tide
which then began to set towards the west. The
greater portion of these were most devout enemies
VOL II. 20
to the pope and the Spaniards; against whom they
waged perpetual war, pretty much regardless
whether the respective countries were at peace or
not, religious zeal and antipathies being held as
sufficient causes for making war, independently of
those grounds of complaint which are usually
put forth to justify an appeal to arms. These
adventurers were, unquestionably, men of talents
and bravery, but, if the truth must be fold, they
were no great respecters of property, and thought
little of plundering a town on the Spanish Main,
or boarding a galleon, without the ceremony of
inquiring whether the laws of nations justified
the act. They belonged, generally, to the
race of younger brothers; which, in countries
like England, where the estate is principally
monopolized
by the first born, has produced a
large portion of those whose crimes have
dishonoured
,
or whose bravery and talents have
exalted and ennobled the national character.
Although it would be gross injustice to class
these wild, adventurous spirits, with the bloody
and desperate race of buccaniers which
succeeded
them, still we think, it cannot be doubted that
they in some measure prepared the way for those
remorseless enemies of the human race. The
custom of making war upon the Spanish
settlements
in the new world, in the loose and
unauthorized
manner practised by the first
adventurers
,
gradually loosened the restraints imposed
by the laws of nations, and in the end led to that
entire abandonment of principle, and that total
disregard of the claims of justice and humanity,
which characterized those wretched miscreants
called the buccaniers, whose very courage
constituted
the greatest of their crimes, since it
conquered the only restraint which villains
acknowledge
in the commission of enormities.
Sir Robert Carre was a man of few words,
which peculiarity rendered him particularly
disagreeable
to the Heer, who liked very much to
talk a great deal before he came to a decision.
The knight laconically, and categorically,
demanded
the surrender of Elsingburgh and its
dependencies to the Governor of New-York, as
representative of the King of England, to whom
the right to all these territories appertained, by
discovery, purchase, conquest, and various other
grounds, each of which was amply sufficient to
establish the right of the strongest. Governor
Piper comprehended, pretty clearly, that he
must positively comply with this request, or
demand
,
because the hostile force was amply
sufficient
to level his town and fort to the dust in
two hours at farthest. But the good man
wisely
determined to put a bold face on the business,
and not ignominiously surrender, without a long
discussion, which he looked upon as the next
best thing to a stout defence
vi et armis
. In
short, he was resolved upon a negotiation, let
what would happen, and privately
stipulated
with himself to have at least threescore and
ten articles for the security of the persons and
property of his people, and the honour of his
government, in the capitulation. Preparatory
to this he pompously demanded four and twenty
hours to consider of this summons. But Carre
was a person equally averse to wasting time as
words; he, therefore, very unceremoniously,
replied, that as it was impossible to make any
defence, there was very little use in considering
about it; he therefore allowed him twenty-four
minutes, instead of twenty-four hours, to decide.
Der teufel!
quoth the Heer, that is not
time enough to decide which side of the mouth I
shall smoke my pipe this morning, much less to
settle about the surrender of a whole province.
Well, but if there is no choice, where is the
use of taking time to consider? If a man must,
he must, Governor.
Must!
du galgen!
I see no must in
the case. I would have thee to know, sir
Knight, if it were not for the shedding of
christian
blood, to which I have much disinclination,
being partly convinced by my friend William
Penn, that there is no use for it in this world, I
would, peradventure, blow thee and thy ships
sky high,
henckers knechts
and all.
No use in shedding christian blood!
exclaimed
the Knight. Why, dn my blood,
Governor, if I don't think you've turned papist.
Why, 'sblood! what would become of us
soldiers
,
if there was to be no cutting of throats,
hey? Would you make rascal leather aprons of
us, and set us cheating in a small way for a
living
,
instead of growing rich by plundering
towns, and noble feats of arms? But come, the
time is just out; is it capitulation, or must I
wipe thy town out of the map of the universe in
the twinkling of an eye?
Patiencepatience, Sir Knight; where is
the use of being so hasty? You see I am in no
hurry.
Faith, Governor, replied the other, that is
generally the case. There is all the difference
in the world between one who gives and one
who takes; but come, security of person and
property is the word, and where these are safe,
what signifies a change of masters, hey?
And the honour of the Swedish crown?
replied the Heer.
Oh! as to that it shall be as full of honour as
an egg's full of meat. I shall take special care
of that myself!
And our religion?
Nobody shall touch a hair of its head. You
may have just what you like, and as much as
you will, always excepting popery, which I
have sworn against, and Presbyterianism, which
his Excellency Governor Lovelace doth not
abide, drunk or sober.
Well, well, quoth the Heer, with a long
and deep-drawn sigh, if I could keep it from
thee, I would bury thee, thy comrades, thy
Governor
,
and thy King, in the sand of this good
river, ere I would give up my sword. As
it ishere, take it; and now I am resigned to
the lot of a private man, a situation which all
great persons fall in love with, when they can
do no better. I will retire unto my little farm
yonder, and plant cabbages, like another
Dioclesian
.
So saying, the Heer delivered up his trusty
blade; and thus the dominion of New
Swedeland
passed from the superintendence of the
Heer Piper forever. No prodigy, that we know
of, accompanied this transfer of empire, which,
by the way, Dominie Kanttwell pronounced a
judgment upon the people of Elsingburgh, who
about this time began somewhat to relapse into
the wicked practice of ballad singing.
After taking formal possession of Elsingburgh
and its dependencies, in the name of his
sovereign
,
firing a salute in honour of his conquest,
and appointing a provisional junta, Sir Robert
Carre weighed anchor, and returned with his
fleet to New-York, where, on reporting his
success, his Excellency Governor Lovelace
gave a great turtle feast, at which his five
newly created aldermen are reported to have
done great credit to the Governor's selection,
by their excellent judgment in eating. The
only remarkable circumstance which followed
the capture of Elsingburgh was the mysterious
disappearance of the Long Finne, who was
missing from the time of Sir Robert's departure;
but whether he went with him, was kidnapped,
or forcibly carried off, or what was become of
him, none knew, or, at least, if any one did
know, the secret was kept with singular
discretion
.
Various were the conjectures of the people of
the village, as to the strange disappearance of
the youth; but, as not one of these came near
the truth, we shall not trouble the reader with
reciting them. The good Heer was sorely
perplexed
,
and could not help reverting to those
suspicions which had arisen in his mind on the
first appearance of the Long Finne, as related
in the early part of this history. These
suspicions
were strengthened by the insinuations of
Othman Pfegel and the Dominie, who both
related
certain mysterious facts concerning
Koningsmarke
,
which, whether true or false,
afforded
grounds for a suspicion that there was a
good understanding betwixt him and the
English
commander. As to our poor blue-eyed
village maid, the fair and gentle Christina,
though her feelings were kept to herself, or, at
least, vented only in solitude and darkness, yet
we can venture to affirm, that she had her own
thoughts of this mysterious affair. Young
women
,
and especially young women in love,
judging
by themselves, are prone to ascribe every
action of their lovers to the influence of that
single passion, which, while it subsists in all its
youthful warmth and purity, is their own guide
and polar star. Christina thus attributed the
disappearance of Koningsmarke, not to any
treasonable practices against the colony, or any
fear of discovery and punishment, but to pique
or disappointment, on account of her having so
often resisted his persuasions for a speedy union.
But if so, he will think better of it, and return
speedily, would she say to her innocent heart,
which, even at that moment, trembled with a
latent fear, lest the promised hope should never
be realized. Every hour that passed away
without bringing him back, diminished her
confidence
in the hope of his return; and when a
fortnight had elapsed, without either seeing or
hearing of him, her pale cheek and dim eye, her
careless dress, and her indifference to those little
domestic cares and incidents which so pleasantly
and beneficially employ the hours of woman, all
combined, served to indicate to an observing eye,
that harassing state of feeling, which, when
long continued, either triumphs over the body
or the mind.
VOL. II. 21
BOOK NINTH.
CHAPTER I.
A critical
friend of ours, whom we consult
in all our literary projects, and whose opinions
we always follow, when we like them, assures
us that this our work will undoubtedly fail in
attracting the affections of that class of
fashionable
readers to whom we especially address
ourselves
,
for want of the indispensable requisite of
a reasonable quantity of bloodshed and
murder
.
All the works of imagination, said
he, which have been the most singularly
successful
of late, you will observe, abound in
battle
,
murder, and sudden deaths, events for
which people of a pure natural taste have a
peculiar
relish, as is evinced in the avidity with
which they peruse the accounts of last dying
speeches and executions. All writers,
continued
our critical monitor, agree, that what is
most agreeable to nature, in narration,
sentiment
,
or description, approaches the nearest to
the true standard of taste; and, consequently,
the vulgar taste must come the nearest to
perfection
,
being the least sophisticated by arbitrary
rules, or factitious refinements. It is, therefore,
a happy omen for literature, that the
fashionable
taste is now making daily approaches to
that of the vulgar, and no longer banquets with
such extraordinary zest on those refinements in
sentiment, those polished graces, and latent
beauties, which, in less happy ages of
literature
,
were relished with such unaccountable
delight
.
Such effeminacies as these have given
place to more manly and unsophisticated
compositions
to
delineations of habits and
manners
,
which, being natural and vulgar in
themselves
,
are calculated to enchant all persons of
a truly natural taste. The writer who would
please the public now, must deal in perpetual
excitements; must lavish incidents like chaff
before the wind; and excite either disgust,
astonishment, or horror, in every page, or his
book will certainly come upon the parish before
it is six months old.
Our friend further assured us, that, as he saw
21*
no possibility of bringing the catastrophe of our
history to a fortunate issue, the best thing we
could do, would be to kill off all our principal
actors as fast as possible, for which purpose he
advised us to borrow the assistance of
Tristan
L'Hermite, Trois Echelles
, and other
pleasant
fellows, equally expert at hanging and
joking, who give such a marvellous zest to the
late work of our great master in the mysteries
of historical fiction. But, notwithstanding what
our friend said on this subject, we cannot but
hope, and believe, that the good people of this
country, owing to the mildness of their laws,
and other circumstances, are not so fond of
hanging, and such like amusements, as some
of the more refined nations of the world. We
trust they may possibly be brought to relish
less piquant entertainments, and that, although
they do stick pegs in the claws of lobsters to
prevent their biting, and sometimes cut off the
heads of chickens with a dull axe, they will,
peradventure
,
excuse us if we finish this our work
without a single additional instance of
mortality
,
natural or otherwise, or resorting to the aid
of our old friends, Messrs. Trois Echelles and
Tristan L'Hermite.
CHAPTER II.
If ye be set on mervaylynge,
Then shall ye heare a mervaylouse thing
And though, indeed, all be not new,
Yet suer the most part shall be true.
Time
and the world alike move on unceasingly
and in the self-same undeviating pace, let what
will happen. The keenest misfortunes of
individuals
,
the death of men who have filled the
world with their glory, the change of dynasties,
and the revolutions of empires, affect not the
general course of events, or the great business
of the human bee-hive. The daily wants of
mankind, the necessity of exertion, the
gratification
of the passions, one or other, or all
combined
,
still keep up the busy current of life,
which continues its course without ceasing, and
will only be finally arrested, when the
consummation
of the great scheme of infinite wisdom
and power shall have arrived.
Three weeks had now nearly elapsed, since
the total subversion of the authority of the Heer,
and the mysterious disappearance of the Long
Finne. The inhabitants of Elsingburgh
continued
in the quiet pursuit of their daily
avocations
,
and scarcely ever thought of the great
revolution that had overturned, in the language
of historians, their happiness and prosperity. It
was only the Heer and his gentle daughter, on
whom this wave of ill fortune had especially
expended
its violence. The former not only felt
his diminished consequence, but now actually
experienced what may be truly called one of the
greatest misfortunes incident to human nature.
Being restricted from all participation in the
new government, he knew not what to do with
himself, and was at length reduced to the
necessity
of taking two naps extra, to assist him in
getting through the livelong, tedious day. The
fiend Ennui laid hold of him with leaden gripe,
and, had it not been that he at last luckily took
to the Job-like business of fishing inveterately in
the neighbouring river for amusement, it is
impossible
to say what might have been the ill
consequences, to a man having nothing to do,
and at the same time being naturally inclined to
be busy. As for poor Christina, she complained
not, she wept not, except in secret; and to
those who judge of the depths of the waters by
the noise they make, rather than by their
stillness
,
she seemed as if nothing was the matter
with her.
In this state were the various persons and
things appertaining to our history, when, on a
certain night, there gathered together, about the
spacious chimney of Master Oldale's castle, a
group of village blades, whose deeds of
drinking
used to stand recorded in veritable chalk,
in one corner of that
sanctum sanctorum
,
vulgarly
'yclept the bar. The company consisted of
Wolfgang Langfanger, Othman Pfegel, and
Lob Dotterel, who, being each equally deprived
of their vocation under the ancient system of
Elsingburgh, were compelled, in sheer
self-defence
,
to pass part of the time at the inn, to hear
the news, and kill the common enemy of all
idlers. Besides these, there was master Oldale,
who, like a trusty publican and sinner, that
understood
his business, was ever accustomed to
encourage the practice of tippling, not only by
precept, but by example. The fifth personage,
who completed the group, was a singular
itinerant
genius, called Lowright, a traveling
pedler
,
tinker, and what not, who regularly
traversed
the wilderness between New-York and
the river Delaware, once a year, with his pack
on his back, and as regularly, as is usual with
such losel wights, did incontinently cheat about
one half of the men, and all the women of
Elsingburgh
.
He was well known, and, to say
truth, not much respected, not only among the
Indians, but also by the inhabitants of the little
villages, that now began to peep forth in groups
of log huts, at intervals few and far between,
in the desert. Mankind unquestionably have a
natural aptitude to be cheated in one way or
other; sometimes by rulers, sometimes by
priests, and sometimes by pedlers. Besides,
Lowright was not only a pestilent rogue, but a
merry rogue, who sung excellent songs, told the
most bloody stories, and withal never cheated
any body but in jest. When charged with his
rogueries, he always turned them off with an
excellent joke, accompanied by an irresistible
laugh; and it is well known, that if you keep
people, and especially women, in a good
humour
,
you may cheat them out of any thing.
Much of the news that passed between
New-York
and Elsingburgh was brought by this
strolling wight; for at that time it was a rare
thing for any one to venture on a journey
through this wild country.
It was now waxing late in the evening; the
night was becoming excessively dark, and the
flashes of lightning which penetrated the
crevices
of the windows, followed by the distant and
muttering thunder, gave indication of a coming
storm. The conversation turned on the late
events of the village, and especially the fate of
the goblin Cupid, and his mysterious
grandmother
,
whose night walkings still continued the
common theme of the village. Lob Dotterel
was called upon to verify these legends, and,
after
whetting his whistle, looking cautiously
about the room, and drawing his chair a little
more within the circle, cleared his throat, and
attested to the following facts, in the midst of peels
of thunder, that now became more loud and
frequent
:
You must know, said the ci-devant high
constable, that one nightit was the
Wednesday
night following the death of Cupid and his
grandmotherI had been out late on business.
Here master Oldale tipped the company a wink,
which conveyed to their comprehension that
Lob had been tippling at the sign of the Indian
Queen, rather more than beseemed a discreet,
sober man. When I got home, I proceeded
to undress myself, and was just standing before
the glass, tying on my nght-cap, when, as I am
a christian man and a living sinner, I saw in the
glass the face of the black witch Bombie,
looking
just over my shoulder, with eyes as red as
coals, and lips moving as if she was speaking,
though I could hear nothing. I looked round,
though my head moved on my shoulders like a
door on rusty hinges, but nobody was there.
I looked in the glass, and there was the ghastly
face glaring over my shoulder as before, with
red eyes, and blue lips moving with a quivering
motion, without uttering a word. Often, as I
turned my head to look behind me, I saw
nothing
;
but the moment I turned to the looking
glass, the face appeared, just peering over my
shoulder. Presently I felt two cold hands on
my back, and the face in the glass came so
close to mine, that I felt its breath against my
cheek.
I never heard of a ghost breathing before,
said Lowright; but maybe the spirits of ladies
of colour are different from those of white
people
.
Go on, master constable.
The weight of the hands on my shoulders
grew heavier and heavier, till at last I fell flat
on my face upon the floor, unable to support it
any longer. What time I lay there I can't tell,
but when I came to myself, and looked about,
there was nothing in the room but old Grip, the
dog, who lay fast asleep in a corner.
As master Dotterel concluded his story, there
came a terrible flash of lightning, followed by
an awful crash of thunder, that seemed to have
dashed the universe to atoms. The company
gradually contracted their little circle, until
their knees mixed with each other, and, late as
it was, no one seemed inclined to go to rest, amid
the uproar without and the solemnity within
doors. The crash was followed by an awful
silence, until the tinker exclaimed, There will
be bitter weather by and by, and, for my part, I
could never sleep in a thunder storm. Come,
landlord, another tankard, and master
Wolfgang
will tell us a story, to pass away the
time.
The tankard was brought, and master
Wolfgang
,
at the request of the company, commenced
his story as follows:
Many years ago, it was in my native
country
of Sweden, I happened once to be benighted
at a distance of several miles from any house.
It was in the summer season, and much such a
night as this. The thunder rolled incessantly,
followed by continued flashes of lightning which
blinded both me and my horse. By the light
VOL. II. 22
of one of these, I thought I could distinguish an
old ruined building, that I took to be the
remains
of a church, which I knew from report
was situated somewhere hereabouts. I heard
the roar of the tempest approaching nearer and
nearer, while the big drops of rain began to fall
thicker and faster every moment. There was
no alternative, but to weather the storm without
a shelter, or seek it in the old church, which,
though the windows were broken and the doors
decayed, was still better than nothing. I had
an invincible antipathy to churches and
churchyards
at night; but then I hated a wet jacket even
more than I feared ghosts; so I e'en
dismounted
,
led my horse inside of the door, and groped
my way into a pew in one corner, where there
was tolerable shelter. Presently the rain came
in torrents, the thunder rolled, and burst, and
crashed, and the lightning flashed upon the
white tombstones, that peeped above the sills of
the windows. Soon I began to feel the
effects
of a long day's journey, and, stretching
myself out on the seat, I gradually fell fast asleep.
After some time, I was disturbed by a strange
sound, not unlike the tremulous quaver of the
screech-owl, `hoo! hoo! hoo!' I opened my
eyes, and the first object they met was a tall,
ghastly female figure, leaning over me, with
her face close to mine. During my nap it had
cleared up, and the bright moonbeams, pouring
into the windows, and ruined roof and walls,
fell directly on the spectre before me. To my
dying
day, I shall never forget the lank face,
hollow
cheeks, and glaring eyes of the figure, as,
with raised hands, the long, skinny, and bony
fingers of which were extended over me, it
repeated
the quaver, in a shrill, hollow tone, and
bent down and kissed me, with lips that seemed
covered with the damps and mildews of the
sepulchre
.
I shrunk, and shuddered as if death
had sealed me his own in that horrible kiss,
which was followed by the same tremulous
`hoo! hoo! hoo!' My limbs refused to obey
the impulse of my fears, and, for the life of me
I could not make a single effort to escape, but
felt as I had sometimes done in dreams, where
we struggle in vain to stir hand or foot. At
this moment the day began to dawn, and a gun
from a neighbouring fortress announced the
morning. The figure started at the explosion,
which broke on the deathlike silence, and echoed
far and wide. `Hoo! hoo! hoo!' cried the
spectre of horror, as she stooped again and gave
me one of her infernal kisses. She then moved
slowly away, and disappeared, I could not tell
how, in the obscurity of a distant corner of the
ruined building.
When I was assured of its being gone, I
started up, mounted my horse, and proceeded
rapidly to a village about four miles distant,
where I ordered breakfast. I had scarcely been
here half an hour when I heard the same noise
which had alarmed me so much in the church.
`What is that?' I exclaimed, as one of the
attendants
came in. `Oh,' replied she, `'tis only
a poor crazy woman, that wanders about these
parts, but never hurts any body, and never says
any thing but `hoo! hoo! hoo!' `And kisses
every body?' `Nothey say she only kisses
those who are going to die very soon.' I kept
the secret of her salute, although, to tell the
honest truth, gentlemen, I considered myself,
for a whole year afterwards, as little better than
a dead man. This happened more than twenty
years ago, and yet, at times, and especially in
such a night as this, the impression of my
adventure
in the old ruined church is as fresh as
if it had happened yesterday. But come,
master Lowright, the night wears apace, and
there is no venturing out in the uproar and
darkness. You must keep us company in
another
tankard and another story.
With all my heart, replied the jolly
pedler
;
let me whet my whistle, and you shall
have a story that will astonish you all. The
tankard passed round, and master Lowright
commenced his legend.
You must know, gossips, that, though I
come from New-York, I don't live in the city,
but in a deep forest about four miles off on the
island, where every thing is as wild, and in as
perfect a state of nature, as it was the day of the
deluge. My house is of a single story,
containing
a single room, which serves me for
parlour, kitchen, and hall. My bed is in the
attic story above, and is gained by means of a
ladder. I have no family, except a dog and a
cat, and there is not a house within sight of my
solitary abode. Why I have chosen such a
situation
is an affair of my own, and I shall,
therefore
,
not trouble you with my reasons for
preferring
this retired and lonely spot.
One summer evening, I was sitting smoking
my pipe at the door of my castleit was
somewhere
,
I think, about four years agowhen I
observed a man coming towards me, with a staff
in his hand, and dressed in the style of a
common
22*
beggar. As he advanced up the little
path which led to my dwelling, I observed that
he was tall and straight in his person, and that
his face was remarkably handsome. Altogether,
indeed, he was the likeliest person I have seen
in a long time, except the young man called the
Long Finne, who was here last year, and
whom I saw carried to prison in New-York the
other day. What! exclaimed Wolfgang
Langfanger, is the Long Finne in
New-York
?
Ay, that he is, to his cost, for he
is condemned to be whipt through the streets,
and afterwards sold to Barbadoes as a slave, for
having conspired, it is said, with the savages,
against the English power. But I will go on
with my story, for I see master Dotterel begins
to wax sleepy.
As the beggar approached me, he
began
,
in the usual way, to beg for a lodging, as
the night was setting in dark, and the path to
the city, being through the woods, would be
difficult to find. `But I have only one bed in
my house,' replied I, `and that I generally like
to keep to myself.'
`Beggars must not be choosers,' replied he;
`I can sleep on the hearth by the fire. I have
made harder lodging than that in my time, and
so I have wherewithal over my head, I care
little
what is under it, provided it is not harder
than a stone.'
`But,' replied I, `I know you not; I live
alone here in the woods, and it is not usual to
take people in our houses, without knowing
something of them.'
`What!' quoth the beggar, looking round
on my poor household with a dry, sarcastic air,
`you are afraid I shall rob you? Only to think
of the difference between us! I am equally a
stranger to you, and yet, you see, I am not
afraid to sleep in your house. But the beggar
sings before the robber.'
The humour of the rogue pleased me; I
at length consented that he should stay the
night, and make his pillow on the hearth stone.
We sat up till almost midnight, chatting over
our adventures, and then went to bed. But
some how or other, I couldn't sleep; or, if I did
fall asleep for a moment, it was only to be
awakened
with frightful dreams. On one of these
occasions, I thought I heard a stir in the room
below, and, cautiously creeping to the opening,
saw a sight that froze every drop of my blood
into an icicle.
What was it? exclaimed Lob Dotterel,
opening one eye, and drawing his chair closer
into the corner.
It was the beggar, busily employed in
whetting the point of a knife, that appeared to
me at least a yard long. Ever and anon he
would feel the point, shake his head, as much
as to say, `it won't do yet,' and then set to
work sharpening it again. I had not the least
doubt that he intended to murder me, under an
impression that I had hoarded up money in my
business. I therefore prepared myself for
defending
my life as well as I could. I had a
pistol, but, unluckily, it wanted a lock, and an
old rusty sword, without edge or point.
Ay, quoth master constable, like one of
your excellent razors. Or rather, like your
excellent wit, replied the pedler, and
incontinently
got the laugh on his side.
What was to be done? I began to distil
into
a jelly, and felt both courage and strength
fast fleeting away, as too often happens in these
hours of sore extremity. Desperation at last
supplied the place of valour and discretion, and
I determined, instead of waiting till the wretch
had sharpened his knife, so as to stick me
through and through in the twinkling of an eye,
to come upon him by surprise, and carry the
war into his own camp. I therefore
suddenly
plumped down upon him, with my trusty
blade in handand what d'ye think, gentlemen,
was the consequence?
Why, you killed him, said the whole
company
with one voice.
No! he killed me!
Here the whole company started up, as if by
one impulse, and stared in silent horror at
master
Lowright, marvelling whether it was really
himself sitting among then, or only the ghost
of himself.
At the moment of this ecstatic climax of
wonder
and dismay, there was a loud crash of
thunder, succeeded by a tremendous bouncing,
thumping, howling, and shrieking, in the garret
above, that appalled the stoutest hearts of the
whole company, and caused each man to press
close to his neighbour in trembling agitation.
Presently something was heard to fall, with a
weight that shook the floor, through the
opening
which led by a ladder into the attic story;
the lamp, that stood nearly under it, was
suddenly
extinguished, and there was a hissing,
and spitting, and howling, in the darkness, as if
the fiends had suddenly decamped from their
ordinary abodes, to take lodgings at master
Oldale's castle. All was horror, dismay, and
confusion; not a soul dared stir from the spot
where he was planted, and not a soul uttered a
word, save the ci-devant high constable, who,
on this occasion, disgraced his valorous
exploits
among the Indians, by roaring lustily for
help, being fast held by the leg, by Othman
Pfegel
,
who had tumbled flat on the floor. The
cry brought mistress Oldale, with a candle,
which at once disclosed the cause of all this
uproar
,
in the persons of two cats, who had,
agreeably to the custom of these amiable
animals
,
been making cruel love, after the
manner
of certain affectionate couples, who act upon
the old saying, that the falling out of lovers is
the renewal of love. The discovery forthwith
put an end to the merry making. Each man
felt an internal consciousness of having been
frightened at nothing, and sneaked away to
bed, without the ceremony of bidding good
night.
CHAPTER III.
He is in prison, let us go to him
He cannot come to us. His thoughts alone are free:
They'll fly abroad, like to old Noah's bird,
And tell him that the earth affords no place
Of rest but thatno friend to take his hand,
And buoy him above the boundless waves.
Let's go to him.
News
fly swift every where, but most of all
in a country village. It was soon
communicated
to the Heer Piper and his fair daughter,
that the Long Finne had been carried a prisoner
to New-York, and condemned to be whipt, and
sold to slavery. The pedler was called up, and
stated, that the youth had been seized the night
before the sailing of the fleet, as he was taking
a solitary walk along the river side; conveyed
on board the ships; transported to New-York;
tried for treasonable practices; condemned, and
sentenced to these ignominious punishments.
Such indeed was the sad story of
Koningsmarke
,
who had been seized and taken to
New-York
in manner aforesaid, and there brought
to trial before the Governor and his council. It
was in vain that he asserted his innocence, and
that at the time he was accused of these crimes
he was a subject of Sweden, and owed no
allegiance
to any other power, much less a power
which exercised no authority in
New-Swedeland
.
He was answered, that the Swedes from
the first had no right to the territory they
occupied
,
which, in fact, appertained to Great
Britain
by discovery. Koningsmarke was
therefore
living under an usurped government, and
could claim no immunity on the score of not
owing allegiance to a power which, though not
actually in possession, always had the right.
The council, consisting of the Governor,
Thomas
Delaval, and Ralph Whitfield, on these
grounds, decreed as follows:
That Koningsmarke, commonly called the
Long Finne, deserved to die; yet, in regard
that many concerned with him in these
practices
might also be involved in the prmunire,
if the rigour of the law should be extended, and
amongst them divers ignorant and simple
people
,
it was thought fit to order, that the Long
Finne should be severely whipt, and stigmatized
with the letter R, with an inscription in great
letters
on his breast, that he received that
punishment
for rebellion; and afterwards to be secured
till sent to Barbadoes, or some other remote
plantation, to be sold.
When Christina heard of this terrible
sentence
,
her heart failed her, and she sunk
insensible
into the arms of her father. Every species
of bitter, indelible disgrace was combined in
this punishment; and who is there, that
cherishes
a friend, or adores a lover, but would
rather have heard that he was dead, than thus
scourged, branded, and sold to slavery? When
Christina came to herself, she desired to be
conducted to her chamber and left alone.
After
remaining there an hour or two, she sent for
her father, who found her pale, feeble, and
nearly
exhausted with the misery of her feelings.
Yet there was a speaking energy in her light
blue eye, that indicated she was labouring with
some resolve that possessed her whole soul.
How art thou now, my dear daughter?
said the Heer.
Wellvery well, replied Christina; but,
my father, I have one request to make thee,
which, as thou valuest my happiness, nay, my
very life, I beseech thee to grant me. Wilt
thou?
VOL. II. 23
What is it, my dear one? answered the
Heer, with affectionate sympathy; it must be
impossible, if I refuse it to thee. What is it?
Christina looked wistfully in his face, and
replied
He
saved my life; he bore me in his
arms, as a mother her only offspring; he
watched
over me in the wilderness; he risked death
and torture in the attempt to restore me to
thee; and shall not I do something to requite
all these obligations?
All that can be done to rescue him from
this disgrace and misery shall be done. I will
send, and demand him as a subject of my
master
.
Alas! replied Christina, when I wanted
his aid, he did not send; he came himself; he
risked all for me, and shall not we risk
something
for him? Let us not send, but go to him,
father. Kindness should never come at second
hand. Even those who cannot ward off the
calamities of others, may alleviate them by
sympathy.
But think, my love, what will the world
say of thy pilgrimage? Will they not taunt
thee with the reproach of following a degraded,
condemned criminala lover, whose affection
is thy disgrace, and whom to love is infamy?
Father, replied Christina, I know that
it is for the honour and happiness of my sex,
that they should, in all the ordinary
circumstances
of life, conform to the strict rules of
female
decorum, and pay due deference to the
opinions of the world. But I also know, father,
that there are times and occasions, when love,
gratitude, filial duty, parental affection,
attachment
to our country, nay, even the desire of
fame, not only justify, but demand a departure
from common rules, and the sacrifice of those
delicate restraints, which otherwise should never
be disregarded. To save a husband, I should be
applauded for this act, even though he were
unworthy
my affection. Shall I not do likewise
for one to whom gratitude at least has bound
me for ever?
But think of the toils and dangers of the
journey, my daughter.
Thou forgettest, father, replied Christina,
with a languid smilethou forgettest I am
used to traverse the wilderness. The errand I
go upon will make me heedless of the way,
except
as it may delay our efforts till they shall be
too late.
Ah! replied the old man, with a
melancholy
,
doubting shake of the head, come when
they will, I fear all our endeavours will be too late,
or, at least, in vain. What hast thou to offer,
to tempt the statesman to forgo an act of policy
like this?
My tears, my thanks, my prayers, my
everlasting
gratitude. Surely, father, the hearts of
men are not turned into stone by the exercise
of power, nor can they be insensible to the
delight
of making the heart leap in the bosom of
a lonely stranger.
Well, wellI will no longer oppose thee,
my girl. We will go, in God's name; and, if
it be necessary, I, even I, will humble myself
before Richard Lovelace, rather than see thee
mourn thyself into a shadow, and die of a broken
heart. I have lost thee once, and know the
agonies of such a bereavement. We will go,
and speedily.
Christina threw herself into the arms of her
parent, and exclaimed amid her tearsOh!
that I may live to repay my father for all his
kindness.
When it was known that the Heer and his
daughter were going to undertake this long
journey, part of which was through a forest, as
yet trodden only by wild beasts and red-men,
with now and then a wandering being like
Low-right
,
half a dozen of the villagers came in a
body, and offered their services to escort their
ancient chief and his daughter. We will
paddle a canoe for you to the Falls, and we
will carry you in a litter of boughs, when the
way is wet and deep, or you become tired.
The Heer was affected by their good will, and,
shaking the hand of each, accepted their offers,
with hearty thanks. Even in the
depression
of his feelings, and amid the downfall of
his power, the heart of the Heer swelled with
honest pride, to find that, though the means of
bestowing benefits on his neighbours had passed
away, they still remembered his kindness in the
days of his prosperity. So easy, indeed, is it
for rulers to make themselves beloved by the
people, that whenever we hear the cries of the
multitude ascending against kings and their
ministers, and see their arms raised in
opposition
to their will, we are certain that pride,
arrogance
,
misgovernment, and oppression, are at
the bottom of this discontent.
23*
CHAPTER IV.
Not all the roses grafted on her cheeks,
Not all the graces dancing in her eyes,
Not all the music set upon her tongue,
Nor all the lilies that lie on her breast
In dazzling whiteness, are of half the worth
Of that true faith, which is a woman's crown.
In
two days all was ready; and one calm
morning
,
in the merry month of June, our little party
embarked on the flood tide that set briskly up
the river, in their light canoe. A gentle
southern
breeze rippled the surface of the waters, and
cooled the summer air into a balmy freshness,
exquisitely
grateful to the senses. First, they
passed Coaquanock, then a little thriving
village
,
but since become a noble city, honoured
in its illustrious founder, and thrice honoured in
the residence of a sage whose precepts
enlightened
,
whose example adorned a subsequent age.
Light skimmed the pine canoe along the low
banks; fringed with tufts of water willows, that
bent down and kissed the waves, as they
approached
the little settlements of Burlington and
Bristol, where a few clear fields around a cluster
of rustic buildings, announced the
commencement
of that great change in the aspect of the
country, and the destinies of its ancient
inhabitants
,
which is rapidly pervading the new world,
and will probably not stop, until it has passed
from the Atlantic of the East to the shores of
the Ocean of the West, with an impulse
unabating
and irresistible.
The Falls, where Trenton now stands, was the
last settlement of white-men on the upper
Delaware
.
From thence was one wide extended
forest
,
through which roamed the Tirans, the
Tiascons
,
the Raritans, and a hundred other
wandering
tribes, long since extinct, or represented
by a few degenerate beings, who seem only to
live for the purpose of proving that the red-man was
born for the shade, the white-man for the sunshine.
All these were now on good terms with their new
neighbours from Europe, and our little party
journeyed, unmolested, from the falls, through the
forest, along where the classic fanes of
Princeton
now attract the youth of our country from
all quarters; where Kingston, and Brunswick,
and Woodbridge, and Rahway, now swarm with
a little busy fry, but where at that time no trace
of cultivation was to be seen, till they came into
the vicinity of Elizabeth Town, then just settled.
Christina and the good Heer, when fatigued with
walking, or when the way was more than
commonly
rough, or obstructed, were carried by
their faithful escort on a litter of boughs; and
when they came to a stream that was not
fordable
,
they launched their light canoe, and paddled
to the other side.
At what is called Elizabeth-Town Point,
where they were sorely annoyed by moschettoes,
our little party embarked on the tide that carried
them rapidly through the Kills. Neither the
waters nor the land on either side presented the
gay and moving scene that they do now. No
oyster boats plied their busy rakes; no fleet of
painted shallops and pettiaugers, such as are
now every moment seen gliding past each other
like the winds; no steam boats unfurled their
smoky pennons to the breeze; and the only
animated
beings besides themselves, were the gulls
that skimmed the surface of the waters, and the
fish that sported beneath. Where the little
villages
,
the whitening spires, and thickly-strewed
farm houses, now animate the landscape on
either
side, was nothing but lofty trees, on the
dead branches of which was here and there seen
the fish-hawk, watching to pounce upon his finny
prey, and the eagle waiting his opportunity to
make him resign it. The moment the hawk had
seized his prize, and rose into the air, the lordly
eagle flew forth and pursued him till he let it
drop, when, darting with inconceivable velocity,
the regal robber seized it ere it reached the
waters
.
So beautiful a scene might have charmed a
heart that dwelt not upon deep objects of
interest
,
that swallowed up all sympathy with nature
and her enchanting pageantry. But the
attention
of the good Heer and his daughter was
concentrated
on one idea, and they remained
unmoved
by the fair succession of objects that
passed rapidly before their eyes, until they
opened
upon the delightful bay, and city, which
seemed rising from its capacious bosom. For
a moment, each was animated by a spark of
wonder and admiration; but the thought that
they were now approaching the place, and the
hour, which was to seal their fate as happy or
miserable beings in this world, speedily assumed
its ascendancy, and shut out all other thoughts
and feelings. Arriving at New-York, our little
party landed, like pilgrims in some desert
country
,
or, at least, where they felt as lonely as in
the midst of the desert. Strangers to the place,
and every soul within it, they knew not whither
to seek a shelter, but wandered about the little
crooked streets and lanes, as objects of wonder,
rather than sympathy, to the busy inhabitants.
Passing, at length, by the door of a
comfortable
looking mansion, the ears of the good
Heer and his daughter were saluted with some
lines of an old ballad, which was familiar to
their recollection, chanted by a voice that
seemed
like one they had heard somewhere before.
Bless me! exclaimed the Heer,
involuntarily
;
if it was not quite impossible, I should
think I heard our old neighbour, Wolvert
Spangler
,
singing one of his ditties.
The exclamation was overheard by the
singer
,
who came straight to the door, exhibiting
the little, chubby, round, jolly face of the
identical
ballad-singing cobbler of Elsingburgh.
The moment honest Wolvert saw the old man
and his daughter, he recognised them, and ran
and took the hands of the Heer, and shook them
cordially, with tears of joyful welcome.
My old master, cried he, at last, it makes
my heart glad to see thee. And thou, too, my
little mistress, wilt let a humble old
acquaintance
,
who hath often taken measure of thy
little
foot, welcome thee to this good city.
In good sooth, Wolvert, quoth the Heer,
thy welcome is well timed, and grateful to our
hearts as our necessities. We are here as
strangers
,
without house, or home, or friends
Sayest thou so, interrupted Wolvert, I
am glad of itI am heartily glad of it, for then
thou wilt, perhaps, accept of me as a friend, and
my house as thy home. Never wilt thou enter a
threshold, where thou shalt be more welcome,
or meet with hearts more glad to administer to
thy happiness. Come forth, dame, cried he;
thou hast not forgot the kindness of my
benefactress
,
to me and mine, when I had neither
house nor home. I have often told thee of it.
At this call there came forth, with active
alacrity
,
a comely dame, neatly and comfortably
apparelled, and, with courtesy and smiling look,
besought them to enter and make themselves at
home. We will accept thine offers frankly,
said the Heer, not only because we know not
whither else to go, but most especially, that thy
welcome seems to be truly and sincerely
tendered
.
Else may one of the heaviest of Dominie
Kanttwell's judgments befall me and minemy
house and all within it, quoth honest Wolvert,
as he showed the father and daughter into his
comfortable little parlour, the floor of which was
sprinkled with sand from the sea shore, as white
as the driven snow. After partaking of some
refreshments, which were pressed upon them with
genuine, honest earnestness, the Heer, whose
heart was scarce ever so shut up but that good
cheer warmed and expanded it into something
like honest jollity, addressed his host as follows:
Neighbour Spangler, I am glad, for thy sake
as well as my own, that thou seemest so
comfortably
settled, and seemingly, therewithal, so
well to do in the world. Thou hast been
industrious
and saving, I dare swear for thee, hey?
for, if I recollect right, when thou badest
farewell
to Elsingburgh, in sober sadness, thou
didst not over and above abound in the good
things of this life, hey? Tell us thy
peregrinations
.
That is soon done, replied the other:
after
leaving Elsingburgh, I found my way to the
Hoarkill, where I had a brother a skipper, who
owned a small vessel, with which he plied along
the coast, to and again. I got a passage with
him to New-York, where I went forth into the
streets to seek my fortune. Providence, I
humbly
hope, in spite of the judgments of Dominie
Kanttwell, conducted me to the owner of this
house, then a worthy and thriving shoemaker,
who, luckily, wanted a journeyman, and took
me on the recommendation of my face. This
was not the only good turn my face did me, for,
in about a year, my master died, leaving his
widow
all his possessions. The good dame was
fond of music, and in good time my ballads
made an impression on her heart. To cut short
a long story, and a tolerably long courtship, I
married an excellent wife, who made me quite
independent of the world, and to whom, I trust, I
have been, and always shall be, a good husband.
Not only this, Heer, but Governor Lovelace has
lately made me one of his five Aldermen, and
consults me on all great occasions of state,
because
,
as he is pleased to observe, I always agree
with him in opinion, which is a proof of my
being a person of sound discretion. So you see,
my worthy old master, my old friends, the
ballads
,
have been the making of me, after all.
The Heer pondered a few moments on this
piece of biography, and then addressed himself
to Alderman Spangler, in an anxious tone, and
with a hesitating manner, as if afraid of hearing
a reply to his questions.
VOL. II. 24
As thou art in the confidence of the
Governor
,
thou canst, perhaps, tell me something
concerning
the fate of a youth, who is dear to us,
at least, to me, and whom thou mayest
remember
at Elsingburgh, as commonly known by the
name of the Long Finne. We have learned
that he is here, and in jeopardy of life and
liberty
.
You have learned the truth, replied the
other. Poor lad! I have made every effort to
save him from punishment, for what, I have
every
reason to believe, he is not guilty of. I have
even opposed the will of the Governor, until he
begins to waver in his opinion of my great
discretion
.
But his excellency is exceedingly
prejudiced
against Koningsmarke, because his
behaviour
,
during his examination before the
Council
,
was rather bold, and, according to the
Governor's
acceptation, savoured of a crop-ear and
Presbyterian parliament rebel.
In what predicament stands he now?
asked
the Heer.
He stands, replied the other, condemned
to be publicly whipt, and afterwards sold as a
slave to Barbadoes. The first part of the
sentence
is to be inflicted to-morrow, by twelve
o'clock.
Thou hadst better retire with our kind
hostess
,
my daughter, said the Heer, addressing
Christina, whose emotions almost shook her
frame to dissolution, as the thought crossed her
mind that it was now too late to save poor
Koningsmarke
,
at least from disgrace. But she
reisted
the motion to retire.
I came to see all, to hear all, and to bear
all, if Providence will vouchsafe to give
me a few days' strength. The time presses,
and what is done must be done speedily, or
never
.
Good Wolvert, canst thou procure me the
means of seeing Richard Lovelace this night?
I fear not, maiden, replied Wolvert; he
is now on Staaten-island, on a shooting party to
kill bears, and will not return till late, if at all.
But he will of necessity be here in the morning.
Wilt thou see him in the morning before
the hour arrives
, and gain me admission to his
presence?
If God will so help me as to succeed, it
shall be so, replied he.
Can I not see
him?
said Christina, with
anxious and delicate hesitation.
What, the youth? No, not to-night. He
is confined in the fort, and none can see him,
without an order from the Governor. But
tomorrow
be
of good heart, my poor maiden
to-morrow we will essay what we can do.
Richard
Lovelace is a passionate man, but he is
not cruel. Let us put our trust in Heaven.
I do, replied Christina, but my fears
overpower my trust. Would, Oh! would to
God this night were past, for I fear my mind
will fail me, ere the hour approaches when I
shall most need its support, and that of my
Maker
.
Father, I would wish to retire, and
prepare
for the morrow.
Christina was conducted to a chamber by the
good dame, who discreetly left her alone, after
seeing that nothing was wanting to her comforts.
CHAPTER V.
Unlock these iron gates, I say!
And give me up your prisoner;
'Fore Heaven, ere long we'll hamper him
With bonds, to which your iron chains
Are as Sampson's burnt flax.
The
fatigues of a long and tedious journey
could not conquer the wakeful agony of poor
Christina, who paced her room backwards and
forwards, till the crowing of the cock
announced
the approach of the morning, which was to
decide upon her happiness or misery. The
rising sun found her pale and worn with anxiety
and suffering; yet there was a firmness, a
composure
in her voice and manner, which indicated
a mind wound up to meet the events of the day,
let them take what turn they might.
Soon as the hour at which the Governor usually
finished his breakfast arrived, the kind-hearted
Spangler went forth to solicit an immediate
interview
for the Heer and his daughter. His
excellency happened to be in high good humour
24*
that morning, having just heard some news from
England, which gave him particular satisfaction,
but which, having no especial reference to our
history, we shall pass over just now.
What tell ye me, Alderman! the old
Governor of Elsingburgh come hither with his
daughter, to solicit the pardon of him they call
the Long Finne? Body o'me! is she young
and handsomehey?
She is pale and sad, replied Spangler;
but the damsel has fair blue eyes, is of
exceeding
comely features, and her shape is without
fault.
What! no Dutch dowdy, shaped like a
tubhey? Well, I shall put on my regimentals,
and you shall go and bring the old Heer and his
daughter hither.
The Alderman departed on his errand, and
the Governor proceeded to dress for his audience
of the fair young Swede, whose limbs trembled
so that she could scarcely support herself, as
they came into the presence of him who derived
a present consequence beyond all other human
agents, from having in his dispensation the fate
of Koningsmarke. The old cavalier was struck
with the beauty of our heroine, and with mingled
gallantry and compassion, conducted her to a
chair. After a moment's embarrassment,
Christina
said to the Heer:
Father, the hour draws nigh, each moment
is precious.
The Heer, then, in a firm, manly, and feeling
manner, required the pardon and
enfranchisement
of the young Swede called Koningsmarke,
who in all that he had done, had acted under his
orders, as lawful and unquestionable
representative
of the king of Sweden, then possessed of,
and exercising jurisdiction over the territory of
Elsingburgh.
But he invited the savages to take arms,
and thereby endangered the lives of many of
the subjects of my master. This was against
the laws of God and man, and he deserves the
severest punishment.
The laws of God, replied the Heer,
authorize
the means of self-defence at least; and
the practice of thy nation, as well as of all the first
adventurers in this new world, hath been to
enlist
the savages in their wars with each other.
He did not invite the red-men to invade thy
town, or murder thy people, but to assist in
defending
our lives and property. For this he
had my commission, and if any one is to blame
in this business, here I render myself thy
prisoner
,
to take the consequences of an act which
was not his, but mine.
But, said Lovelace, it is in proof, from
the testimony of thy own people, that he
continued
his practices among the savages, after the
surrender of Elsingburgh, and that he was,
consequently
,
guilty of conspiracy and treason
against the king's majesty of England.
That is impossible, replied the Heer,
because
he was with me during the whole period
of the negotiation, and also that which followed
the surrender of my power, until the evening
preceding the departure of the fleet, when, as I
understand, he was kidnapped and forcibly
carried
away by the agents of Sir Robert Carre.
Who among my people gave thee such false and
wicked information?
Governor Lovelace opened a drawer, and
produced a letter from Othman Pfegel,
conveying
these charges against the Long Finne, and
referring to Dominie Kanttwell for a full
corrobation
.
The
galgen schivenkel
, exclaimed the Heer;
the Long Finne shall cut off his ears, and a
slice of the Dominie's tongue, if he ever lives to
get back to Elsingburgh; and if he does not,
I will live a little while longer, if it be only to
do that good turn to a youth whom I loved as
my own son.
But what proof hast thou of this? rejoined
Lovelace.
The word, or, if thou so pleasest, the oath,
of a man of honour, quoth the Heer.
And mine also, faltered the weeping
Christina
.
The young man was never absent from
me, all this while, long enough to hold any
communication
with the savages.
Indeed! quoth Lovelaceis the young
man nearly related to thee?
No; not a drop of blood that runs in his
veins is of kindred with mine. I owe him
nothing
on that score, but I am indebted to him
for life, and more than life. Why, continued
Christina to herself, after a struggle and a pause,
why should I shrink, from what my heart
dictates
,
and gratitude makes it a crime to omit?
The moments are numberedthe clock strikes
elevenone hour, and but one hour more, to
wrestle with fate.
Rising from her seat, Christina tottered
towards
Governor Lovelace, and sunk at his feet.
Oh, sir! exclaimed the maiden, with
clasped
hands, if thou canst not yield to justice,
which demands the release of the innocent, yield
thou to the prayers of mercy, which entreats his
pardon at thy hands. At other times I might
veil my maiden modesty, and shrink from the
avowal, but now, I proclaim to thee that this
youth is my affianced husband, that both
gratitude
and love have bound me to him for ever,
and that if he is disgraced by public stripes, and
sold to captivity among the slaves of the
Indies
,
not he alone, but I, shall feel the blows and
the chains. My father, too, will become ere long
a childless old man, bearing on his shoulders a
burthen of misery, greater than even his weight
of years. Think of all this, and feel as I and
my father would feel for thee, wert thou and thy
daughter thus pleading before us for life and
death. Thou hast a daughter, perhaps?
The gallant, hearty old cavalier wiped his
eyes, and, hastily approaching the fire-place,
rung the bell. A servant entered
immediately
.
My carriage, instantly; do you hear?
instantly
.
He then sat down and employed
himself
in writing, till the servant announced the
carriage
was ready, when he arose, and,
approaching
Christina, gave her the billet he had just
finished.
Thou shalt bear the first tidings thyself, my
daughter, said Lovelace, for so I feel for thee.
Enter the carriage with thy father, drive to the
prison, deliver this letter to the keeperand
may those who would shrink from such exertions
as thine never taste the delight which is now
preparing for thee. Go, and bring the young
man with thee hither. No thanksthere is not
a moment to be lost.
He then handed Christina to the carriage,
placed her in it with her father, and bade the
coachman drive to the prison with all possible
speed. The clock struck twelve a few minutes
after they left the Governor's mansion, and
Christina, as she counted the last stroke,
exclaimed
,
in an agony of feeling
We shall come too late. Oh! I know him
him so well! I know that if he is once made a
public spectacleif the lash but once outrages
the sacred dignity of manhoodit will be as if
he were lost to us for ever; he will die, or, at
least, he will never see us more.
A few minutes brought them to the fort, which
served as the prison for state criminals, where
they perceived a bustle and confusion in the hall
as they approached. As they came nearer,
they could see a tall figure struggling with one
or two soldiers, who seemed striving to strip him
of his upper garments; a measure which he
appeared to resist with all his might.
Pooh! pooh! exclaimed one of the soldiers,
in a rough voice; there is no use in resisting,
and you may as well take it quietly.
Is there no hope they will shoot me? replied
the struggling prisoner. Must I be whipped
like a slave?
As sure as your name is Long Finne,
replied the other. Here comes the tickler,
with his cat-o'-nine-tails; if you had as many
lives as a cat, he'd scourge them all out of you,
I'll swear for it.
Then God forgive me! exclaimed the
youth, as he snatched the bayonet which the
soldier carried stuck in his belt, and directed it
to his own bosom. At that instant, and just as
the point became died in blood, a voice that
went to his soul, exclaimed:Hold! in the
name of Heaven! thy honour is saved! The
next moment Christina sank into his arms, and
her pure white bosom was stained with the blood
of him who pressed her to his heart. When the
blue-eyed maid saw the blood, she started away
in horrible despair. Am I then too late?
Hast thou done the deed? O! righteous powers,
one moment had saved him and me, and that
moment was wasted!
Koningsmarke solemnly assured her that he
was not hurt, and that his arm was arrested by
her voice, just in time to save his life.
And such is thy love for me! said Christina;
thou couldst not endure a little for one who
would suffer all for thee.
Any thing but stripes and brands. Couldst
thou, dear Christina, bear to link thy fate with
that of a man who bore on his back the scars of
disgrace, and on his brow the brand of
indelible
infamy?
Yes! replied she, raising her eyes to
Heaven
,
as an appeal to the ordeal of truth: Yes!
but neither thou nor I could bear it long.
Come, come, cried the Heer, who now
for the first time found the use of his eyes and
tonguecome, come, you young fools, don't
stand here talking and crying before these rough
and tough-hearted knaves, who, I see, don't know
whether to laugh or cry. Mr. Jailor, is the
order
sufficient?
Perfectly so, sir:the young gentleman is
free to depart when he pleases.
Well, then, let us depart, in God's name,
quoth the Heer to his young companions. And
VOL. II. 25
here is something to make merry with, boys,
throwing a hand full of rix-dollars among
the men of bolts and bars, who greeted him
with cheers, as he departed, and took coach for
the Governor's.
CHAPTER VI.
When heroine and hero haply wed
It is all one to us as they were dead;
Since in all ages it hath been the way,
That funeral or marriage ends the play.
Governor
Lovelace received the party with
great cordiality, and felt his heart warm with
honest benevolence, as the father and daughter
poured out their gratitude in thanks.
Give me thy hand, young man, said he to
the Long Finne. The assurances of this
worthy
old gentleman, backed by the entreaties of
this fair lady, have convinced me thou hast been
basely slandered. Give me thy hand; I hope
there is no ill blood between us.
None, replied Koningsmarke; the wisest
men may be deceived; it is only the virtuous
and just that will acknowledge and repair their
errors.
And I, rejoined his Excellency, hereby
covenant to forgive myself, and all my enemies,
on one condition; which is no other than that,
as I perceive with sufficient clearness this young
couple contemplate joining their fates together
ere long, thou, Governor Piper, wilt lay thy
commands upon them to honour my house with
the ceremony, and therewithal charge them, upon
pain of forfeiting thy blessing, to permit me the
pleasure of giving away a lady, whom, if I were
a young man, as I once was, I would dispute
the possession of with Guy of Warwick himself.
What sayest thou, Governor?
I say, replied the Heer, yea, I swear,
that it must, and shall be so, or I will withdraw
my consent in favour of the backbiter Othman
Pfegel, whom I do contemplate to beat lustily
on my return. Art thou content, my daughter?
Dear Father, allow me till to-morrow to
decide
.
Very well, but,
der teufel!
what has got
into thee, girl? When any thing turns up to
separate thee from the Long Finne, thou art half
mad; and when I am willing to unite you
together
,
thou art more than half a fool, I think,
and don't altogether know thy own mind. But
harkye, girl, be ready to-morrow morning either
to consent to marry the youth, or never to see
him more.
I agree to the alternative, father, replied
Christina, bending her head down upon her
bosom
.
Governor Lovelace now drew the Heer aside,
and whispered him, come with me, and let us
leave them togetherI dare swear the matter
will be settled to our satisfaction; and
thereupon
the two old gentlemen left the room
together
.
Koningsmarke, then, taking the hand of
Christina, said
Christina, thou hast this day made me thy
debtor in a sum of gratitude, which I can never
repay. Dare I ask thee to add to it by complying
with the wishes of thy father? I speak not of my
own happiness, but of his. He will rejoice in
our union.
Believe it nothope it not, replied
Christina
.
Oh, how I rejoice in the events of this day,
which have enabled me to repay, at least, some
of my obligations to thee! Thou didst once
save my life and honour, and I have helped, to
redeem thine. Thus far are we even, as to the
past; as to the future, believe not that I can
ever join my fate indissolubly to that of a
robber
at
least, to one who has been an associate of
robbers. The debt of gratitude repaid, I can
yield nothing to affection.
A robber! exclaimed the Long Finne,
25*
starting away from her with dismay and
astonishment
a
robber!
Yes! I have said it; for the truth compelled
me, at last, to utter the word, which I have carried
in my heart as a poisoned dagger, from the
very moment, when, at one and the same time, I
became thy debtor in an eternal weight of
gratitude
,
and discovered thou wert unworthy of my
love. Nay, deny it not; thy whole behaviour,
from first to last, hath acquiesced in the
imputation
.
None but robbers could have acted
as thou and thy companions acted.
But I do deny it. I appeal to facts, to the
whole history of my past life, to the eternal
fountain
of truth, to God, and man. I have never
been what thou hast named me.
This solemn denial led to explanations, which,
for the purpose of compressing in as short a
space as possible, we shall give in the way of a
connected narrative, and in our own words. For
this purpose it will be necessary to go back to
the period when the Heer Piper resided in
Finland
,
with his wife, a timid, gentle being, their
daughter Christina, and the Frizzled Head, then
to all appearance, as old as on the day she died.
At that period, and, indeed, it hath ever since
been too much the case with the north of
Europe
,
to the vexation, and ruin, and degradation
of the cultivators of the soil, the province was
infested with soldiery, who, quartered among the
inhabitants, too frequently acted like so many
freebooters, rather than as protectors of the
lives and property of the people. It was in those
days, and it is still, the custom, for the petty
princes of the north to hire out their subjects at
so much per head, to cut the throats, not of the
enemies of their country, but of those of the
worthy potentate who paid for their services.
The regiment of Holstein, commanded by
Colouel Koningsmarke, was, in this way,
employed in the service of Sweden, at that
time on the eve of becoming embroiled with the
Catholic powers of Germany. These foreign
auxiliaries and hirelings, as might be supposed,
having no attachment to the soil, no common
interests, or affinities of blood or affection with
the people, too often acted as their oppressors,
and plundered and insulted them at pleasure.
One summer evening, in the absence of the
Heer, as Christina, then a little girl of about
six years old, and her mother, were sitting, just
about the twilight, in a little low parlour, whose
open windows looked out on a charming
rural
landscape, tinted with the soft, enchanting,
changeful hues of evening, on a sudden they
were broken in upon by a party of ruffians,
armed, and apparently half mad with liquor,
who rudely seized both mother and daughter,
and, by way of a good joke, frightened them
almost into convulsions. They shrieked and
screamed, but without any other effect than to
bring forth old Bombie, who assailed the intruders
with the most bitter reproaches she could devise.
This brought the attention of the drunken rout
towards the Frizzled Head, whom they seized,
and, with great ceremony, proceeded, as they
pretended, to decapitate forthwith.
Among the party was a fair, light-haired,
blue-eyed youth, apparently about thirteen
years of age, who, however, kept aloof, and
partook
not in any of these outrages, until, incited
by the taunts, and ridicule, and, finally,
commanded
by the leader of the party, he came
forward reluctantly, and affected to assist in
restraining
the violent efforts of poor Bombie,
whose hands they were endeavouring to bind.
The moment the boy came near enough,
Bombie
seized him by the collar, and, tearing off
his ruff, disclosed a large and singular scar, just
under his ear, in the shape of a cross.
Christina
,
whose eyes were naturally turned in that
direction, also saw the scar, which was
impressed
on her memory, not only by the terrors of
the scene, but by the exclamation of the Frizzled
Head, who cried out
Ah! ha! thou bearest a marknot the
mark of Cain, but one by which I shall know
thee, whatever changes time and chance may
produce in thee. Thou carriest a sign, which
to others may be the emblem of salvation, but
which to thee, sooner or later, shall be the
signal of disgrace and condemnation. I will
remember thee.
The youth stood abashed, and took the
opportunity
of a momentary pause, to whisper the
leader of the party, a threat of representing the
affair to his father, if they proceeded to any
further violence. The whisper was, however,
unnoticed by those whom it was intended to
benefit. The party, after eating, drinking or
wasting every thing they could find, finally
departed, and returned to their quarters. The
agitation and fright produced by this scene of
outrage, operating upon the gentle spirits and
weak frame of Christina's mother, threw her
into a nervous fever, which in a few weeks
terminated
her life. The impression of these
events was never effaced from the mind of
Christina; and, in truth, it may be said, that it
strengthened with age, and every little while
received a deeper shade of horror, from the
exaggerated declamations of the Frizzled Head;
who, as her memory became less retentive and
connected, substituted the youth with the scar
for the principal actor in the death of her
beloved
mistress. In this way does memory often
exaggerate the past, almost as much as hope
does the future.
The regiment of Koningsmarke marched the
next day to a distant part of the country; and,
indeed, the knowledge of this event, was what
principally emboldened the ruffians who
belonged
to that corps, to the outrage we have
related. It is not within our plan to follow the
Long Finne, step by step, till his appearance at
Elsingburgh. Suffice it to say, that he was
left, by the death of his father, an extravagant
daring adventurer, without money, or the means
of subsistence: that, not long afterwards,
when his mother died in great distress, she gave
him a letter to her brother, the Heer's old
friend, Caspar Steinmets, who received him as
a son, and with whom he lived for some time.
Old Caspar, however, was a man who thought
no more of to-morrow than a grasshopper, but
sung, and basked in the sun, and was merry all
day long. Such men seldom leave much behind
them, except a sort of equivocal posthumous
fame, made up of a kind recollection of their
generosity and good humour, mixed with a
few shrugs of pity, at their want of prudence.
Old Caspar died; his money was all spent;
his salary, as high bailiff to a prince whose
territories, we are credibly informed, extended
over two square miles, throughout which he held
absolute sway, ceased with his latest breath;
and when honest Caspar was fairly housed in the
final asylum, there was nothing left to his heir,
but the recollection of his kindness, that last
legacy of gratitude, which the good heart
delights
to cherish as a keepsake for ever.
In casting about where to choose his future
lot, or, in other words, what he might do to keep
soul and body together, when the few rix-dollars
he had about him should be melted into thin
air, and identified with the things that have been,
young Koningsmarke, who was called the
Long Finne, gentle reader! because he was
born in Finland, and nearly six feet high,
was attracted by the new world. It was now about
the time when the dashing adventurers; the
ruined
lads, who had wasted their inheritance; the
younger brothers, who never had any inheritance
at all; the hero, alive to glory; the daring
spirit
,
willing to stake his life on the chance of
unbounded
wealth; and, lastly, the pious convert,
ready to do all, to dare all, and to suffer all,
were, each and every one, turning their faces
towards the setting sun, as to a region where
some might retrieve their fortunes, others enjoy
the liberty of their consciences. Koningsmarke
knew that Sweden claimed rights, and had a
settlement in this quarter of the world, and that
was all he knew. He was little aware that this
territory was governed by the Heer Piper,
whose house, when a boy, he had entered in the
manner aforesaid; and, indeed, he had long since
forgotten the whole affair, as we forget our
boyish frolics when arrived at the age of
manhood
.
He took the first opportunity of
embarking
for the new world; arrived at the Hoarkill;
proceeded to Elsingburgh; where he fell into
the custody of that vigilant police officer, Lob
Dotterel, and was recognised by Bombie, who
accidentally discovered the scar, which, as
rather unbecoming to his appearance, he
generally
hid with a high ruff.
Koningsmarke, at the conclusion of this
explanation
,
solemnly assured Christina that every
word of it was true; that he had extenuated
nothing; and that, any farther than hath been
just related, he had no participation in an event
which he had first learned from the Frizzled
Head, on his arrival at Elsingburgh, but in a
manner so mysterious and exaggerated, as
almost
convinced him he was actually a murderer.
Christina, too, when she looked attentively
backwards, and traced the progress of her
impressions
with regard to this painful event, could
not but acknowledge, that they were in a great
measure derived from the declamations of
Bombie.
To the foregoing explanations of the Long
Finne, we beg leave to prefix a few of our own. In
addition to the declamatory exaggerations of the
Frizzled Head, it is probable that the Long Finne
himself may have contributed to mislead our
readers, by occasionally indulging in that
inflated
,
romantic style, too common, with those of
exalted
imaginationscalling himself an outcast to
whom the elements themselves afforded no refuge;
a prey to the worm that never diesas if for the
sole purpose of making himself interesting.
To this we may add, that we ourselves, with
the most disinterested intentions of enhancing
the reader's perplexity and delight, in perusing
VOL. II. 26
this work, have now and then coloured the
charges
of the Frizzled Head, and the admissions of
the Long Finne, a little highly. Should the reader
be ill-natured enough to find fault with us for
thus verifying the old proverb that a story
never
loses by telling, we shall take care how we
treat him to another mystery.
The explanation of Koningsmarke, with his
solemn assurances of its truth, removed a load
that had long pressed on the heart of Christina,
and when he again besought her to comply with
the wishes of her father, she held out her hand
with a smile, such as had not lighted up her eyes
for a long time past.
The will of my father shall be obeyed,
said the blue eyed maiden; for now I trust that
so it can be done, without any offence, either to
my father, or my mother that is in heaven.
Oh God! I thank thee; I can now conform to
his wishes, and consult my own heart, without
wedding myself to never dying remorse. I am
thine for ever.
A kiss, and an embrace, sealed this covenant
just as the two old squires entered the room.
Well, quoth the Heer, are we to be
united
to-morrow, never to part, or to part, never
to meet again?
She has said that to-morrow she will be
mine, replied the Long Finne, and she never
broke her word.
Did I not tell thee, quoth the Cavalier
Lovelace, that there was nothing like leaving
them alone? Egad, there is always two to one
against a woman in such a case, not to say two
to nothing; for there is the lover and the lady
on one side, and nobody on the other.
Well, then, quoth the Heer, to-morrow
shall see thee one.
Nay, let it be the day after to-morrow,
rejoined Governor Lovelace: I must have
time to bid the company, and, 'fore Heaven,
Heer! but we'll carouse a little, shall we?
Verily, replied the other, I see no special
reason why the heart of an old man like me
may not, on an occasion like this, rejoice and
be glad. I will drink a bumper to the name of
the best of daughters with thee.
Ay, and to every letter of her name, or my
name is not Richard Lovelace.
This matter being concluded upon, the
preparations
were made by the hearty Cavalier
Lovelace, to celebrate the wedding, in a style
suitable to his own dignity, and the regard he
began to feel for Christina, whose appearance
and character had won his warm heart. One
thing he especially stipulated, to wit, that the
ceremony should not be performed by a
Presbyterian parson, nor the wedding dress
made by a French milliner. The former part
of the stipulation was easily accorded, and the
latter was entirely unnecessary, as there was
not a single French milliner at that time in the
whole province.
At length the happy hour arrived, which for
ever united Koningsmarke and Christina in one
fate and one name. All the dignitaries of the
city were bidden, not forgetting Alderman
Spangler
and his dame; and it was the opinion
of the young ladies present, that the bridegroom
was quite as handsome as the red-coats of
Governor
Lovelace's staff, who made such havoc
in the tender hearts of the pretty maidens of
New-York. Truth, our governing principle in
this history, obliges us to state, that Governor
Lovelace, the Heer Piper, Alderman Spangler,
and one or two others, did carouse it lustily till
the second crowing of the cock, when the
Governor's
old black valet entered the room, and
informed his Excellency that it was high time
to go to bed, an intimation which he never
failed
to attend to with perfect docility.
The day but one after the wedding, the Heer,
his daughter, and the Long Finne, bade the
worthy Cavalier Lovelace farewell, and
embarked
in his state barge, for Elizabeth-Town
Point, where they took up their line of march,
and arrived in due time, without any accident,
at Elsingburgh. After sojourning a few days,
they retired to a beautiful farm, on the banks of
a little river, about half way between
Elsingburgh
and Coaquanock, where, in rural ease,
rural quiet, the enjoyment of leisure, health, and
competency, combined with exercise and
employment
,
they passed quietly down the stream
of life, with as much content as falls to the lot of
this world. But the Heer and his daughter
could never agree on the subject of rural
economy
.
Christina was for planting flowers, and
ornamental shrubs, and beautifying all around;
while the Heer had a most pestilent propensity
for the useful, and valued a patch of cabbages
above a bed of tulips of a thousand dies.
Christina at length succeeded so far as to make
him promise to pay some little attention to
ornament
,
and cultivate a few favourite flowers,
which engagement he conscientiously kept, by
planting a notable bed of cauliflowers.
In process of time the good Heer saw his race
prolonged, in the person of a little blue-eyed
grandson, concerning whom he balanced three
whole days, in sore perplexity, whether to call
him after the immortal Gustavus, or his good
friend the Governor of New-York. Gratitude
at length got the better of loyalty, and the boy
was christened Richard Lovelace. The Heer
privately covenanted with himself, at the same
time, that the next should be called Gustavus
Adolphus, let what would happen.
As we like to follow old customs, sanctioned
by the examples of our betters, we will conclude
by gratifying the reader's curiosity with regard
to the other principal characters of our history.
The worthy Dominie Kanttwell, not long
afterwards
,
married the prettiest and richest girl in the
whole village, and the next sabbath preached a
mortal philippic against the lusts of the flesh,
and the mammon of unrighteousness. On this
unlooked for event taking place, aunt Edith
took mortal disgust to his doctrines,
turned
backslider, and married Wolfgang
Lang-fanger
,
then a spruce widower, who
privately
declared one night at master Oldale's, that
the improvement of that good lady was the
hardest task he ever undertook in all his life.
Lob Dotterel being, by the influence of the
Heer with Governor Lovelace, reinstated in his
office of High Constable, passed the rest of his
days in busy importance, and happy assiduity,
only that he was ocasionally molested by the
intrusion
of the ghost of Bombie of the Frizzled
Head, which never forgave his agency in the
catastrophe of the likely fellow Cupid.
Poor Othman Pfegel having been
confidentially
apprized, that the Long Finne intended to
take the first opportunity of giving him a
sufficiency
of drubbing to last him all the days he
had to live, departed suddenlynot this life
but the village of Elsingburgh, and settled
down at the Hoarkill, where nobody thought it
worth while to molest him.
THE END.